 Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. suffered every boss's nightmare: After firing its corporate-bond trading chief and suing for 1987 crash-related losses, it now must pay him instead.  The ruling against Dean Witter, made by a New York Stock Exchange arbitration panel, is part of a continuing Wall Street dogfight over who was to blame for losses during the crash.  It also is a rare example of a big securities firm firing and suing an allegedly "negligent" worker for damages -- and instead being upbraided and forced to cough up money to the worker.  In Dean Witter's case, the Big Board ordered the firm to pay $666,666 in back pay and a bonus to Harold Bachman, its former senior vice president in charge of corporate bond trading.  Dean Witter, a unit of Sears, Roebuck & Co., had fired Mr. Bachman in February 1988, later accusing him of "willful misconduct" and negligence that allegedly contributed to heavy losses for the firm around the time of the crash.  Dean Witter sued Mr. Bachman for more than $2.5 million, and Mr. Bachman filed a counterclaim in which he demanded back pay and the $550,000 bonus he would have been paid three days after he was fired.  Among other things, Dean Witter claimed in court papers that Mr. Bachman failed to record and report trading results accurately and failed to supervise traders, causing the firm "substantial losses."  Mr. Bachman denied these charges.  The Big Board panel, as is customary, didn't give any reason for siding with Mr. Bachman.  Dean Witter isn't expected to appeal, and indeed has already dashed off a check for $666,666 plus interest to the 43-year-old Mr. Bachman, who currently is looking for a new job on Wall Street.  A firm spokesman declined comment on what he termed a "management disagreement with an employee."  But Mr. Bachman's attorney, Kevin T. Rover of Morrison Cohen Singer & Weinstein in New York, said there was an important principle at stake.  "Dean Witter played real tough," Mr. Rover said.  "They accused {Mr.  Bachman} of being a bad guy.  He was a scapegoat."  Many bond traders reaped big profits during the stock crash, which caused bonds to plummet but then rally.  However, Dean Witter's corporate bond desk was "short" during the time, meaning that it had sold large amount of bonds and would thus profit from price decreases but lose money on price increases.  According to Mr. Bachman's attorney, Dean Witter's corporate bond desk was profitable for 1987 up to the stock crash, but because of the crash it wound up sustaining a loss of about $10 million for the entire year.  Dean Witter won't confirm that figure.  But in court papers it accused Mr. Bachman of understating by more than $2.5 million the amount of losses for the desk's positions.  Dean Witter isn't a bond trading powerhouse on the order of Salomon Inc. and Merrill Lynch & Co. Yet Mr. Bachman did manage a substantial $350 million of Dean Witter's money, according to his lawyer.  He was paid a $12,500-a-month salary, before the $550,000 bonus that was to have been paid in February 1988.  Long Island Lighting Co. declared a quarterly common stock dividend of 25 cents a share, ending a five-year dividend drought that stemmed from its financial troubles with the Shoreham nuclear power plant.  The dividend is the first on the utility's common since February 1984, when it paid 50.5 cents quarterly.  The new dividend is payable Oct. 1 to holders of record Sept. 11, and Lilco said it intends to pay on a regular basis.  In composite trading yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange, Lilco common shares closed at $18.25, up 75 cents.  Lilco also announced quarterly dividends on eight series of preferred stock, also payable Oct. 1 to holders of record Sept. 11.  The dividends range from 88 cents to $2.10 a share.  Lilco announced last month that it would make up $390 million in arrears on all its preferred, payable Sept. 1 to holders of record Aug. 4.  The arrears have been accruing since 1984 on 19 separate issues.  The company also said at that time that it would start paying regular preferred dividends.  The restoration of dividends is the result of rate increases and other benefits granted to Lilco earlier this year under an agreement with New York state.  Under that agreement, Lilco agreed to abandon the Shoreham plant in return for rate increases over a 10-year period.  On a clear summer day, in the stands of Kim Il Sung Stadium, a crowd of 10,000 schoolchildren proclaims its loyalty to the Communist Party.  As a throng of their classmates goose-step in colorful uniforms across the playing field, the students, all holding lettered cards, flash a slogan:  "SOCIALIST REVOLUTION]" the cards read.  The students flash a colorful representation of the Korean flag.  And then, in a perfectly synchronized move: "LONG LIVE THE GREAT LEADER KIM IL SUNG]"  These are "mass games," combination halftime shows and propaganda pep rallies that hark back at least to Hitler's Germany and perhaps to ancient Sparta.  Nowadays, for sheer gymnastic precision and artistry -- not to mention ideological fervor -- no country's mass games rival North Korea's.  "We don't say our mass games are the first in the world, but many heads of state and tourists from other countries have seen them and say ours are the best," says Hong Si Gun, North Korea's top mass-games planner.  Mr. Hong has even traveled to Eastern Europe and Africa to coach other countries in the art of depicting slogans and pictures en masse.  Mass games say much about this secretive country's underlying rhythms.  Part entertainment and part sport, they underscore the emphasis North Korea puts on discipline and teamwork -- and, perhaps foremost, on ideological conformity.  The regime uses them most the way it uses the country's ubiquitous loudspeakers: to reinforce by repetition the political line it is currently peddling.  "THE PARTY IS OUR LODESTAR]" flashes the crowd of students.  North Korea's supremacy in mass games is no accident.  Universities in this country of 20 million have mass-games majors, and the best graduates join the 300 full-time specialists in the government's Creative Group for Mass Games, which Mr. Hong heads.  The remaining graduates go to work in local schools.  Every schoolchild in the country spends at least an hour a day "playing" mass games and, during the 20 days before a formal performance, students drill all day every day.  North Koreans have inherited a Confucian tradition of hierarchy and order.  They have also lived for 40 years under a Communist regime that is as fiercely devoted to collectivism and regimentation as any on earth.  It is little wonder then that the society promotes such a highly ordered, highly regimented pastime as mass games and treats the man who runs them as a member of the elite.  Mr. Hong, who is an expert not only in gymnastics but also music and costuming, has a chauffeured Toyota, a seat in the People's Assembly and an apartment with such unusual goodies as a piano and a Russian-made shortwave radio.  Last year, he won a medal declaring him a "Hero of the Labor Republic," North Korea's highest civilian honor.  Mass games provide many clues about the current thinking of the country's rulers, President Kim Il Sung (the "Great Leader") and his son and heir-apparent Kim Jong Il (the "Dear Leader").  Judging from the mass games one recent day at Kim Il Sung stadium, the current message is simple: communism as usual -- and certainly not communism as it is evolving in places like the Soviet Union and China.  Those and other Communist countries have concluded that only by introducing incentives and other elements of capitalism can they hope to get their economies moving.  In North Korea, the propaganda line still contains heavy doses of "anti-imperialism" and other, well-worn revolutionary themes.  The line that draws the biggest cheer from the ever-cheering crowd at the stadium is, "U.S.  GO HOME."  Market incentives, the party says, are bourgeois ideas, to be stamped out.  People should work hard because they are building communism, not because of some special reward for hard work.  The aim, according to an editorial in the official press, is to ensure the "complete victory of socialism."  Those who favor incentives need to revolutionize their thinking and "deepen their class consciousness."  And while Mikhail Gorbachev and other East Bloc leaders have been facing up to socialism's failures with surprising candor, North Korea's rulers are defiant:  "WE HAVE NOTHING TO ENVY IN THE WORLD," flashes the card section.  Explains Moon Che Chul, an official of the Korean Society for Cultural Exchange with Foreigners: "We have no need to change our policies, even if other socialist countries have changed theirs."  This isn't the first time that North Korea has seemed out of step with other Communist lands.  Kim Il Sung has long prided himself on setting his own ideological line and even boasts that he has contributed a major refinement to Marxist theology in his so-called "juche" theory, which stresses national self-reliance.  But North Korea's continued hardline is of particular concern now, because, despite recent moves for rapprochement between North and South Korea, the situation along the Demilitarized Zone remains tense and unpredictable.  Recent indications that North Korea is developing a nuclear-weapons capability have only worsened matters.  Kim Il Sung, at 77, is running out of time to achieve reunification in his lifetime.  Most experts agree that after the Great Leader will come his son Kim Jong Il.  But they aren't sure what his ascension would mean.  Powerful figures in the military and elsewhere are said to oppose him, and many doubt he would last long as leader in a power struggle.  Some in the party apparently would like to pursue a more moderate line with the West, as North Korea recently has tried to woo foreign tourists and investors.  But Kim Jong Il may or may not be among them.  The leader is currently in charge of ideology and propaganda in North Korea, and presumably has had much to say about the country's entrenched ideological line.  It isn't unusual for him to confer with Hong Si Gun about mass games, for example, even though Mr. Hong's immediate boss is an official well below Mr. Kim's level.  Mr. Hong's apartment contains a number of presents from Mr. Kim, including a refrigerator, a sewing machine and a Japanese television set that would cost the average North Korean worker a year's pay.  "Since the 1960s, the Dear Leader Comrade Kim Jong Il has been in charge of the development of mass games personally, and he led these mass games to success," says Mr. Hong, puffing on a Japanese cigarette. (In 1930, he says, "the Great Leader personally invented mass games" -- a historical claim not taken seriously outside North Korea.)  As propaganda czar, Kim Jong Il runs what by most accounts is the country's most important work: political indoctrination.  North Korean propaganda explicitly states that politics takes precedence over economics, and every imaginable means is used to drive home the party line.  There are loudspeakers on factory roofs, loudspeakers on fields of cooperative farms, loudspeakers on trucks rolling through city streets and, in eerie imitation of the omnipresent "telescreens" in Orwell's "1984," a loudspeaker in every apartment.  There are party slogans carved into rural hillsides and socialist-realist posters of top leaders at many road crossings.  At night in the provincial city of Khaesong, near the Demilitarized Zone, three neon signs are visible along the main road.  One has a representation of the party symbol, one calls for "SOCIALIST ECONOMIC CONSTRUCTION" and one simply says "JUCHE."  Mass games aren't the only way the party gets its point across.  Every North Korean must participate in study sessions at least once a week.  Most movies and television programs have an ideological point; the variety is so limited that the film studio that makes propaganda movies has permanent sets, including mock-ups of two university campuses in South Korea for use in scenes about student demonstrations there.  In book stores the offerings fall into a few limited categories: technical books on things like computers; works by or about the Great Leader and the Dear Leader; and fiction or historical works with a strong ideological flavor.  The indoctrination process begins early.  To allow mothers to return to work, babies go into state nurseries starting at three months.  By age four, children are learning to read musical notation and play instruments.  By age five they can put on a complete musical performance of songs glorifying the Great Leader and proclaiming the revolution.  A visitor to a kindergarten on a cooperative farm heard a five-year-old in a piano recital play works that included "The Internationale." (Many kindergartens also have a mock-up of the birthplace of the Great Leader, where children are taught to recite in song and verse events from his life.) By the age of six or seven they are learning the goose step and playing mass games.  No wonder, then, that by early adulthood, most North Koreans are true believers.  It is hard to know for sure how true, because so much of what foreigners see in the country is staged.  Still, the obeisances to the party, its leaders and its doctrines come readily from the lips of many North Koreans.  Ask Kim Young Ok, a pretty 25-year-old machinist at the Taean Heavy Industrial Complex outside Nampo, whether she has any marital plans, and she sweetly tells you: "I am going to select my man from among the model workers who are faithful to the Great Leader."  For those North Koreans who refuse to get the point, harsher means of persuasion are available.  There are "re-education camps," though it is unclear how many residents they have because human-rights groups aren't allowed to visit North Korea.  And there are occasional reports from foreigners in Pyongyang of North Koreans' being dragged away in the middle of the night, screaming.  More subtle forms of regimentation and indoctrination, such as mass games, are enough for most, though.  In a society devoid of many forms of amusement, the bracing marching music, colorful uniforms and gymnastic wizardry -- performed in a modern stadium on a sunny day -- are something many North Koreans look forward to.  In that environment, and for these people, the propaganda may seem secondary, something that simply goes along with the sport.  Indeed, for Li Tong Hwan, vice director of the Changjang Senior Middle School here, mass games seem to have little to do with the socialist revolution, or the party as lodestar.  "All of our students play mass games," he says, "so they will all grow tall."  President Bush has pardoned industrialist Armand Hammer, who was convicted for making illegal contributions to President Nixon's 1972 campaign, administration officials said.  Mr. Hammer, chairman and chief executive officer of Occidental Petroleum Corp., pleaded guilty in 1976 to three misdemeanor counts of making illegal contributions.  He had actively sought a pardon from President Reagan in the final days of the Reagan administration.  But though Mr. Reagan pardoned New York Yankees owner George Steinbrenner of a felony conviction for conspiring to make illegal corporate contributions to the same Nixon campaign, he didn't act on a pardon for Dr. Hammer.  Administration officials said that a pardon recommendation was forwarded to President Bush by the Justice Department.  Mr. Bush then approved the pardon, along with pardons for several other, lesser known persons who also had filed appeals.  The 1976 conviction came on charges that Dr. Hammer had illegally concealed $54,000 in contributions to the Nixon campaign.  The charges were brought by the Watergate Special Prosecutor's office, which charged that Dr. Hammer had tried to cover up the contributions by channeling it through other persons.  Dr. Hammer said yesterday, in a prepared statement, "I deeply appreciate President Bush's action in clearing my name; having spent my lifetime fighting injustice, this vindication reinforces my abiding faith in the American system of justice."  The guilty plea was perhaps Dr. Hammer's darkest personal moment.  A sentence of a year's probation and a $3,000 fine was imposed as Dr. Hammer sat in court in a wheelchair, hooked to heart monitoring equipment, while doctors hovered around him.  His attorneys won leniency on grounds that the industrialist was near death.  A few weeks later Dr. Hammer was spotted briskly strolling the streets of Moscow.  Dr. Hammer has said since that he was uncomfortable with his pleading.  He has struggled to win vindication.  Administration aides said the Hammer pardon was one of "eight or nine" pardons signed by President Bush.  Resorts International Inc., the troubled hotel-casino company owned by entertainer Merv Griffin, plans to present a "revised business plan" to its debtholders on Sept. 19 that will probably include the restructuring of part or all of its $925 million in bonds.  Resorts also reported a net loss of $27.9 million for the second quarter, compared with a net loss of $13.8 million a year earlier.  Revenue dropped about 10% to $110.2 million from $122.3 million, stemming in part from a lower level of wagers by customers at its casino in Atlantic City, N.J., and a drop in casino win at its table games in the Bahamas.  For the six months, Resorts reported a net loss of $46.6 million, vs. a net loss of $17.6 million for the first half of 1988.  Revenue was $223.6 million, off slightly from $229.7 million.  The weak earnings are the latest in a series of disappointments for Mr. Griffin, who took control of the company last year after a protracted takeover battle with real estate developer Donald Trump.  "I think this is going to be viewed very negatively," said Kaye Handley, a senior analyst with R.D. Smith & Co., a trading firm that specializes in distressed securities.  "On an annualized basis, the loss comes to $100 million, which more than wipes out their cash flow."  While the company has said it anticipated a cash flow shortfall, it had expected to both improve operations and sell off real estate assets.  Instead, operations have declined, and some of the real-estate assets have been found to be worth far less than the company expected.  A 99-year lease the company holds on the Showboat Hotel Casino in Atlantic City was expected to sell for as much as $120 million.  People close to the situation say Resorts is likely to get closer to half that amount.  In May, Resorts retained Salomon Brothers Inc. to help analyze Resorts' alternatives.  Mr. Griffin's original investment firm, Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., was suspended from financing casino-related transactions in New Jersey because of its well-publicized securities-law violations.  Resorts' performance has deteriorated steadily so far this year.  The company partly attributed that to its refurbishing program and the designing of a new marketing plan.  In the first six months of 1989 in Atlantic City, for example, Resorts' gross casino win declined 5.3%, while the industry posted a 4.9% gain.  "The company is in a serious cash flow crisis," said Marvin Roffman, a gambling analyst with Janney, Montgomery Scott in Philadelphia.  "It's not a question of if they restructure but a question of when."  The company has $133.6 million of debt service this year, and analysts expect cash flow, its net income plus depreciation, to be between $55 million and $65 million.  Resorts said it has obtained a commitment letter from Morgan Guaranty Trust Co. of New York for a $50 million line of credit secured by Resorts' lease on the Showboat casino-hotel property in Atlantic City.  Any restructuring plan faces several hurdles.  Mr. Griffin must placate a restive group of bondholders who aren't likely to accept reduced bond payments without receiving some equity in the company as well.  Resorts' bonds, including $325 million in new debt issued when Mr. Griffin bought the company, have sunk to as low as 36% of their face value in recent weeks.  Last month, holders of at least $300 million in company debt formed a committee to represent their interests during a potential company reshuffling.  Analysts expect a barrage of bondholder lawsuits in the wake of a restructuring.  Further complicating Mr. Griffin's predicament is a coming round of licensing hearings before the New Jersey Casino Control Commission.  If a business plan is not in place by then, it is unlikely the commission will grant Mr. Griffin a casino license unless he adds to his original $50 million cash investment.  In a settlement that runs counter to prison policy in 20 other states, Connecticut agreed to end its segregation of prison inmates suffering from acquired immune deficiency syndrome.  The settlement of a lawsuit, announced yesterday, is believed to be the first in which a state agreed to rescind a blanket quarantine of inmates with conspicuous AIDS-related symptoms.  Under the terms of the settlement, inmates will be quarantined only when their behavior poses a security risk or when they require intensive medical care.  "This is the first time a department of correction's policy has been transformed as dramatically as this one is going to be," said Theodore M. Hammett, senior researcher with Abt Associates, a Cambridge, Mass., firm that last year conducted a study of AIDS-afflicted inmates in state and federal prisons for the U.S. Department of Justice.  According to Mr. Hammett, 20 other states -- among them Alabama and California, where lawsuits similar to the one filed in Connecticut are pending -- segregate AIDS-afflicted inmates regardless of their likelihood of contagion or attack by other inmates.  New York, Michigan and Oregon have voluntarily instituted policies of segregating AIDS-infected inmates only on a case-by-case basis, Mr. Hammett said.  Connecticut had stopped quarantining inmates with AIDS symptoms last January in response to the suit, said William Flower, a spokesman for the state prison system.  At present, about 1,000 of Connecticut's 8,800 inmates are believed to have AIDS, Mr. Flower said.  The suit was filed in March 1988 by Deborah S. Chang, an associate at the Hartford, Conn., law firm of Day, Berry & Howard.  According to Ms. Chang, inmates suffering from AIDS were deprived of outdoor recreation, church services, adequate laundry, and visitation and library privileges.  All those issues have been remedied by the settlement, Ms. Chang said.  The market for bonds backed by mortgages has been showing investors a very good time lately, but some analysts see trouble ahead.  In the past three months, mortgage-backed securities were among the best performing taxable fixed-income investments, racking up a total return of 8.42%, according to Salomon Brothers Inc.  That was better than the 8.38% return for Treasury securities.  Total return is price appreciation plus interest income.  But many analysts and economists, a number of whom were touting mortgaged-backed securities just a few months ago, have turned cautious.  Faced with the threat of widespread mortgage refinancing and a supply glut caused by beleaguered thrifts selling huge amounts of the securities, the mortgage-backed bond market could be heading for tougher times.  "It's kind of like we're looking into a black hole, and it's a deep hole and you don't want to jump in until you have some sense of where the bottom is," said Gail Seneca, senior vice president and portfolio manager at Wells Fargo Bank in San Francisco.  In the past three weeks, credit market analysts estimate that savings and loan associations have dumped between $10 billion and $15 billion of mortgage securities on the market.  Some analysts estimate that sick thrifts own about $80 billion of mortgage securities that could be liquidated within a year.  Other thrifts -- those that will be forced by regulators to scale back their operations to meet new capital requirements -- could liquidate anywhere from $160 billion to $300 billion within three years.  Moreover, interest rates have fallen to the point that some analysts are expecting a flood of new mortgage issues as homeowners rush to refinance their higher-rate mortgages with lower rate loans.  These changes caused Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., which has strongly recommended mortgage-backed securities all year, suddenly to urge caution.  Last week, Drexel Burnham warned investors that repayment rates on adjustable-rate mortgages are likely to increase substantially over the next few months as homeowners roll over these mortgages into fixed-rate mortgages.  That trend, in turn, will boost the amount of mortgage securities.  "With fixed-rate mortgage rates now well below those of many ARMs, homeowners have a powerful incentive to refinance these higher-rate ARMs and lock in fixed-rate mortgages," says William J. Curtin, vice president of fixed-income research at Drexel.  Even when adjustable rates aren't substantially higher than fixed-rate loans, he says, homeowners will convert their mortgages to fixed rate to avoid the risk of having a higher rate in the future.  This new supply, combined with the thrift liquidations, "can serve only to put a damper on fixed-rate mortgage-backed securities prices," Mr. Curtin says.  He estimates that $15 billion to $50 billion of adjustable-rate mortgages may be refinanced over the next three months, of which as much as $28 billion could be fashioned into securities.  But so far, the market has managed to absorb the available supply because big insurance companies and commercial banks have snapped up mortgage securities as quickly as thrifts have sold them.  Because of this strong demand, "Mortgages are doing all right," contends Jerry Dell'Isola, director of mortgage research at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  The reason, he says, is higher relative yields.  The current yield on mortgage securities ranges between 9% and 11% on securities that have coupons of 7% to 12%.  A lot of the buying taking place thus far has been among investors more interested in "yield than performance," says Mr. Dell'Isola.  Such investors tend to be longer term holders, seeking investments that are relatively safe.  Mortgage-backed bonds appeal to such investors.  The default risk is extremely low, primarily because most mortgages are guaranteed by various federal government agencies, including the Government National Mortgage Association, or Ginnie Mae; the Federal National Mortgage Association, or Fannie Mae, and the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp., or Freddie Mac.  All buy mortgages from banks or thrifts, repackage them in the form of securities and sell them to the public in the form of mortgage pools.  Investors buy a piece of the pool, basing their choice on such factors as the maturity of the mortgage, whether the underlying pool is fixed-rate or adjustable-rate mortgages, and how big the spread is between the yield on the mortgage security and the yield on the 10-year Treasury note, which is considered the benchmark rate in the market.  But some investors wonder whether the market can continue to absorb new supply.  Steve Carlson, a transaction strategies group manager for Shearson Lehman Hutton, said the market did a good job digesting the two major portfolios that came on the market so far.  California-based Gilbratar Savings, which was seized by regulators in late March, liquidated about $4 billion of mortgage securities in June.  New West Federal Savings & Loan Association, a so-called bad bank that was established to hold the troubled assets of American Savings & Loan Association, is in the process of liquidating a mortgage portfolio estimated at $13 billion.  Shearson has also become more bearish on the market.  In a recent report, the firm estimates that as of early August, about 250 thrifts had been placed under federal conservatorship, representing one-third of the total thrift assets.  The market was able to digest the first wave of thrift selling, which had been widely expected.  "But that's not likely to be the case when" the government starts to liquidate the 250 thrifts, Mr. Carlson said.  There's a chance the sales by thrifts might not be as overwhelming as many expect.  Rumors circulated in the market that the implementation of a new thrift regulation might be postponed.  This regulation, scheduled to go into effect late this month, would make it much more difficult for thrifts to trade mortgage securities held in their portfolios.  Faced with this regulation, thrifts were selling mortgage securities during the past two weeks to accomplish portfolio restructurings, traders said.  These sales were in addition to the huge sales of mortgage securities by insolvent institutions following the passage of thrift bailout legislation.  But with the rumor of a postponement of the regulation, thrifts sold mortgage securities only lightly yesterday, which helped support that part of the bond market.  A spokesman for the Office of Thrift Supervision, the successor to the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, had no comment on the market talk.  So what's an investor to do?  Some money managers say there is good value in the overall mortgage-backed bond market, while others say only specific securities are good.  Ms. Seneca of Wells Fargo Bank likes issues that have come to market recently, such as Ginnie Mae 9% securities, for investors who want to buy and hold.  "These securities have cheapened relative to where they were in 1988," she said.  "They represent greater value.  For an investor looking just to buy and hold, given prepayments won't accelerate, these are good levels."  Barbara Kenworth, a fixed-income portfolio manager at Dreyfus Corp., expects most prepayments to occur in the group of high-rate mortgages, which could make the performance of securities backed by pools of those mortgages lag behind significantly.  Because of the market's current volatility, she has stayed in Treasurys.  But if spreads of yields over Treasurys widen further, "I may start buying."  Donna Blair, portfolio manager at Capital Management Group, a unit of Prudential Life Insurance Co., says the relatively wide spreads mean it's time to buy because the securities are cheap.  "At some point, when the thrift liquidations abate, interest rates will stabilize.  When that happens, prices will rise."  She says the current yields on the securities, which are about 1.6 percentage points above similarly maturing Treasury securities, are worth the wait.  ---  @ Mortgage-Backed Securities Bloom  @ Investors Reap High Total Returns  @ TOTAL RETURN*  @ ----------------------------  @ THREE SIX  @ MONTHS MONTHS  @ MONTH ENDED ENDED  @ OF JULY JULY JULY  @Broad Market Index 2.12% 8.24% 9.88%  @Treasury 2.12% 8.38% 10.20%  @Agency 1.87% 7.31% 9.13%  @Corporates 1.88% 8.05% 9.84%  @Mortgages 2.37% 8.42% 9.53%  @ *Based on bond market indices  @ Source: Salomon Brothers Inc.  France's seasonally adjusted current account swung to a June deficit of 469 million francs ($71.5 million) from a revised May surplus of 385 million francs, according to provisional figures from the Economics Ministry.  The May result had been estimated as a deficit of 5.02 billion francs.  The ministry didn't explain why the figure had been revised to a surplus.  Hong Kong's industrial output in the first quarter rose 3.8% from a year earlier, but slowed 18% from the 1988 fourth quarter, according to seasonally unadjusted figures reported by the government.  Industries showing the largest first-quarter production gains from a year earlier were the machinery sector, where output rose 29.2%; paper and paper products, which registered a 13.2% rise; and basic metals, which expanded 12.7%.  The rubber products industry had a 13.4% decline.  The hotel and construction sectors expect business to worsen in the third quarter, but manufacturers and the plastics and electronics industries have rosy outlooks, a government survey shows.  The quarterly study, based on responses provided by about 1,000 companies, found most companies in the service sector expect a mild increase in business in the third period.  Banks, however, expect a deterioration in business.  Retail, wholesale and trading companies expect better business.  Hong Kong's unemployment rate fell to 1.4% in the second quarter from 1.8% a year earlier, but rose slightly from 1.3% in the first quarter, according to government figures.  The number of jobless people in the latest three-month period was estimated at 38,600, down from 49,400 a year earlier, but up from 35,800 in the 1988 first period.  Spain's consumer-price index rose 1.6% in July from June, pushing up annual inflation to 7.4%, the National Institute of Statistics said.  Officials attributed the increase to higher costs of food and transportation.  The index, which registered 154.8 at the end of July, is based on 1983 equals 100 and isn't seasonally adjusted.  The index at the end of June was 152.3.  Inflation in 1988 was 5.8%.  The index rose 4.5% from January through July.  but with strings attached.  Faced with a slackening in demand after the peak summer travel season, major carriers are announcing price promotions aimed at leisure travelers.  The latest discounts apply for travel from Sept. 9 to Dec. 15.  Yesterday, AMR Corp.'s American Airlines subsidiary said it would cut restricted fares on all its routes over the U.S. mainland.  American's move substantially expanded fare cuts announced over the weekend by Trans World Airlines, and made it likely that the reductions would spread to most markets nationwide.  The reduced fares apply only for tickets purchased on or before Sept. 1.  An American spokesman said the carrier's reductions would put its cheapest round-trip ticket prices $60 to $100 below its current lowest fares.  With the discounts, American's round-trip fares for mainland destinations would range from $108 to $298.  Despite the cuts, consumers shouldn't expect widespread discounting.  The industry has been riding a wave of profitability built largely on efforts to block business travelers from discounts and draw boundaries around those available to leisure travelers.  Analysts said the latest cuts don't change that.  "I don't think it's the beginning of fare wars," said Kevin Murphy, airline analyst at Morgan Stanley & Co.  Indeed, American and the other carriers retained TWA's tight restrictions that limit the number of discounted fares per flight.  In addition, the tickets are non-refundable, must be for a stay over a Saturday night and exclude the busy Thanksgiving period.  The cuts are clearly aimed at leisure travelers during the fall season, when vacation travel tails off sharply but business travel picks up.  Analysts say the moves reflect a slowdown in demand brought about by previous fare increases and by weakening consumer spending.  Domestic airline traffic fell 1.6% in the first six months of the year, according to the Air Transport Association, an industry trade group.  While June traffic was up 3% over year-earlier levels, analysts say it got an artificial kick from a promotion in which children could fly free.  The latest fare cuts come just days after the end of a weekend travel promotion started by Continental Airlines at the beginning of this month.  The unit of Texas Air Corp. reduced its weekend domestic fares to $75 to $100 each way.  Other airlines followed the move, but tickets had to be purchased by last Friday.  While most major airlines were quick to match TWA in the current round of cuts, a spokesman for Delta Air Lines said the carrier wouldn't say until today what it would do with its fares.  Still, some airlines professed to question the wisdom of the latest discounting.  "We don't have a good reason" to cut fares, said a spokesman for UAL Corp.'s United Airlines subsidiary, which nonetheless matched TWA's cuts.  "Our advance bookings are strong.  Obviously, {TWA's} must not be so strong."  Meanwhile, Pan American World Airways moved to expand the international fare cuts announced by TWA on Sunday.  A spokeswoman for the Pan Am Corp. subsidiary said the carrier would extend the discounts to all its cities in Europe.  She said the carrier adopted restrictions similar to those of TWA, including ticket purchase by Sept. 1.  The international cuts apply to travel from Oct. 1 through May 21, 1990.  Unlike other U.S.-based carriers, Pan Am and TWA are heavily dependent on their international flights for revenue, particularly between the U.S. and Europe.  Chock Full O'Nuts Corp. said it signed a letter of intent to acquire Tetley Inc.'s Tenco instant coffee business for $7 million.  Tenco had revenue of $22 million last year.  It processes instant coffee and markets its products primarily under private labels to major supermarket chains.  The acquisition, which is subject to a definitive agreement, also calls for Chock Full to lease Tenco's Linden, N.J., instant-coffee plant.  The companies expect to close the transaction next month.  Chock Full roasts, packs and markets regular, instant and decaffeinated coffee.  Federal Express Corp. said its average daily volume of packages and documents rose 18% in July to 1,134,400 from 960,300 a year earlier.  Its total volume of packages and documents increased in the month to 22,688,000 from 19,206,000 in July 1988, the package delivery concern said.  TECO Energy Inc.'s Tampa Electric Co. unit said it will refinance $125 million in tax-exempt bonds in a move it said would save customers $60 million during the life of the bonds.  The new, 30-year bonds will have interest rates of 7.875% and 8% and they will replace issues carrying interest rates of 11.625% and 12.625%.  London share prices retreated sharply as the market underwent a technical correction in response to its nearly 30% surge since the start of the year.  Tokyo stocks rebounded from early losses but closed lower in thin dealings.  In London, traders said the market was also dented by Wall Street's retreat Friday and mounting concern about the outlook for the British economy.  After encountering early profit-taking, the market spent most of the day steady at lower levels, as players' attention shifted to Wall Street.  Despite the downturn, dealers said selling pressure remained minimal.  They attributed a large portion of the market's descent to the action of market makers, who trimmed prices in an effort to revive flagging buying interest.  Also, several major stocks retreated as they traded ex-dividend.  "Trading was fairly thin and pretty calm," a trader said.  "It simply isn't a major setback.  The market has had a good run, and this was an overdue correction."  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index ended down 28.3 points at 2325.9, up from a low for the day of 2314.4.  At its best, the index touched 2327.5.  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index ended down 19.3 points at 1950.3.  Turnover was a moderate 434.9 million shares.  The release of U.K. retail sales and producer price data for July had a minimal effect on market sentiment, dealers said.  On the bright side, most traders reckoned the fall will prove a precursor to future gains.  "We need a period of consolidation before the market can break convincingly through the 2350-point level," a dealer said.  B.A.T Industries ended 28 pence (46 cents) lower at 809 ($12.79) on rumors of a large sale of the company's stock for under 800 pence a share in New York.  B.A.T had eased to 790 pence before rallying in late trading.  Dealers said B.A.T was also hit by weekend press comment detailing an array of potential troubles facing Hoylake's #13.40 billion ($21.19 billion) hostile offer for the U.K. conglomerate.  A range of 100-share index stocks started trading ex-dividend and declined accordingly.  Among them, Barclays fell 11 pence to 511, STC retreated 9 pence to 364, GKN slipped 11 pence to 452 and Commercial Union Assurance slid 9 pence to 401.  BTR advanced on further speculation about the intentions of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts after news Friday that the leveraged buy-out experts have filed with U.S. regulatory authorities to buy up to 15% of the U.K. industrial conglomerate.  BTR shares ended 10 pence higher at 465.  Apart from BTR, the only risers Monday were Pearson, Rank Hovis McDougall, Scottish & Newcastle and Wellcome.  Meanwhile, in Tokyo, the market was quiet as many traders and investors observed Japan's "Obon" summer holidays.  One trader said he saw 30% to 40% fewer participants than on a normal trading day.  The Nikkei average of 225 issues was down 41.34 points at 34671.62.  The index fell 6.84 points Friday.  In early trading in Tokyo Tuesday, the Nikkei index rose 3.03 points to 34674.65.  Monday's volume on the first section was estimated at a light 380 million shares, down from 555.5 million shares Friday.  Declining issues outnumbered advancers 492 to 351, with 233 issues unchanged.  What little buying there was streamed into high-priced, small and medium-sized stocks, continuing last week's trend, traders said.  Those stocks can be pushed up on relatively modest buying by investors trying to turn a quick profit.  Traders said the Nikkei was lower because of the market's "summer slump," the dollar's latest surge against the Japanese currency and lower bond prices.  One fund manager said investors held off from active trading because they believe the market still needs a technical correction after the Nikkei's July surge.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which fell 1.93 points Friday, was down 5.23 points at 2632.97.  Although dealings surrounding large capitalization issues like steel have been sluggish, some traders said, the market is adjusting to the slump fairly well by turning buying interest toward small- and medium-sized high-priced stocks.  In addition, many issues in the second section and some that have tended to be unpopular attracted investor interest, traders said.  Gainers include Uni Charm, which was up 100 yen to 2,280.  Toyo Seikan rose 200 yen to 3,050.  Matsuzakaya department store gained 110 yen to 6,810, and Tokyo Steel advanced 120 yen to 5,170.  CSK was up 220 yen to 6,600.  High-technology issues that surged last week were mostly lower toward the end of the day as investors took profits, traders said.  Sony fell 100 yen to 8,740, off from the day's high of 8,880 yen.  TDK also lost some early gains to close at 6,120, up 10 yen.  Fanuc was down 60 yen at 6,910, and Kyocera fell 150 yen to 6,530.  Nintendo, which advanced 4,900 yen last week, was lower on profit-taking, traders said.  It fell 100 yen to 18,500.  In Sydney, shares surprised analysts by jumping to a post-crash high as a flood of bullish sentiment swept away early nervousness about Wall Street's failure to set a record Friday.  In Hong Kong, rumors that Beijing may soon lift its declaration of martial law pushed share prices solidly higher in moderately active trading.  And Taipei share prices fell sharply as a spate of unconfirmed bearish rumors continued to weigh on the market.  In other Asian and Pacific trading, share prices closed higher in Singapore, mixed in Seoul and lower in Manila and Wellington.  In Frankfurt, share prices skidded in across-the-board profit-taking, but the decline was slowed by the absence of many market players because of summer vacations.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Stockholm and lower in Zurich, Amsterdam and Milan.  South African gold stocks closed lower.  The Paris and Brussels markets were closed because of a holiday.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 11 Aug 10 Year  @ U.S. ............... 317.6 320.9 + 24.0  @ Britain ............ 710.6 709.3 + 30.1  @ Canada ............. 434.4 437.4 + 18.3  @ Japan .............. 1563.0 1561.6 + 10.0  @ France ............. 526.8 524.4 + 19.0  @ Germany ............ 253.0 253.4 + 21.7  @ Hong Kong .......... 1947.2 1945.7 - 4.1  @ Switzerland ........ 237.5 235.9 + 37.3  @ Australia .......... 340.1 337.9 + 17.2  @ World index ........ 541.6 548.7 + 9.5  @ Weekly Percentage Leaders  @ Last week's best and worst performing stocks among those issues that make up 80% of the world's stock market capitalization (in local currency)  @ ISSUES (COUNTRY) CLOSE % CHG  @ WINNING ISSUES  @ UAL (U.S.) 256.25 + 55.8  @ Nintendo (Japan) 18600.00 + 34.8  @ Bond Corp Intl (Hong Kong) 1.63 + 28.3  @ Mondadori (Italy) 23510.00 + 18.4  @ Wang Laboratories B (U.S.) 6.625 + 17.8  @ Volker Stevin (N'thlands) 75.00 + 17.7  @ Italcementi Risp Non Cv (Italy) 61500.00 + 17.1  @ Robt.  Jones Invstmnts (N.Zealand) 1.17 + 17.0  @ Beverly Enterprises (U.S.) 9.25 + 15.6  @ CanonSales (Japan) 3980.00 + 15.4  @ LOSING ISSUES  @ Chase Corp (N.Zealand) 0.04 - 20.0  @ Lauritzen(J) Hldg B (Denmark) 77500.00 - 14.8  @ Spar Aerospace (Canada) 11.125 - 14.4  @ Amper (Spain) 409.75 - 11.9  @ Norsk Data A (Norway) 39.0 - 11.4  @ Daito Woolen Spinning (Japan) 1080.00 - 9.2  @ Carlsberg (Denmark) 1370.00 - 9.2  @ Kuoni Inhaber (Switz'land) 27200.00 - 9.2  @ Noma Industries A (Canada) 13.875 - 9.0  @ Bell Resources (Australia) 0.73 - 8.8  @ Source: Morgan Stanley Capital Intl.  Perspective  On Jan. 3, 1989, Alexander P. Rubin was a major in the KGB.  The next day, he became a vice president of a co-operative venture in Kazan.  Now he is one of the 1.9 million persons employed in the co-operative sector of the Soviet economy.  In January 1988, there were just 156,000.  "I had been on duty for 25 years," Mr. Rubin says.  "I became sick of orders and instructions from my commanders.  I suffered from insomnia and heart diseases.  But now I've got responsibility and initiative.  I sleep like a child but there are nights when I wake up, go to my kitchen, and think over some business combinations.  It gives me real satisfaction."  There were 99,300 co-ops in operation in the Soviet Union on April 1, 1989, six times as many as a year earlier.  Contrary to stereotype, they are not all perogi-shops.  Co-ops produce processed wood, metal products and computer software as well as advanced technological research: 24% of the co-ops' sales derive from consumer goods; 17% from consumer services including restaurants; 14% from construction; and 6% from conducting research and development on contract for other enterprises.  In smaller proportions, co-ops appear throughout the rest of the Soviet economy, although since the special decree of Dec. 29, 1988, forbidding co-ops to offer health care, medical services have slipped to just 1% of total co-op sales.  Five hundred co-ops have been granted recognition as official exporters.  These enterprises are very close in legal status to U.S. limited partnerships, and some are ready to become corporations as soon as the Supreme Soviet adopts a Corporations Act later this year.  Before the government enacted its Cooperatives Law in May 1988, Soviets could go into business for themselves only with special permission from the local authorities and were obliged to employ primarily students, the disabled and pensioners.  They had no right to sell their goods and services to state enterprises.  The May 1988 law eliminated most of these restrictions.  The most serious opponent of independent economic activity in the Soviet Union, after the Soviet bureaucracy, is the general public.  Co-op managers get blamed for shortages of food and consumer goods as well as for inflation.  A public opinion poll in the March issue of the Soviet magazine, "20th Century and Peace," suggests that more than 86% of the population still holds an "equal income" mentality.  Since a co-op employee earns, on average, twice as much as a state industry worker (co-op managers, of course, make even more), the potential for resentment is real.  The closing of all co-operatives was one of the demands of the Siberian coal-miners when they went on strike in July.  As Valery G. Yurchenko, once an economic researcher but now the manager of a restaurant in Leningrad, puts it: "It looks as if co-operatives were created as a bone to be thrown to the public when it comes to a hunger riot."  Independent businesses are also threatened by organized crime.  The press is full of horrible stories of violence toward new entrepreneurs and their families.  Private security agencies and body-guards, formerly unknown, have emerged as the result of booming crime.  Corrupt Soviet officials sometimes collaborate with the criminals.  Several co-op managers told me they had to hire bank employees on a part-time basis because bank officials -- to whom the employees kicked back part of their salaries -- had threatened to disclose co-ops' financial accounts to racketeers.  Despite the hostile environment, these enterprises nevertheless have achieved extraordinary results.  According to official statistics, co-op sales increased from 350 million rubles in 1987 to 6.5 billion rubles in 1988.  In the first quarter of 1989 sales were 4.3 billion rubles.  And even these numbers may be an underestimate.  Many local authorities deliberately misrepresent co-operatives' performance to conceal the inefficiency of state industry.  An independent study found that in some regions coops' actual sales were up to nine times higher than officially reported.  To protect themselves from officialdom, some co-ops form joint ventures with state enterprises, while others launch huge social-responsibility programs and widely advertise them.  In Leningrad, Mr. Yurchenko, the restaurant manager, established the first independent labor union officially registered in the Soviet Union.  This union is to defend the economic rights of co-ops' employees both against their employers and against local bureaucrats.  But the most interesting trend is the politicization of the co-operative movement.  Co-op businessmen have united in local, regional and national associations to protect their economic interests through political activity.  During the recent elections to the new Congress of People's Deputies several co-operative businessmen were denied the right to register as candidates.  The most famous Soviet entrepreneur, Artiem Tarasov -- whose personal income from his high-tech R&D and software-writing co-op amounted to 3 million rubles last year -- did, however, manage to become a candidate, despite Mr. Gorbachev's criticisms of him for his foreign trade speculations.  Mr. Tarasov lost the race but more and more such political activity can be expected from co-operative businessmen.  In late July, they held the first officially recognized convention, which established the National Co-operative Association.  Mr. Tarasov was elected vice president of the association; Nikolai Tikhonov, a radical economist and a member of the new Soviet parliament, was elected president.  Many co-op managers believe that their only chance for survival lies in business contacts with the West.  In addition to obtaining political safety for the Soviet partners, joint ventures with Western firms are governed by more liberal regulation than are co-operatives -- including lighter taxation.  As the most talented people desert the state sector, Soviet co-ops can offer Western partners a highly educated and low-wage labor force.  No kidding about the latter.  Soviet co-ops lack capital and management technique, not scientific knowledge.  This could turn out to be an intriguing opportunity for many Western industrial companies and venture capitalists, as the most motivated and aggressive scientists leave state labs and factories to launch their own ventures.  Alexander Rubin was the last person to call me before my departure from Moscow.  He is looking for a foreign partner to co-produce a newly patented environmentally safe construction material, a substitute for cement.  Mr. Rubin is optimistic about his business prospects.  And many of his colleagues and rivals all over the Soviet Union are just as optimistic about their own.  ---  Mr. Kuteinikov, a Soviet economist, is a correspondent for the Moscow News in New York.  Monday, August 14, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9 1/16% high, 9% low, 9% near closing bid, 9 1/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.:8.75% 23 to 44 days; 8.50% 45 to 59 days; 8.25% 60 to 89 days; 8% 90 to 119 days; 7.875% 120 to 149 days; 7.75% 150 to 179 days; 7.375% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.85% 30 days; 8.70% 60 days; 8.625% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.25% one month; 8.15% two months; 8.09% three months; 7.98% six months; 7.90% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.80% one month; 8.80% three months; 8.65% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.82% 30 days; 8.70% 60 days; 8.65% 90 days; 8.52% 120 days; 8.48% 150 days; 8.40% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% three months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% four months; 8 13/16% to 8 11/16% five months; 8 13/16% to 8 11/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9% one month; 8 7/8% three months; 8 3/4% six months; 8 5/8% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 14, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 8.01%, 13 weeks; 7.83%, 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.10%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par).10%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.95%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.42%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Continuing Japanese economic expansion led by robust domestic demand caused the number of companies going bankrupt in July to fall 24% to 552 cases from a year earlier, a private credit research agency said.  That is the lowest tally for the month in 17 years.  But Teikoku Data Bank Ltd. said the total amount of liabilities left behind by failing companies totaled 211.8 billion yen ($1.49 billion), up 73% from a year ago.  But July's surge in liabilities -- figured at more than double from June -- was described as a one-time affair, based on the bankruptcy of a large 20-company recreational group that left behind liabilities of between 80 billion and 90 billion yen in the month, according to a data bank official.  MARSAM PHARMACEUTICALS Inc. began shipping generic penicillin products earlier this year.  A recent OTC Focus column indicated it wasn't yet shipping penicillin.  (See: "OTC Focus: Generic Drug Stocks Are Bitter Pills Some Analysts Are Willing to Swallow" -- WSJ Aug. 14, 1989)  AIDA ENGINEERING Ltd. was one of the Japanese companies cited by the Commerce Department for selling transfer presses in the U.S. at unfair "dumping" prices.  In an earlier edition, the department incorrectly identified the company as Awa Engineering Ltd.  (See: "Commerce Agency Rules on Dumping by Japanese Firms" -- WSJ Aug. 14, 1989)  AEG AG received its first order for a magnetically elevated passenger train that the company has been testing for several years.  AEG signed a contract with the Frankfurt Airport Authority to build the train between the city's main airport terminal and a planned new terminal just over a mile away.  The train line, to be completed in 1994, is expected to cost 160 million marks ($82.4 million), excluding the cost of stations.  AEG is the electrical unit of auto group Daimler-Benz AG.  A related product, a magnetically elevated superspeed train developed by a consortium led by Thyssen AG, has run into problems with the West German Transportation Ministry over its choice of a rail route.  The first line should be built either between Hamburg and Hanover or Essen and Bonn.  Our four-wheel-drive Chevy pickup hurtles through a strip of marsh, clambers up a rocky trail through fog-shrouded darkness and bounces into a broad clearing.  We are in the heart of Maine's wild-blueberry country -- thousands of acres of ground-hugging berry plants and wooded groves, etched with uncounted miles of sinuous dirt paths.  We are looking for rustlers.  Blueberry rustlers.  The wily thieves who invade these fields in the dead of night, scoop up clusters of glistening fruit, then wend their way along the uncharted byways of Deblois, Cherryfield or Township 18, to the receiving docks of processors known for not asking too many questions.  "It's a tremendous problem," says Sonny Worcester, president of Maine Freshpack Cooperative in Machias, Maine.  Amid the rock-strewn soils of Maine and Eastern Canada, the wild blueberry is a gift of nature -- "blue gold," as one grower puts it.  Once a source of sustenance for native American tribes, the berries have an intense flavor and favorable baking qualities that today attract some of the world's biggest food companies.  Down East processors flash-freeze the fresh berries and later dehydrate, can or otherwise ready them for makers of such things as muffins and cereals.  Yogurt, jam and pie makers sometimes blend wild berries with blander, cultivated blueberries from Michigan, New Jersey, British Columbia and elsewhere.  Overseas berry devotees also have taken a fancy to the North American variety.  European jam and juice makers combine the berries with more acidic strains from Scandinavia and Poland.  Even Japanese food companies now stir wild blueberries into yogurt preparations.  A master chef from Canada's Prince Edward Island will demonstrate muffin-making in Japan in November.  The fruit's new-found cachet has led to a doubling of field prices -- the rate packers pay growers and, presumably, rustlers -- to about 46 cents a pound last year from 23 cents in 1985.  This year, prices are expected to inch up still further, as unfavorable weather is cutting the harvest from last year's record of 52 million pounds.  These changes haven't been lost on certain quick-buck artists.  Hard-working, legally employed blueberry rakers can fill 80 to 100 24-pound boxes a day under good conditions, and earn $250 or so.  But rustlers can make much more.  Everett Ramsdell, field supervisor for Jasper Wyman & Son, says he reckons a fast-moving thief, picking "only the best stuff," can skim off enough in a good night's work to fetch $700 or more from processors who look the other way.  Some bands of thieves are said to have infiltrated the barrens equipped with miners' helmets and walkie-talkies.  "We don't get organized gangs, like in the Maine Deblois barrens," says Cole Bridges, whose fields stretch into New Brunswick, northeast of here.  But amateurish weekend thieves pick the choicest 10% of a field and "make a mess of the other 90%," creating losses far greater than their actual take.  Wyman spent $30,000 on security during last year's month-long blueberry season, according to Bob Phillips, president.  Company patrols turned up half a dozen vehicles, creeping through the barrens in the middle of the night and loaded with berries.  But the drivers had pat alibis: They had done their picking elsewhere and were just joy riding.  Lacking hard evidence to the contrary -- blueberries have no identifying marks, after all -- the growers were unable to charge them with theft.  Now, the rules of the game have changed.  Swayed by industry estimates that rustling skimmed a million pounds from last year's bumper harvest, the Maine Legislature in May rushed through an emergency bill, An Act to Discourage the Theft of Blueberries.  Pickers now must be able to produce written authorization from the landowner; anyone lugging more than 25 pounds must have a permit to do so; and buyers must keep copies of that permit, including the trucker's name and the amount delivered.  "We've created a paper trail back to the field," says Edward McLaughlin, executive director of the Maine Blueberry Commission.  Some industry executives take exception to the paper work.  It's "a burden of regulations," complains Amr Ismail, executive vice president of Maine Wild Blueberry Co. in nearby Machias.  "Some people are overreacting to the issue," says the former horticulture professor.  But some big growers -- like Wyman and Cherryfield Foods, which have sprawling tracts in the barrens -- pushed hard for the law.  They hope the potential jail terms for berry rustlers, and fines of up to $1,000 per offense for processors who accept undocumented berries will deter would-be thieves and unscrupulous buyers.  To underline their get-tough message, the two companies have commissioned a security squad.  So it is that five security guards are huddled in Wyman's field headquarters, laying plans for the season's first all-night patrol.  "We are the guinea pigs" for the untested law, declares Frank Fletcher, a 50-year-old former New Jersey policeman and now head blueberry guard.  "It's up to us to decide how it works," he says, sounding a bit like Charles Bronson.  Of the group, only Mr. Fletcher has arrest powers, and only he packs a handgun, strapped to his hip.  The others are to note suspicious characters, question them cautiously and relay the information to headquarters -- but avoid volatile situations.  "I don't want to have to go knocking on widows' doors," Mr. Fletcher warns.  Industry executives and security personnel suspect most rustling is done by locals, not by the hundreds of migrant workers who pour in from Canada's maritime provinces and other parts of the U.S.  Some Down East families view berrying in the barrens as a kind of birthright, like shooting deer or catching trout out of season, says one local woman.  Back out on the barrens, in the early hours of the morning, the temperature dips below 50 degrees and fog settles in, throwing the glare of the pickup's headlights back at us.  Mr. Fletcher slows the truck to a crawl, reaches for a wide-bottomed mug on the dashboard and consults a sheaf of maps for a route to one of the "potential pilferage areas" he is supposed to keep an eye on.  A week into the season, there haven't been any arrests.  But a few people toting modest quantities of berries have been stopped and lectured about the new law, Mr. McLaughlin of the Blueberry Commission says.  Enforcement authorities will use "no heavy-handedness" with small-time violators, he says.  "We're not looking to put people in jail; we're looking to solve a problem."  Even so, Mr. Fletcher remains wary, following lessons learned as a Jersey cop on night patrol: Never set a pattern, never go the same way twice.  And, if push comes to shove, don't do anything foolish.  Says he, "I don't want to become a statistic in a test case."  In a town where Skinheads outnumber Royal Rosarians, and Bloods and Crips are not signs in hospital waiting rooms, snatching was considered petty larceny until the introduction of our newest Rose Festival event.  Now dragon-boat racing has given snatching a good name.  Now even solid citizens want to be snatchers on dragon boats, the better to bring glory to our town, where America's first official dragon-boat races were held recently.  Dragon boats, as every sports fan in Hong Kong and Taiwan knows, are enormous wooden boats with a fierce dragon head rising from the bow and a prickly, reptilian tail jutting from the stern.  At least 16 paddlers are required to propel one of these one-ton monsters downriver at a furious pace.  Other crew members are the drummer, who sets the cadence; a rudderman, who steers the boat within snatching distance of the finish line; and the snatcher, who can make or break a victory by stretching out over the maw of the dragon's head to grab the flag from a buoy.  If the lead snatcher snatches and misses, boat No. 2 wins by default.  Facts such as these used to be part of a 2,000-year-old Chinese tradition until they became Rose City lore this year, when we got our very own dragon boats.  In a sororal gesture, our Taiwanese sister city, Kaohsiung, gave us four, 40-foot-long dragon boats, causing enthusiastic members of our local Chinese community to proclaim Portland "the Mecca of American dragon-boat racing," which, if nothing else, proves that Far East is Near East, and the twain do meet in the Northwest.  Thirty-one teams of 19, representing businesses, schools and assorted other groups, signed up for the first local competition.  For weeks, drums were heard along the Willamette as the teams practiced.  Boats full of men and women in business suits, fresh from work or happy hour, were not an uncommon sight.  I fancied the idea of being carried on the shoulders of my jubilant teammates, so I opted for the position of snatcher.  But at an all-you-can-eat Chinese restaurant, I was informed that I didn't measure up.  "You strong] You row] Have some more lunch]" were the words of Dr. Eng Lock Khoo, president of the Portland-Kaohsiung Sister City Association.  He told me tradition dictates that the snatcher be long (the better to reach the flag) and lean (the better not to swamp the boat).  Unlike the pork chow mein, that news was hard for me to swallow.  But I accepted his offer of a place on the paddling team representing Woodland Park Hospital, where Dr. Khoo, a cardiologist, sees his patients, most of whom, presumably, do not cut a snatcher's figure.  I was envious of my team's snatcher, a tall, skinny nurse, until I saw what she had to endure in the name of esprit de corps.  Her long legs were stretched wide and bound with ribbons to the horns of the dragon's head.  Her torso was taut with tension, leaning out beyond the bumpy dragon's head, upon which she rested her stomach.  "Compared to childbirth," she confided after a few trial runs, "snatching is a piece of cake."  Race weekend drew upon us.  We practiced twice weekly, sometimes returning quickly to shore when a doctor's beeper went off.  Then, only three days before the event, our rudderman/team captain broke his leg when he was knocked off his motorcycle by a car.  One of his teammates, the director of nursing, got a wheelchair so we could push him around and elicit crowd sympathy.  We slapped hands with our rudderless captain and boarded the boat for our first race.  We were nervous, especially after seeing the burly paddlers on the other team.  "We want urines on you guys]" one of my teammates yelled.  I learned that this is not an insult, but is hospital parlance to voice suspicion about steroid use.  We were also suspicious of the team that claimed to have heard the name of the races wrong.  To them it was "draggin'" races, so they said, and for their snatcher they recruited Dracelle, a.k.a.  Walter Cole, a female impersonator and nightclub owner.  Dracelle, decked out in platinum wig, evening gown, ostrich feathers and running shoes, disdained the traditional snatcher pose and rode his boat's dragon's head to glorious defeat.  As he told me after the race, "It's not if you win or lose, it's how you snatch the flag."  Privately, he admitted that he agreed to be team snatcher only because "I liked the terminology."  In spite of our best efforts, my team failed to make it into the finals.  First and second place were won by professional rowing clubs, which didn't seem fair to us.  We wanted urines on them, too.  The third-place trophy went to a team from the Portland Fire Bureau.  The Portland Police Bureau had intended to race as well, but withdrew its team.  The chief decided that assigning 19 police officers to a dragon boat would not be a hit with the voters.  So the cops missed the races and remained onshore, protecting our streets from snatchers.  ---  Ms. Hauser is a free-lance writer based in Portland, Ore.  The president's spokesman said the White House "shares the thinking" of Budget Director Richard Darman, who said recently that the Federal Reserve's credit policies may be pushing the economy toward recession and that interest rates should come down further.  White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said yesterday, "Dick Darman is director of the Office of Management and Budget; he speaks for the administration and the president.  And, generally, we've had similar comments to this effect before."  But Mr. Fitzwater was careful to praise the Fed, saying, "Our policy is to want continued economic growth with low inflation, and we believe the economy is generally on that course at the present time, and the Fed is doing a good job."  He added that Mr. Darman is part of the president's economic team and that "we share his thinking, he shares our thinking and, well, we think generally we're on the right course here."  Mr. Fitzwater was responding to questions about whether the administration agreed with Mr. Darman, who said Sunday in a televised interview that he fears the Fed "may have been a little bit too tight."  He added, "If we do have a recession, I think it will be because they erred on the side of caution."  Asked whether he was suggesting that the central bank should bring down interest rates further, Mr. Darman replied, "That would be a fair conclusion."  GREAT BAY BANKSHARES Inc., Dover, N.H., said it received regulatory approval to buy back an additional 5%, or 151,875 shares, of its common stock outstanding.  The bank holding company bought back 337,500 shares during the 12 previous months.  United Airlines parent UAL Corp. held intensive weekend talks with its pilots union about a new contract and possible employee ownership, according to people familiar with UAL.  The talks were held under the pressure of a $5.4 bilion, $240-a-share takeover bid by Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis.  They were apparently aimed at determining a level of labor-cost savings that could help finance a labor-management buy-out or recapitalization.  People familiar with the airline indicated that an agreement isn't likely in the next day or so.  Although the talks are at an early stage, an accord by the end of the week isn't out of the question, they said.  The talks were conducted via UAL's advisers, First Boston Corp., a unit of CS First Boston Inc., and the pilot advisers, Lazard Freres & Co. and Salomon Brothers Inc., a unit of Salomon Inc.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, UAL shares rose $1.50 to $258.50.  The pilots' seeming readiness to join forces with UAL Chairman Stephen Wolf could make it more difficult for Mr. Davis or any other potential bidder to prevail.  The talks, which took shape with surprising speed last week, are the first concrete sign of Mr. Wolf's long-rumored interest in pursuing a buy-out of his own.  Mr. Davis's takeover bid was disclosed only eight days ago and it was just last Wednesday that the UAL board said it planned to explore all of its options.  Many analysts believe it would be difficult if not impossible for other bidders to compete with a group that carried substantial labor-cost concessions.  But it isn't clear whether Mr. Davis and other bidders will get access to the same type of negotiations UAL has been conducting.  The company may not even be put up for bids.  Mr. Wolf holds other cards as well.  In his two years in charge of the airline, he has filled many top management jobs, including three of the top five, with executives likely to remain loyal in a showdown.  Still, the UAL chairman is undecided whether a joint employee-management transaction is the best alternative, according to a person familiar with the talks.  He recognizes that for such a transaction to work, it would have to include United's machinists, the airline's largest labor group, and other employees, not just the pilots.  It couldn't be determined just how much the company is seeking in cost savings from the pilots and other employees.  However, United officials frequently point out that if United had American Airlines' cost structure, United would save about $616 million on operations a year.  A person familiar with the labor talks cautioned that $616 million isn't necessarily the amount UAL would seek from employees in return for including them in a management-led transaction.  However, he indicated that amount has become a talking point.  One union adviser notes that a 1987 labor bid that included cost concessions was valued at $110 a share at a time when the company was losing money.  He estimates the same concessions at United's current level of profitability would be enough to finance a $250-a-share offer -- only $10 a share more than Mr. Davis.  As of Sunday, the company hadn't approached the machinists union about such a proposal.  However, Brian M. Freeman, the financial adviser to the International Association of Machinists, has indicated in the past that the union is open to discussing a joint transaction with management.  Mr. Freeman also has said the machinists may submit a proposal that calls for the payment of a special shareholder dividend along with an ownership stake and job protections for employees.  A spokeswoman for the United flight attendants union said the union hadn't yet engaged in discussions about the possibility of particpating in a buy-out.  United unions could theoretically trade cost concessions for equity ownership in a buy-out proposal via an employee stock ownership plan.  Such plans carry tax breaks, which allow them to obtain bank financing at below-market interest rates.  The pilots' own advisers, Lazard and Salomon, are capable of helping finance a labor-management transaction, along with commercial banks.  Lazard has a so-called white-squire equity fund, which is normally used to help protect companies from hostile takeovers, and Salomon has both equity funds and the capacity to distribute high-yield bonds if any are needed.  What is more, Mr. Wolf has a ready ally to help obtain financing in Saul Steinberg, chairman of Reliance Group Holdings Inc., which owns 7% of UAL. Mr. Steinberg brought Mr. Wolf in on his last job, the turnaround of Tiger International Inc.  There are already signs, however, that not all the employee groups would support a joint transaction with management.  A group calling itself Coalition Acting for the Rights of Employees sent a letter to Mr. Wolf yesterday, saying it will oppose any buy-out that uses employee retirement funds as equity unless employees get to vote on the proposal.  The group says it represents 10,000 union and nonunion employees.  It is the same coalition that opposed the pilot union's $110-a-share bid for the airline in 1987.  As part of that bid, the pilots union said it planned to use $350 million from its pension plan assets toward the purchase.  The union also sought an additional $300 million in wage concessions and productivity gains annually from its members to help finance the transaction.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ MUNICIPALS  Southeastern Public Service Authority of Virginia -- $210.6 million of Series 1989 bonds, consisting of $187.4 million of senior revenue and revenue refunding bonds and $23.2 million of guaranteed subordinated revenue refunding bonds, for the Regional Solid Waste System, tentatively priced by a Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. group to yield from 5.90% in 1990 to 7.20% in 2013.  There are $17.6 million of 7% senior term bonds due 2006, priced at 99 1/2 to yield 7.05%, $84.3 million of 7% term bonds due 2013, priced at 97.723 to yield 7.20%, and $32.2 million of 6% original issue discount term bonds due in 2015, priced at 88.12 to yield 7%.  The guaranteed subordinated bonds are due 1990-2004.  They carry the same scale as the senior serial bonds, tentatively priced to yield from 5.90% in 1990 to 7% in 2003 and 2004.  All the bonds are insured and triple-A-rated.  Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia -- $86.1 million of various revenue bonds, consisting of $60.8 million of power revenue bonds, Series T, and $25.3 million of general power revenue bonds, Series B, tentatively priced by a First Boston Corp. group to yield from 6.25% in 1991 to 7.30% in 2009.  Series T consists of current interest bonds due 1991-2002, 2009 and 2025.  Original issue discount term bonds due 2009 have a 6 1/2% coupon and are priced to yield 7.25%.  Series B serial bonds carry the same scale.  The underwriter expects ratings of single-A/double-A-minus.  Ohio Air Quality Development Authority -- $50 million of 7.40% state air quality development revenue refunding bonds (Ohio Power Co.), Series B, due Aug. 1, 2009, tentatively priced by a Goldman Sachs & Co. group at 99 1/4 to yield 7.47%.  The bonds are rated single-A-3 by Moody's Investors Service Inc., according to the lead underwriter.  @ EUROBONDS Svensk Exportkredit (Sweden) -- 100 million Canadian dollars of zero-coupon Eurobonds due Sept. 22, 1999, priced at 41 1/8 to yield 9.70%, via Wood Gundy.  Fees 1 1/2.  Sanwa Australia Ltd. (Japanese parent) -- 110 million Australian dollars of puttable floating-rate notes due August 1994, priced at 110, via Sanwa International Ltd. Notes pay the six-month bank bill rate minus 0.18 for the first six months, then the three-month bank bill rate minus 0.18.  Put option at par on every interest payment date.  Guaranteed by Sanwa Bank.  Fees 0.10.  Efforts to end strikes at four regional telephone companies proceeded slowly as union and company bargainers tried to assess worker support for the walkouts.  Negotiators for Bell Atlantic Corp. offered Communications Workers of America bargainers a number of changes to the company's proposed contract, including amendments to the medical benefits package, a company spokesman said.  About 52,000 employees, including 11,000 represented by the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers, have been striking Philadelphia-based Bell Atlantic since Aug. 6.  Bargainers at Pacific Telesis also were scheduled to meet, but no breakthroughs were predicted.  Last week, the company sent letters to 42,000 union workers explaining details of its offer and trying to gauge support among the rank and file.  The union countered with letters rebutting the company's claims.  No talks have been scheduled at Chicago-based Ameritech Corp. nor at New York-based Nynex Corp.  At Ameritech, some 40,000 workers went on strike Sunday morning after the previous three-year contract with the CWA expired.  At Nynex, some 40,000 CWA and 20,000 International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers are out on strike.  In the meantime, the number of arrests and incidents of vandalism apparently linked to the strikes continued to grow.  In Nynex's New York and New England territories, some 60 workers have been arrested on picket lines, and both Nynex and Bell Atlantic reported unusually high instances of vandalism.  A Bell Atlantic spokesman said that since the strike began, the company has recorded 120 cases of vandalism, including 70 cases of severed cables.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  B&H Crude Carriers Ltd., initial offering of four million common shares, via Salomon Brothers Inc. and Prudential Bache Capital Funding.  Medical Dynamics Inc., offering of one million units, each consisting of a common share and a stock-purchase warrant, via Cohig & Associates Inc.  Soybean futures prices plummeted after heavier-than-expected rains over the weekend and amid prospects for more wet weather as the crop enters a crucial development stage.  Soybean futures for November delivery dropped 20.25 cents a bushel to $5.71.  Corn futures followed suit, with the September contract falling 6.25 cents to $2.2775 a bushel.  Traders focused on the weather after the Agriculture Department late last week released its first survey of 1989 crop conditions, which projected smaller-than-expected gains in grain and soybean production.  The department predicted a 24% increase in soybean output to 1.91 billion bushels.  The department forecast a corn harvest of 7.35 billion bushels, a 49% jump from last year's harvest, which was devastated by drought.  Although the crop report triggered moderate gains last week, "we probably will see volatile trading {this week} as we try to assess the weather," said Mickey Luth, a soybean analyst for Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., New York.  Some traders concluded that the gains after the crop report weren't warranted, Mr. Luth said.  The market was "giving back those gains which weren't economically justified," he said.  Mr. Luth also cited poor demand as a cause of yesterday's declines.  The unexpected rains over the weekend brought timely and beneficial moisture to the soybean crop, which has entered its "maximum water usage time," said Mario Balletto, an analyst with Merrill Lynch & Co., New York.  After the futures markets closed yesterday, the National Weather Service issued its closely watched, six-day to 10-day forecast.  It predicted above-normal temperatures and normal rainfall in Iowa and Minnesota, and above-normal rainfall in Illinois.  But for the next few days, the service is predicting thunderstorms through much of the Corn Belt, eastern Iowa and northern Indiana and Illinois.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  COPPER: The rally that started in early July continued.  The September contract finished 3 cents higher at $1.20 a pound.  Ben Bowdon, vice-president of metals management at the Essex Group Inc. in Fort Wayne, Ind., one of the largest copper consumers in the U.S., noted that this rally has continued without a correction since July 6, when the price of spot copper dropped to 99.60 cents.  "If there is going to be a recession we certainly don't see it in our order books," he said.  "The supply of copper on both a spot and contract basis is there, but so is the demand."  He said copper consumption is much higher than he thought possible for this time of the year.  He also pointed out that the price at the London Metal Exchange has been running consistently six to seven cents a pound higher than at New York's Commodity Exchange.  As a result, he said, copper may be flowing out of the U.S. to those places that base their prices on LME prices.  John Gross, president of J.E. Gross & Associates, a consulting firm to the metals industry, New York, noted that LME stocks dropped 975 metric tons last week, while Comex copper stocks were down 658 tons on a week-to-week basis.  In addition to falling stocks and low stock levels Mr. Gross said he believed the current rally was being spurred, in part, by the strike of copper workers in Peru, New Guinea and British Columbia.  He noted that on Friday the market broke through technical resistance at $1.14 a pound for the September contract.  He said, "Today {yesterday} we saw follow-through buying and more short covering.  I think the market looks much more attractive from a speculative point of view."  SUGAR: Profit-taking snuffed Friday's rally.  The October contract fell 0.79 cent to 13.63 cents a pound.  Erik Dunlaevy, sugar analyst at Balfour Maclaine International Ltd., New York, said the collapse was no more than liquidation by speculators.  He pointed out that there were lots of stop-loss orders just under the 13.75-cents-a-pound level, last week's low price, and the market reached it just before the close.  The market collapsed, he said, because "too many people got too long, too early."  He said he thinks the market will continue to work higher but declined to predict just how high it would go.  "In any bull market the final peak is determined by the {speculators}.  They are the ones who will carry it the last one cent or the last 10 cents."  Judith Ganes, soft-commodity specialist at Shearson Lehman Hutton in New York, said the market ran up last week partly on rumors that India had bought 250,000 tons of sugar, but Monday, those rumors were proven false.  "Third-World countries cannot afford to buy much sugar at these prices, but any pullback will provide them an opportunity to do some purchasing," she said.  Ms. Ganes said that the bull market isn't over, but that the investors who have taken long positions won't have an easy time achieving the higher prices.  Ms. Ganes also said there is some technical support for the market at the 13-cent level.  "The more pullback we get," she said, the more physical sugar will be purchased "and the higher the rally will ultimately go."  COTTON: The selloff that started on Friday continued.  The December contract fell 1.46 cents a pound to 73.74.  The heavy selling was prompted by rain in West Texas.  Judith Ganes, soft-commodity specialist at Shearson Lehman Hutton in New York, said that while the weather in Texas was looking good, the Delta appears to be both too dry and too cool for development of the crop.  December had set a life-of-contract high price of 76.95 cents a pound on Friday before a weather report around midday forecast rains over the weekend.  But Ms. Ganes said this decline could prompt export sales of U.S. cotton.  She also said that, initially, the selloff was prompted by profit-taking but that as the decline continued, some holders of long positions were forced to leave the market.  Michael Sidel, a former yen futures trader at the Chicago Mercantile Exchange, pleaded innocent to fraud charges stemming from the federal probe of the futures markets.  Mr. Sidel, 42 years old, is charged by the government with three counts of mail and wire fraud and five counts of violating commodities laws.  He is the 13th former yen futures trader from the Merc to plead innocent to criminal fraud charges.  Forty-six traders from the Merc and the Chicago Board of Trade were indicted Aug. 2, and more indictments are expected as a result of the unprecedented undercover inquiry.  Anthony Onesto, Mr. Sidel's attorney, said that some of the charges against his client pertain to a trade he made July 18, 1986, with fellow yen trader Thomas Braniff.  Mr. Braniff was one of three yen traders to plead guilty last week to defrauding customers and is cooperating with the government's investigation.  Five indicted yen traders have yet to enter pleas in federal court.  Mr. Onesto said that the Sidel-Braniff trade was the subject of a Merc investigation shortly after it occurred, and that both traders were exonerated by a Merc disciplinary committee.  Futures exchanges don't disclose investigations in which subjects are cleared of any alleged wrongdoing.  In addition to the yen traders, two Swiss franc traders on the Merc pleaded guilty to fraud charges, while a third pleaded innocent.  On the Board of Trade, three traders in the Treasury bond futures pit, and 19 soybean futures traders, have yet to be arraigned.  "Nice Work" (Viking, 277 pages, $18.95), David Lodge's eighth novel, puts a contemporary spin on a very old story: the one about the man who falls for a woman from the other side of the tracks.  Set in the fictional city of Rummidge in England's West Midlands in January 1986, Mr. Lodge's book sends sparks flying between Victor Wilcox, the hard-nosed managing director of the engineering firm J. Pringle & Sons, and Robyn Penrose, a young feminist professor at the city's university who specializes in the 19th-century industrial novel.  Both of these people are very good at their work, and both fear for the future of their respective places of employment in this belt-tightening era of cutbacks and recession.  But here the similarities between them end.  Vic Wilcox, married to an amiable goose of a wife and the reluctant provider for three contemptuous children, spends most of his waking hours trying to make Pringle's factory turn a profit.  A staunch capitalist, a tough manager and a firm believer in buying British-made products, Vic is somewhat mystified by the glittering university that sprawls near the city center.  To him the place is nothing more than an expensive youth hostel where nothing of any value is produced.  Robyn Penrose adores university life.  Her worst fear is that funding cuts will soon deprive her, a mere temporary lecturer, of her job.  Handsome and sure of her abilities, Robyn has been well trained in the most up-to-the-minute academic theories -- in semiotics, deconstruction and hermeneutics -- which have taught her, among much else, that capitalism is evil, that women are an irreversibly exploited minority, that language ultimately has no meaning at all and that love is a bourgeois invention.  Vic and Robyn are thrown together when Robyn is chosen to participate in a government-sponsored "Industry Year" project designed to improve relations between the university and the city, in which a professor "shadows" a senior manager in the manufacturing sector.  On her first Wednesday as Vic's "shadow," Robyn reports grudgingly for duty at Pringle's executive offices, and there the fireworks begin.  Vic makes no effort to hide his disgust at Robyn's total naivete about factory work, as it becomes apparent that this expert on the industrial novel does not seem to know exactly what a foundry is.  For her part, Robyn can't believe the horrible conditions under which Vic's employees labor, and manages to incite a nearly successful strike right under Vic's nose.  But as they spend more time together, Robyn gains respect for Vic's management skills, while Vic begins to listen, if not to agree with, Robyn's notions about capitalism and equal opportunity.  It is not long before Vic, who hides a sentimental soul, falls hard for Robyn.  He starts to read Tennyson and "Jane Eyre," and even tries to institute some shockingly liberal reforms at the factory.  Meanwhile, Robyn uses some of Vic's negotiating tactics in dealing with the knotted bureaucracy entangling her English department.  The point of "Nice Work" is to show up the contradictions that exist in both their personalities, contradictions that show them to be absurd as well as sympathetic figures.  We learn that Vic is capable of slavish infatuation as well as aggression and that, for all of Robyn's brave talk about bourgeois hegemony and repression, she really only wants what Vic wants: enough personal and professional security to go on working at what she does best.  Neither character's ideas change much in the end, but each acquires a bit of wisdom about how the world outside his or her own narrow sphere actually works.  Mr. Lodge is clearly more comfortable with the milieu of the university than that of the factory {he has been a professor and a literary critic as well as the author of two academic novels, "Changing Places" (1979) and "Small World" (1984), that share a few characters with "Nice Work"}.  But he manages to capture the essence of Vic's character type as well as Robyn's.  Robyn is a perfect feminist academic, down to her chunky-knit cardigan and rickety old Renault; Vic, too, is very well drawn as a terrier-like little man in ill-fitting suits with a powerful handshake and a glint in his eye.  The novel's plot, however, is not quite as strong as its characterization, turning creaky during crucial points, particularly when Vic rather suddenly begins to realize he's in love with Robyn.  And after Robyn instructs her class that, in Victorian industrial novels such as Elizabeth Gaskell's "Mary Barton" and Benjamin Disraeli's "Sybil," the only solutions offered to the problems of industrial capitalism were "a legacy, a marriage, emigration or death," Mr. Lodge rather too neatly offers three of these "solutions" as factors in Robyn's future at the novel's end.  Mr. Lodge's comedy of manners is far from being a modern equivalent of the strongly plotted, morally purposeful 19th-century industrial novel (also called the "Condition of England Novel").  The book's strength lies less in its depiction of external circumstances than in its probing of the internal workings of character -- on a person's strengths and weaknesses, integrity and hypocrisies.  Even when Mr. Lodge's rather mechanical plot seems to need oiling, his characters remain consistently multifaceted and poignant.  On the whole, "Nice Work" is just that.  ---  Ms. Rifkind is assistant managing editor at the New Criterion magazine.  Staar Surgical Co.'s founder and president, Thomas R. Waggoner, fired everyone on the company's board but himself.  Meanwhile, the board responded by announcing it had fired Mr. Waggoner.  Late yesterday, it was unclear which side had the upper hand.  The spat apparently arose when Mr. Waggoner thought Monrovia, Calif.-based Staar should enter into an agreement for technology licensing and equipment sales and leasing with Chiron Opthalmics Inc. of Irvine, Calif.  The board's four other members thought an alternative agreement with another company would be better.  So he dismissed the directors, one of whom is also the chief financial officer of Staar, and appointed a new, three-member board.  It consists of himself, his wife, and one vacancy.  A spokesman for Mr. Waggoner said the new board has signed a letter of intent with Chiron.  The spokesman said Mr. Waggoner controls Staar and a majority of the board appointments through holdings of all its Class A convertible preferred stock outstanding.  Mr. Waggoner and his wife own 25.1% of the company's 11.3 million common shares outstanding.  The Class A stock was issued to Mr. Waggoner in 1987 in exchange for an agreement for him to personally guarantee some $7 million in company debt.  A Waggoner release stated that the "dismissed directors have refused to relinquish their positions" and had "refused Waggoner physical access to Staar's offices."  The directors apparently insured this by having company locks changed.  Chiron had its own release, stating that "there have been conflicting announcements about management control of Staar Surgical" and that it "is studying the situation."  Meanwhile, the directors failed in their attempt yesterday afternoon to rescind the company's issuance of the Class A preferred stock to Mr. Waggoner.  A California Superior Court judge in Los Angeles denied their request for a temporary restraining order.  Mr. Waggoner and three directors couldn't be reached for comment.  Howard P. Silverman, a director, declined to comment.  An attorney for the directors also couldn't be reached.  But the Waggoner spokesman said Mr. Waggoner will seek a temporary restraining order tomorrow to gain access to the company's building and to proceed with the Chiron agreement.  Staar makes and markets products for small incision surgery, mainly for cataract procedures.  Earlier this year, it indefinitely laid off about 40 of its 99 workers.  Upjohn Co. will mention its anti-baldness drug by name for the first time in a new series of print advertisements that will begin appearing tomorrow.  The ads are the latest in the pharmaceutical company's consumer marketing efforts for Rogaine, which went on sale last fall with what analysts called disappointing results.  Previous ads encouraged men concerned about baldness to consult their physicians, but didn't mention Rogaine by name.  An Upjohn spokesman said the company now is adding the name because "it allows us to . . . make the connection between Rogaine and a legitimate treatment for hair loss."  The ads also will emphasize that Rogaine is the only prescription drug the Food and Drug Administration has approved as a stimulant for hair growth.  Last month, the agency banned the sale of nonprescription drugs that claim to combat baldness.  Full-page and half-page versions of the ads will appear in more than 30 newspapers.  Weekly national magazines will get a page-and-a-half version starting next week.  The ads are unusually long because they must include "full information about the safety and effectiveness of Rogaine," Upjohn said.  Ads that didn't mention the product name didn't have to include this information.  A new television advertisement featuring a dermatologist will be unveiled "soon," Upjohn said.  The television ads don't mention the Rogaine name.  All the ads were prepared by Klemtner Advertising, a unit of Saatchi & Saatchi Co. in New York.  The dollar continued to rally in the wake of U.S. economic data that distanced prospects for further credit easing.  Foreign-exchange traders said many in the market expected a correction in the dollar.  But when the U.S. currency failed to slip substantially, participants, fearful of being excluded from a sustained rally, snapped up the dollar.  Victor Polce, vice president and manager of corporate foreign exchange at Algemene Bank N.V. in New York, said Friday's rally caught the market off guard and left some major participants with short-dollar positions that needed covering.  "People are saying Friday came and went and, 'Hey, did you get that license plate,'" Mr. Polce said.  The 0.9% rise in July retail sales reported Friday, above general expectations of a 0.7% increase, helped cement the growing impression that economic activity is strong enough to alleviate pressures on the U.S. Federal Reserve to extend a recent series of cuts in the federal funds rate, traders said.  Federal funds are overnight loans of reserves among Fed member banks.  Combined with a 0.4% fall in the July producer price index Friday, retail-sales figures suggest the U.S. economy is on course for a much-touted "soft landing" -- where inflation declines but the economy musters continued growth.  Allen Sinai, chief economist at Boston Co. Economic Advisors, said that without the threat of an imminent recession, there is no need for further Fed easing.  Writing in the firm's latest market commentary, Mr. Sinai said, "With the economy now appearing on a 2%-plus track, the federal funds should hold at close to 9% for some time.  Other short-term interest rates will adjust to this fulcrum."  Traders said the New York Fed was widely rumored to be selling dollars through a few discreet banks at a few points in the day.  However, no one could confirm the reported actions.  Traders said the effect was minimal.  In late afternoon New York trading yesterday, the dollar was at 1.9485 marks, up from 1.9405 marks late Friday, and at 141.95 yen, up from 141.85 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5772, down from $1.5825.  In Tokyo Tuesday, the dollar opened for trading at 142.40 yen, up from Monday's Tokyo close of about 141.90 yen.  Dealers were divided Monday over the near-term prospects for the dollar, with some expecting the June U.S. merchandise trade report, scheduled for release Thursday, to confirm the market's enthusiasm and push the dollar to near 1.97 marks.  However, Lou Rappaport, chief dealer at Societe Generale in New York, predicted the ebullience will fade as the week progresses.  He said that after the dollar's sharp ascent, the market is too vulnerable to disappointment from economic data scheduled for release this week.  Mr. Rappaport predicted the dollar will correct to 1.9250 marks by the end of the week.  The dollar held Friday's gains in Asian trading, staying in a narrow range between 1.9315 marks and 1.9425 marks.  Dealers said repeated probes of dollar-buying interest near the lows uncovered active support, despite rumors of Bank of Japan intervention.  As European traders took over, activity diminished, partly because of holidays in some trading centers.  The dollar remained in its established range through most of the European day, and traders reported that apprehension of a repetition of Friday's concerted central-bank intervention chilled dollar buyers.  Nine Western European central banks, the New York Fed and the Bank of Canada sold dollars together to slow the currency's advance Friday.  When U.S. trading began, demand for the dollar livened up as participants who were waiting for a downward correction to buy the U.S. currency abandoned hopes for one.  The renewed interest pushed the dollar through an important technical level at 1.9450 marks in late afternoon New York trading, sparking a wave of stop-loss dollar buying that carried the U.S. currency to its intraday highs of 1.9515 marks and 142.18 yen in short order.  Traders said that of the major currencies, the yen had the smallest losses against the dollar, as Japan's currency continues to recover from a steep fall on recent political turmoil in that country.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $367.10 an ounce, up $1.90.  Estimated volume was a light 2.1 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Tuesday, gold was quoted at $364.45 an ounce.  Donnkenny Inc. was betting lightning would strike again when it put the name of Diane Von Furstenberg, the jet-set socialite who had a hot designer label in the 1970s, on a line of dresses earlier this year.  But the apparel maker found her name had lost its magic.  Women balked at spending $150 on her signature cotton knit wrap dresses when $100 versions were easy to find.  "It wasn't seen as an innovative style anymore," says a spokeswoman for Lord & Taylor, one of the retailers who carried the dress.  Donnkenny has stopped making the dresses and is ending its agreement with Ms. Von Furstenberg.  Despite such failures, though, many faded "designer" brands are trying to recapture their lost luster, believing that it's easier to build on a once-hot name than to start from scratch.  Companies that own labels such as Sasson and Gloria Vanderbilt, two of the most popular designer jeans brands from the early 1980s, and Halston, the former high-fashion giant who dressed stars like Liza Minelli, are hoping savvy marketing can revive the brand names.  If successful, the brands will begin to attract lucrative licensing contracts for handbags, scarves and other accessories.  Inspired by the resurrection of the Chanel label in recent seasons, fashion marketers believe that established brand names are golden.  That's why Gitano Group Inc. president Haim Dabah paid $15 million to buy the Gloria Vanderbilt trademark from Murjani Worldwide B.V. in December.  "It would take millions of dollars to create a great designer name on our own," he says.  Retail experts agree that the principal value of a well-known name is as an entree.  "Having the name is a tremendous head start to get distribution at the retail level," says Steven Most, a retail consultant who has helped companies revive brands such as Chinet paper plates through his firm, Turnaround Team.  But in order to win over consumers, a brand must update its styles and carve out a new image, overcoming its connection to fads that are long gone.  And companies have to figure out how to cater to consumers who are familiar with the brand, but older now.  "After 10 or 15 years have passed, you're already caught between a generational change," observes Jerry Welsh, a New York marketing consultant.  That means baby boomers who felt cool wearing tight $50 jeans 10 years ago might want less expensive, roomier jeans now.  "Now it's not the label as much as the product's attributes," notes Mr. Most.  But consumers are only half the problem.  The ritzy retailers who used to stock a prestige brand often dismiss the relaunched versions as has-beens.  For retailers on the lower-priced end, however, formerly hot brand names still have some allure.  "Names like Gloria Vanderbilt and Diane Von Furstenberg still have prestige, an added value for Wal-Mart or Lerner's," says Howard Davidowitz, a New York retail consultant.  Years ago, Sasson, with its "Ooo la la" slogan, was marketed as a saucy, French-inspired jean brand.  Today Sasson (now owned by Sasson Licensing Corp., which bought the trademark in 1988 from Sasson Jeans Inc., the label's originator, during Chapter 11 bankruptcy proceedings) is advertised as a wholesome and family-oriented product.  Sasson's magazine ads use actors such as Robert Wagner with their children.  Another Sasson campaign plugs an anti-drug slogan on its "Public Service" jeans collection.  For Gloria Vanderbilt jeans, which were originally aimed at more mature women, there was no big generation gap to bridge.  Gitano zeroed in on the storybook persona of Ms. Vanderbilt as an American heiress.  Scheduled to be introduced in department stores in November, the Gloria Vanderbilt "American Royal Classic Jean" collection has a loose-fitting jeans style called Santa Fe.  A large tag attached to the waistband weaves this fantasy: "Count the sailboats off the peninsula bobbing slightly in an early evening breeze in Gloria Vanderbilt's Newport."  It's too early to gauge whether Sasson and Gloria Vanderbilt will win back consumers, but retail buyers say both efforts are promising because neither brand aims at high-end shoppers.  And both brands actually are cheaper now than their prices of $35 to $40 a few years ago; Sasson's jeans now range from $28 to $34, Vanderbilt's are about $34.  One buyer at a major discount chain says Sasson and another relaunched jeans label, Brittania, are "back from the dead."  But he believes that their well-known labels had little to do with it.  "Consumers really don't care about that anymore . . . {they are succeeding} because they have lowered their prices and broadened their fashion assortment," he says.  By pitching jeans to discount chains and mass merchants, Sasson has lured a number of new licensees -- it now has 33, up from 11 a year ago.  One is the underwear maker Jockey International Inc., which signed on with Sasson.  "We wanted to grow with the K marts and Wal-Marts, and the stores at that level were telling us that they have a big interest in putting out a lot of items {jeans, shoes and accessories} under one trademark," says Howard Cooley, Jockey president.  But experience shows that once an upscale product puts its name on lower-priced goods, it can never go back up.  Revlon Group Inc., for example, is making a long-shot attempt to rekindle the Halston flame.  Revlon, owner of Halston Enterprises Inc., has visions of seeing Halston-label clothes back in better dress departments.  But marketers believe the company has a credibility problem after its six-year association with retailer J.C. Penney Co., which ended last year.  Halston, which currently retains a handful of menswear licensees, drummed up some hoopla on the women's side in May when it invited socialites and fashion reporters to view its made-to-order Halston couture collection at its Fifth Avenue showroom overlooking St. Patrick's Cathedral.  The show generated articles in Women's Wear Daily and the New York Times.  "We wouldn't see a possibility of {attracting} licensees without doing fashion shows," says Carl Epstein, Halston Enterprises managing director.  But because Halston isn't selling the couture clothes through retailers, industry watchers believe the label's value to potential licensees is virtually nil.  "I don't know how they expect to generate any publicity without selling their clothes through the conventional retail channels," says Mr. Davidowitz, who speculates that Halston was probably forced to sell its own clothes only at its Manhattan showroom because "most stores wouldn't touch that label now that it has been in Penney's."  So far, Halston has gained only one new licensee, Gruen Marketing Corp., to market Halston watches.  Ashton-Tate Corp. is expected to make a major operating announcement today, possibly including the layoff of as much as 20% of its work force, analysts close to the ailing software concern said.  The analysts estimated that as many as 300 of the company's roughly 1,500 employees may lose their jobs.  Other details weren't available.  A company spokeswoman declined to comment on the possible layoffs but confirmed that the company plans an announcement this morning.  Ashton-Tate has been plagued by operating losses and management turmoil.  Last month, it reported a $19.8 million second-quarter net loss as well as the resignation of its president and chief operating officer.  Once a software-industry star, the company has been buffeted by growing competition in its core database business.  Marine Midland Banks Inc.'s auto financing subsidiary and Jaguar PLC's U.S. unit said they will form a jointly-owned lease-financing company for Jaguar customers.  Marine Midland Automotive Financial Corp., New York, and Jaguar Cars Inc. plan to form Jaguar Leasing Corp., which will be based in Leonia, N.J.  It will serve the leasing needs of 140 Jaguar dealers in the U.S., who sell about 20,000 cars a year.  Marine Midland Automotive, based in Buffalo, N.Y., also will provide retail, wholesale and capital loans to Jaguar dealers and their customers under the name Jaguar Credit.  Marine Midland is part of the HongkongBank group.  A good-sized flock of geese used to inhabit Kemper Lakes Golf Course, but the place's proprietor caused them to be removed before hosting the PGA Championships last week.  Delicacy precludes my being specific about the problem the geese caused, but the golfing term "free drop" applies.  Never let it be said that the men who contested the sport's last 1989 "major" tournament are blind to ecological issues, though.  They spent their stay here making enough birdies to more than restore nature's balance.  Kemper Lakes' par was boiled, and the course might have been fried, too, if a couple of the lightning bolts that scorched the area during the festivities had landed a bit closer.  Just about everyone got in on the birdie-making act.  Arnold Palmer, who will turn 60 in a month (gasp]), woke up the echoes with a four-under-par 68 Thursday despite bogies on the last two holes.  Fatman Craig Stadler shot a course-record 64 on Friday.  Isao Aoki, a guest from Japan, had a 65 Saturday before storms halted play with most of the leaders still on the course.  In all, 152 sub-par rounds were recorded over the four days, easily a record for the venerable tourney.  The affair had some nonstatistical thrills, too, the positive kind for winner Payne Stewart and the gut-grinding type for the losers.  Stewart, one of those golfing tourists who has waxed wealthy without winning much, birdied five holes on the back nine Sunday -- including four of the last five -- to finish the day at 67 and the tournament at 276, 12 under par.  That was one stroke better than Mike Reid, Curtis Strange and Andy Bean.  Of the three runnersup, the guy who had it toughest was the skinny, bespectacled Reid, whose nickname of "Radar" reflects his reputation for driving accuracy.  He led the tourney from day one, when he shot a 66, until the 17th and penultimate hole Sunday, when he three-putted from about 15 feet to take a double-bogey five.  He putted for a birdie to tie on the par-four 18th, but his seven-footer slid past.  His last-round 74 cost him the three-shot lead with which he began the day.  "Where do you go around here to have a good cry?" said the likable -- seeming 35 year old in the press tent afterward.  Choking back sobs, he remarked, "It's only a game, right?"  When asked, he said that even the outlet of going home and kicking his dog wasn't available.  "My dog's just eight weeks old," he explained.  That Kemper Lakes, the layout on which the tourney was played, is young, too -- it opened in 1979 -- was much commented about during the fray.  So was the fact that it's a public facility, if that label can be properly applied to an outfit that charges $75 a round.  The assumption was that such a venue was unsuitable for an august event in a country-club sport.  And, in fact, the pampered pros did get a sample of public-course rigors, such as temper-testing five-hour rounds (don't ask me why) and a 5 a.m. wakeup call on Sunday to make the 7 a.m. tee-time decreed for the 39 players who hadn't completed their labors before Saturday's downpour.  The fair-minded, however, allowed that responsibility for the birdie barrage shouldn't lie totally with course, which measured a man-and-a-half sized 7,197 yards, contained enough water to apply for certification as the sixth Great Lake, and boasted greens so large that the average duffer would need a full 8-iron shot to clear them end to end.  "There was no wind to speak of, and the rain kept the course soft," said winner Stewart.  "Give us the opportunity to hit those mammoth greens, and put a putter in our hands, and we'll always light things up."  The blond Stewart, a 32-year-old Missourian transplanted to Orlando, Fla., has been close many times in these things, but before Sunday he had mostly cash to ease his pain.  He'd won some $3 million in nine years on the tour while capturing just four titles, none of them important.  Three weeks ago, he was a stroke off the British Open lead after three rounds only to sag to sixth place, and the next week he missed an eight-foot putt on the last hole that would have forced a playoff at the rich Buick Open.  His main claim to fame had less to do with his game than with his apparel.  He first distinguished himself from the polyester pack by donning knickers on the course, and this year concluded one of the strangest deals in sports by contracting with the National Football League to wear outfits featuring the colors of NFL teams.  He teed off Sunday in the cheer-grabbing blue and orange of the hometown Chicago Bears, six strokes behind leader Reid, and began the final nine five back.  But he birdied 11, 14, 15, 16 and 18, the latter on a dead-center 12-foot putt.  Reid played in the day's last threesome, three groups behind Stewart.  While his game Sunday lacked the precision of earlier rounds in which he posted scores of 66, 67 and 70, he gamely hung on with nerve-fraying par putts.  On the par-four, 469-yard 16th, though, he lost a stroke by hitting a rare poor drive into water, and his double bogey on 17, witnessed by Stewart on the scorer's tent TV set, did him in.  The killer was a three-foot second putt on the hole that lipped the cup.  "I rushed it," admitted Reid, whose need for accuracy is attested by his 184th-place ranking, among 185 listed pros, on the tour's driving-distance chart.  Stewart started the tourney poorly with a first-day 74, then improved to 66, 69 and 67.  The 74 was discouraging, he said, but experience told him to persist.  "I knew if I kept knocking, I'd win a big one someday," said he.  "But I'd be lying if I said I hadn't started wondering when."  Bean and Strange, the two other runners-up, also rallied late but never led.  Bean's 66 was Sunday's low round and marked the big man's comeback from elbow woes.  The fretful Strange won the last two U.S. Opens with long strings of pars, but his eight straight to close here weren't enough.  Palmer followed his 68 with a 74, 81 and 70 to finish 63rd.  Emil Esposito, the homeclub pro I wrote about Friday, had two 87s and missed the cut.  China's largest city remains uncowed by the throttling of the country's pro-democracy movement 10 weeks ago.  Both in the seedy 1930s-style business district and in overcrowded back alleys, a visitor finds that, unlike Beijing's subdued populace, many Shanghainese openly express resentment against the government and wonder where their lingering spirit of rebellion will lead them.  Outside a twin-screen downtown theater, scalpers are doing a thriving business for a sold-out afternoon movie.  Most posters for the day's offerings portray a young Deng Xiaoping on horseback in a striped jacket, leading his army into battle.  "Baise Uprising," named after a town in Guangxi province, has top billing, but it is hardly the main attraction.  The young men buying the scalpers' tickets aren't interested in the film about the Chinese Communist revolution.  They are here, a tout explains, to see an Italian thriller.  "Look, this is an action movie," one says. "'Baise Uprising' is a political movie.  No one wants to see it."  The disdain for propaganda and the willingness to state this openly are typical of this outspoken city of more than 12 million people.  A visitor walking Shanghai's hot, crowded streets hears strong opinions on plenty of other subjects as well: democracy, corruption, sky-high inflation, unemployment, even honest praise for the city fathers.  Barely 10 weeks after the Shanghai government used tough talk and worker brigades -- not tanks and automatic weapons -- to clear tens of thousands of young demonstrators from downtown streets, the city carries on as before.  Just about the only people here who don't want to talk these days are the foreign businessmen.  The city's foreign community is back in force, but traders and joint-venture managers have little desire to talk with a reporter.  Wary of angering the Chinese government, and concerned about attracting attention back home while China's crackdown remains in the news, most decline to be interviewed.  Shanghai's openness contrasts sharply with Beijing under martial law, where troops still guard key intersections around the clock.  A stranger wandering the capital's streets by day finds that nobody will speak his mind, and even at night the fears that spring from the early-June bloodshed choke most conversations.  "There was confrontation in Beijing, so the government dealt the people a hard blow," a university professor in Shanghai says.  "Here the blow wasn't so hard, so our spirit is good."  The government certainly struck some blows in Shanghai.  Demonstrators accused of violence in the streets have received long prison sentences, and there have been executions, including three young men shot to death for burning a train.  Arrests of student activists are rumored, though none has been announced.  Some well-known intellectuals have disappeared or been placed under house arrest.  The city's most outspoken newspaper, the World Economic Herald, was shut down.  But some here wonder how long Shanghai will remain quiet.  The college campuses are deserted, but students will begin returning next week for several days of political study.  The anger felt by other young people hasn't subsided.  The searing August heat brings this city out into the streets at night in search of relief.  In a neighborhood of narrow alleys near Shanghai's waterfront, hundreds of people relax in bamboo-slatted deck chairs by the curbside.  It is impossible to walk more than a few blocks without being invited to share cigarettes, beer or even a meal.  Discontented young men clad in shorts and sandals gather at every stop to air the same complaints over and over.  "Shanghai is no good," one declares loudly.  "There's no freedom.  There's no democracy.  There are no jobs.  Our work is what we can find in the streets, what we can split among ourselves."  After the young men move on, a 35-year-old man named Liu, who works as a government researcher, leans back in his chair and sighs.  "They are unhappy because they have no work," he says.  "There's a great distance here between the unemployed and the government."  A constant refrain to Shanghai life is that inflation -- currently in double digits -- has placed many goods out of reach.  In a quiet tree-lined street that once housed this city's European elite before the revolution, the proprietor of a small bar ticks off the things that are no longer easily affordable for workers: fish, meat, chicken and eggs.  "You used to be able to buy everything cheap, even though you made less money," she says.  "Now you can't."  Shanghai witnessed several large pro-democracy demonstrations in May, though none came near the size of the million-strong rallies that filled Beijing's Tiananmen Square.  After the killings in Beijing, young demonstrators in Shanghai hijacked buses and trucks and paralyzed the city for several days before dispersing.  Unlike in Beijing, where people of all ages joined the movement, Shanghai's protesters were primarily young people.  Workers with jobs and families largely stayed on the sidelines.  "It's like this," says a 26-year-old taxi driver, who owns his own dilapidated Eastern European-made cab.  "If you had money, you didn't participate.  If you had no money, you were the movement.  Those people with no place in society were there.  Me?  I was there, but I only watched.  I have a wife."  The Shanghai government took advantage of this hesitancy to end the blockades after about five days.  Mayor Zhu Rongji went on television on June 8 to announce that the city government had never considered sending in the army and declared it was time to go back to work.  Late that night, the government dispatched tens of thousands of factory workers to clear the streets.  Some analysts believe that Shanghai's party secretary, Jiang Zemin, was promoted later that month to general-secretary of the Chinese Communist Party because of the effective way the Shanghai rebellion was quelled.  But it is Mayor Zhu who has won respect in the streets.  His approach "was very pragmatic, and Shanghai people respond to pragmatism," a Western diplomat says.  "He came out looking great."  In effect, the mayor, who earlier this month also was appointed general-secretary of the party in Shanghai, bought the government time.  Older Shanghainese recognize that many of China's problems can't be easily solved, yet everyone is demanding results soon.  They most want results from the government in dealing with official corruption.  Popular resentment can only grow if the government fails to tackle the problem.  Some Shanghai residents looked skeptically upon the student movement's demands for democracy, believing that the Communist Party was little inclined to loosen the reins.  But the demands for an end to corruption struck a common chord because of the widespread resentment against officials at all levels who engage in profiteering and influence-peddling.  "Party officials have power, so they can do the things they want," says a 43-year-old man, who sympathized with the students but didn't join them.  "We working people have no power, so there's nothing we can do.  If the government doesn't deal with corruption, then we'll be upset."  The broadest civil-rights bill in 25 years is moving through Congress.  But unlike most other such measures, which have regularly stirred up hornet's nests of controversy, this one is roaring through largely intact.  It is the Americans With Disabilities Act, which would give protection to the disabled comparable to that provided by law for minorities, women and others.  "This is the last great step -- to open up the doors to society for people with disabilities," says Sen. James Jeffords (R., Vt.).  The measure's astonishingly brief journey through the Washington process -- it was introduced just three months ago -- has occurred because of a rare display of bipartisanship.  Though some, especially in the small-business sector, remain concerned about the bill's economic impact, it's clear the political momentum behind it is all but unstoppable.  The Senate Labor Committee approved it 16-0 after White House Chief of Staff John Sununu and committee Chairman Edward Kennedy (D., Mass.) hammered out some last-minute language.  "It's like standing in front of a herd of stampeding cattle," complains John Motley, chief lobbyist for the National Federation of Independent Business, which, along with the National Association of Manufacturers and the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, has some objections to the bill but is reluctant to oppose it outright.  Mr. Motley's group is, he says, "scared to death" by the measure, seeing "some things we simply cannot let go unchallenged."  But he adds, "Let's face it -- it's an extremely difficult bill to oppose."  The measure broadly bans discrimination against anyone with a serious mental or physical impairment.  All but very small employers would have to make "reasonable" accommodations to the limitations of the disabled in hiring and working conditions, though the bill also says companies needn't incur "undue hardship" in doing this -- language that seems ultimately headed for judicial interpretation.  Most new or renovated buildings, as well as buses, trains and many rail-transit stations, would be required to provide access to the disabled.  Telephone companies would have to offer special electronic type-to-voice relay methods to help deaf persons use the phone systems.  No state or local government program would be allowed to discriminate against the handicapped.  Last spring, some White House officials -- including Mr. Sununu, budget chief Richard Darman and domestic-policy adviser Roger Porter -- headed off a quick presidential endorsement of the measure, raising questions about its cost and scope.  But the bill has also had powerful friends in the White House from the start, such as presidential counsel Boyden Gray.  And most important, it's been clear from the start that President Bush himself strongly supports the legislative effort -- a fact that people on both sides of the issue say has been the key to its success.  "We could have lost this without the president," says former California Democratic Rep. Tony Coelho, who's very active in the disabled-rights movement.  "He was the glue on this issue -- we always could count on him."  Two months ago, on his last day in Congress, Mr. Coelho called the president and asked him for "one favor" -- support for the bill.  Granting the favor was easy, Mr. Bush answered, because he was for it anyway.  A week later, Attorney General Richard Thornburgh went to Congress to give the bill a ringing administration endorsement.  There are still legislative issues to be resolved on the Senate floor and among four House committees before the bill reaches the House floor.  Business groups, for example, are unhappy at provisions requiring bus companies to install wheelchair lifts and handicapped toilets in new over-the-road buses.  The groups also criticize the lack of a blanket small-business exemption for public accommodations.  But many other business objections have already been dealt with in the White House-Senate negotiations, pretty much eliminating the chances that the measure could yet be derailed.  The concept of extending disabled rights hasn't always been so popular.  President Reagan named a 15-member National Council on the Disabled, but then didn't endorse the tough recommendations the panel came up with.  And Sen. Orrin Hatch of Utah, the ranking GOP member on the Labor Committee, sharply opposed a measure written by Iowa Democrat Tom Harkin, chairman of the panel's subcommittee on the handicapped.  Mr. Hatch said the Harkin measure contained too many onerous provisions.  But as some of those provisions were eliminated or eased -- by dropping elevator requirements for smaller buildings, for example, and giving bus companies more time to comply -- Mr. Hatch climbed on board as one of the bill's 55 Senate co-sponsors.  Committee action on the bill was postponed three times while Messrs.  Sununu, Kennedy, Thornburgh and Harkin, along with Transportation Secretary Samuel Skinner, negotiated on sticking points.  The result is a bill that is much less costly than earlier attempts at disabled-rights legislation.  The new bill lacks earlier provisions for ambitious legal remedies like the right to request jury trials and punitive damages -- the kind of thing that "just drives employers up the wall," says John Tysse, vice president of the Labor Policy Association, a group of big-company personnel chiefs.  Robert Silverstein, staff director and chief counsel for Sen. Harkin's subcommittee, says that to ensure broad support for the measure, "we've jumped through hoop after hoop to satisfy the business community," such as allowing various loopholes for undue hardship.  In return, disability organizations managed to keep in the bill some rather stringent requirements for disabled access to public accommodations.  A broad range of establishments is covered -- not just restaurants, hotels, theaters and gas stations, but also doctors' offices, grocery stores, zoos and day-care centers.  "Each side feels they got slightly the better of the bargain, which is what you want," says a White House official.  ---  @ Major Provisions Of the Americans With Disabilities Act  -- Discrimination in hiring, firing, or work conditions against a disabled person qualified for a job would be banned, but very small employers are exempt.  -- Policies of public places such as restaurants, hotels, grocery stores and museums would have to permit access by the disabled.  New and altered buildings must have wheelchair ramps or other means for access and use.  -- New buses, some new rail cars and some stations are to be accessible.  Transit lines must offer special vehicles for those who cannot use regular buses.  -- Telephone systems must provide electronic-typing links to voice service for deaf persons.  A group of Winners Corp. minority shareholders, angered by the Nashville, Tenn., company's plan to sell its Mrs. Winners restaurant unit, is taking the company to court.  Renaissance Group Inc., an Atlanta-based investment concern that holds 2.5% of Winners common, filed papers in chancery court in Franklin, Tenn., yesterday seeking a list of Winners shareholders.  Rick Mortimer, Renaissance Group president, said he wants to contact the other holders "to determine whether they're interested in getting new management."  In May, Winners said it agreed to sell its Mrs. Winners unit to RTM Inc. for about $30 million in cash plus the assumption of certain lease obligations.  Mr. Mortimer termed the price "ridiculous" and accused Winners management of trying to "walk over the stockholders totally."  Lonnie J. Stout, Winners president and chief executive officer, said the Renaissance Group isn't a shareholder and therefore isn't entitled to the list of holders.  In response, Mr. Mortimer said Renaissance owned 74,600 shares of Winners on June 20, the record date for Friday's special meeting to consider the sale of Mrs. Winners.  He said the group currently owns 102,000 shares.  The Tennessee court set a hearing on the matter for Wednesday.  Bond prices tumbled and interest rates surged yesterday as massive selling shook the bond market.  The Treasury's new benchmark 30-year bond fell nearly 1 1/2 points, or about $15 for each $1,000 face amount.  The yield on the new bonds, which were auctioned by the Treasury Thursday, rose to 8.24%.  That was the highest closing yield for a benchmark 30-year bond since late June.  Yesterday's declines were slightly higher than on Friday when long-term bonds fell as much as 1 3/8 points.  "The market just got trashed," said Joseph Liro, a vice president and money market economist at S.G. Warburg Securities & Co. Joel Marver, chief fixed-income analyst at Technical Data Global Markets Group said, "The mood is ugly."  Economists said the selling spree began in the Eurodollar securities futures pit and quickly spread to the cash market.  Traders said the selling picked up momentum when September U.S. bond futures fell below 96 20/32, which had been a recent low established in late June.  September bond futures fell about one point to settle at 96 1/32.  Bond market analysts attribute the sell-off to a growing realization that the economy is not weak enough to warrant further easing by the Federal Reserve.  Investors who "bought fixed-income securities on expectations of a recession are selling those securities as a fear of a recession fades away," said Mr. Liro.  Meanwhile, short-term interest rates rose at the government's weekly Treasury bill auction.  The average discount rate on new three-month Treasury bills was 8.01%, while the rate on new six-month bills was 7.83%.  Those rates are much higher than at last week's auction when the average discount rate was 7.94% for three-month bills and 7.70% for six-month bills.  The rate on three-month bills was the highest since the average rate of 8.09% at the auction on July 24, while the rate on the six-month bills was the highest since 8.08% at the auction on June 19.  Also contributing to the weak tone in the market was the prospect of more new supply after last week's five auctions totaling $56.7 billion of new bills, notes and bonds.  "The rub for the market is the continuing amount of supply," said Mr. Marver.  The total $56.7 billion of new Treasury securities sold last week may have been a one-week record, he added.  This week, the Treasury will be unveiling details of coming note auctions.  Tomorrow, for example, the Treasury will announce the size of two-year and five-year note auctions that will be held next week.  Analysts expect the size of the twoyear sale to be increased by $250 million and the five-year note sale to be increased by $500 million from the last similar auctions to help finance the thrift industry bailout.  The Treasury last sold $9 billion of two-year notes on July 26 and sold $7.5 billion of five-year notes May 25.  Also ahead this week is a new supply of agency issues.  The Federal Home Loan Banks said yesterday that they will sell $2.88 billion of bonds in a four-part offering today.  The offering will consist of $725 million of oneyear bonds, $1.19 billion of two-year bonds, $595 million of five-year bonds and $375 million of 10-year bonds.  Treasury Securities  Treasury securities moved sharply lower as interest rates jumped.  The new benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at about 98 22/32, down more than 1 1/2 points from Friday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted late at 98 10/32 to yield 8.23%, compared with 99 14/32 to yield 8.065% on Friday.  Here are details of yesterday's Treasury bill auction:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  The percentage rates are calculated on a 360-day year, while the coupon-equivalent yield is based on a 365-day year.  @ 13-Week 26-Week  @ Applications ......... $28,353,755,000 $20,874,320,000  @ Accepted bids ........ $7,236,770,000 $7,207,000,000  @ Accepted at low price 23% 56%  @ Accepted noncompet'ly $1,324,895,000 $1,166,595,000  @ Average price (Rate) 97.975 (8.01%) 96.042 (7.83%)  @ High price (Rate) ..... 97.978 (8.00%) 96.067 (7.78%)  @ Low price (Rate) ...... 97.973 (8.02%) 96.031 (7.85%)  @ Coupon equivalent ..... 8.29% 8.26%  Both issues are dated Aug. 17.  The 13-week bills mature Nov. 16, and the 26-week bills mature Feb. 15, 1990.  Corporate, Other Issues  Corporate bonds outperformed Treasurys and ended 1/2 to 3/4 point lower.  "Corporates sometimes go through the floor when the bottom falls out as it did today in the government market, but most corporate dealers were very cautious after Friday's volatility and so were pretty well hedged," one trader said.  In the new issue market, activity centered on several deals planned for offering this week.  A $723 million offering by Israel via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. is due in the next few days.  Details on the structure of the issue are still being finalized.  The triple-A-rated offering of government trust certificates will be the final part of a refinancing of military debt by Israel.  In September, Israel tapped the market with a $2.5 billion issue of government trust certificates, and in November it made a $2.25 billion offering.  The government trust certificates are 90%-backed by the U.S. government.  The remaining 10% is backed by U.S. government securities owned by Israel.  Municipals  Sharply lower Treasury prices and a wave of dealer selling sent municipals down in afternoon dealings, with active dollar bonds ending off 3/8 to 5/8 point.  New issues, the largest of which were priced in the morning when the market was little changed on the day, were off to a mixed start.  An insured $210.6 million issue from the Southeastern Public Service Authority of Virginia was apparently oversubscribed at the preliminary pricing levels.  Separately, investors got further help in evaluating the coming Washington Public Power Supply System projects 1 and 3 refunding bond issue in the form of a detailed, six-page report from Fitch Investor Service Inc.  The agency rated the $450 million of bonds double-A-minus.  The issue, tentatively scheduled for pricing Aug. 21, will be WPPSS's first since it defaulted on $2.25 billion of projects 4 and 5 debt in 1983.  In a page-long section called "Legal Conclusions," the report stated, "Fitch believes that the risk that legal concerns associated with the Project 4 and 5 bonds will impair timely payment on the 1989 A Bonds is remote."  Moody's Investors Service Inc.'s rating on the coming bonds is single-A, and Standard & Poor's Corp.'s is double-A-minus.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities fell 1/2 to 18/32 point but held up better than intermediate Treasurys because of a rumor that the implementation of a new thrift regulation might be postponed.  The regulation, scheduled to go into effect in late August, would make it much more difficult for thrifts to trade mortgage securities held in their portfolios.  Under the rule, thrifts seeking liberal accounting treatment for a mortgage asset would have to pledge to hold the asset in an investment account until maturity.  Any asset sale from this account prior to maturity would jeopardize the liberal accounting rules and potentially force strict accounting treatment for the entire investment portfolio.  Faced with this regulation, thrifts were actively selling mortgage securities during the past two weeks to accomplish portfolio restructurings, market participants said.  These sales were in addition to the huge sales of mortgage securities by insolvent institutions after the passage of thrift bailout legislation.  A spokesman for the Office of Thrift Supervision, the successor to the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, had no comment on the market talk.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for September delivery fell 18/32 to 96 26/32.  The yield was 9.59% to a 12-year average life assumption, as the spread above the 10-year Treasury note tightened 0.07 percentage point to 1.36 percentage points.  Foreign Bonds  Japanese government bond prices weakened late in the day, reacting to the dollar's surge against the yen since Friday's U.S. producer price index and retail sales releases.  The benchmark No. 111 4.6% issue due 1998 closed at 96.92 to yield 5.105%.  In Britain, prices of government bonds ended slightly higher but off session peaks, as the pound eased in late dealings.  Among benchmarks, the Treasury's 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 rose 3/32 to 116 to yield 9.59%, while the Treasury's 12% notes due 1995 rose 1/32 to 106 19/32 to yield 10.36%.  BroadBeach Associates Inc., which late last week proposed to acquire McGill Manufacturing Co. for $62 a share, said it boosted its stake in the Valparaiso, Ind., ball-bearing maker to 7% from 5.1%.  McGill's share price soared $5.75 in national over-the-counter trading yesterday, to close at $57, as investors reacted to BroadBeach's proposal.  The Los Angeles securities firm disclosed its bid for a "friendly" buy-out after the market closed Friday.  The proposal values McGill at $89.9 million.  BroadBeach, in a Securities and Exchange Commission filing yesterday, said it bought 27,495 McGill shares Friday at $50.50 each, increasing its total holding to 101,295 shares.  Late yesterday, McGill officials couldn't be reached for comment.  Cineplex Odeon Corp. reported a second-quarter loss of $38.7 million, but independent directors say the results, lower than analysts' estimates, aren't likely to affect the search for a buyer for the theater-chain operator.  In the year-ago quarter, Cineplex had net income of $7.1 million, or 15 cents a share.  Quarter revenue was $149.1 million, down 2.4% from $152.7 million in the previous-year period.  Jack Richer, spokesman for a group of directors soliciting offers for Cineplex, said the bulk of the losses were be attributed to discontinued operations, including a $16.5 million loss on the closing of its U.S. distribution operations.  "Any interested bidders are looking forward; they're not concerned with losses on discontinued operations that we're not selling," Mr. Richer said.  He said the first bids for Cineplex aren't likely to emerge for another two weeks.  Mr. Richer said the losses are also in part because of a dispute, now resolved, between Cineplex and one of its major distributors over film-distribution practices.  The dispute, with Walt Disney Co., resulted in Cineplex losing several profitable films to rival theater chains during the past three quarters, analysts said.  "This is basically a case of clearing up the house before the auction takes place," said one New York-based analyst.  "It doesn't change the fact that there will be an auction, and people who will bid were probably aware of this data anyway."  Other analysts point to the absence of major asset sales in Cineplex's second quarter.  In the fourth quarter of 1988 Cineplex had a gain of $47.7 million from the sale of a 49% stake in its Film House Group Inc. unit.  In the first quarter of 1989, it reported an additional gain of $47.5 million from the sale of its interest in the Universal Studios Florida theme park.  Cineplex said it expects to return to profitability in the third quarter, thanks to several popular and profitable films its theaters are showing.  Some analysts said they still expect the company to report a loss on operations, however.  In the current quarter, Cineplex reported write-downs on some assets held for sale, and a loss on some investments.  These nonrecurring charges totaled $23.6 million, in addition to the $16.5 million loss on the U.S. distribution operations.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Cineplex closed at $12.125 a share, up 12.5 cents.  The news division of National Broadcasting Co. reconfigured certain bureaus by closing its Paris office and bolstering its operations in the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe.  Ted Elbert was named bureau chief in Moscow, which had been managed from London.  Mr. Elbert had been chief of the Paris bureau.  The network, a unit of General Electric Co., also said it plans to open a bureau in Dallas.  NBC News will open bureaus in Budapest, Hungary's capital, and in Barcelona, Spain.  The Barcelona operation is being opened partly in conjunction with the network's scheduled broadcast of the summer Olympic Games there in 1992.  In addition to broadcasting, Fairfield, Conn.-based GE has interests in industrial and plastics products, financial services, aircraft engines and lighting.  One employee of Cubic Corp. was acquitted and another faces a retrial on charges that they took part in the alleged falsification of records on a U.S. Army mine-detector contract.  Cubic, based in San Diego, is a high-technology concern.  William B. Bauder, a 56-year-old engineer and the contract's program manager, was acquitted on all counts.  Dennis B. Fink, 40, is scheduled for a retrial after the jury failed to vote unanimously to acquit or convict the engineer on 21 counts, including conspiracy to defraud the government and submitting false records.  The two engineers were indicted by a federal grand jury in March 1988 after an investigation that began in 1984.  Last year, Cubic paid the federal government about $7.3 million to settle claims that it fraudulently tested the hand-held mine detectors it refurbished for the Navy.  The diminishing likelihood of the Federal Reserve pushing interest rates lower tripped up bond prices, which in turn caused stock prices to stumble.  Rising interest rates boosted the dollar.  Long-term Treasury bonds fell sharply in a late sell-off.  That sparked program selling in the stock market, sending the Dow Jones Industrial Average down more than 18 points at one point.  The average closed at 2677.92, off 6.07, in light trading.  Currency traders, sensing an upturn in U.S. interest rates, bid the dollar higher against both the mark and the yen.  Analysts said the bond market's retreat started in the futures pits in Chicago and quickly spread to the cash market.  Some traders said the drop in debt futures reflected technical factors, but it also is becoming clear that interest rates are unlikely to move lower anytime soon.  Last week's economic data showed a healthier-than-expected economy and not much of a threat from inflation.  Reports this week are expected to support that view.  Economists are looking for industrial production, which will be reported tomorrow, to be up about 0.3% for July.  The consumer price index, due Friday, is expected to show a modest 0.2% July rise.  Bond investors had bid prices higher in recent weeks on the assumption that a slowing economy would force the Federal Reserve to continue easing monetary policy to prevent a recession.  But as fears of a recession in the near future fade, so does the Fed's incentive to ease.  Although the bond market's decline was cited as the immediate reason for lower stock prices, analysts are increasingly looking for a pullback anyway after the latest stock rally.  "The stock market has had a fantastic move, and what has happened is that the averages have gotten well ahead of their own 30-week moving averages," said Arnold Kaufman, editor of Standard & Poor's Outlook.  "Typically when that happens, you need a catch-up period for digestion."  Currency traders are counting on relatively strong economic data this week to give a boost to U.S. interest rates, and therefore to dollar investments.  They are discounting warnings by Budget Director Richard Darman, who said Sunday that the Fed will need to loosen credit further to avoid a recession.  "The interest rate factor is definitely still in play" as a driving force of foreign exchange dealings, said William O'Neill, futures research director at Elders Futures Inc.  In major market activity:  Stock prices retreated in light trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 142 million shares.  Declining issues on the Big Board were ahead of gainers, 986-473.  Bond prices tumbled.  The Treasury's new benchmark 30-year bond lost about 1 1/2 points, or $15 for each $1,000 face amount.  The yield on the issue climbed to 8.24%.  The dollar rose against most other major currencies.  In late New York trading, the dollar was quoted at 1.9485 marks and 141.95 yen, compared with 1.9405 marks and 141.85 yen late Friday.  Backstage at the Tanglewood Music Shed, Charles Dutoit downs a glass of Evian and reminisces about his studies here 30 years ago, when Charles Munch was the Boston Symphony Orchestra's music director.  "I remember when I first saw Munch walking with Pierre Monteux," recalls the tall, Swiss-French maestro, who had a scholarship to the Tanglewood Music Center at that time.  "I never thought I would conduct from the same podium as they did."  Today, Mr. Dutoit, at 52 years of age, is one of the most popular guest conductors around, appearing regularly with the Boston Symphony Orchestra, the Philadelphia Orchestra, the New York Philharmonic and the Amsterdam Concertgebouw.  That means he's on everyone's short list of candidates for the music directorship of the New York Philharmonic after Zubin Mehta departs in May 1991.  A dark-haired, urbane man who has transformed the Montreal Symphony from a third-rate ensemble into a world-class orchestra, he's noted for the characteristically French blend of transparency and sensuousness he brings to his performances.  He also has the kind of personal mystique that looms increasingly large in classical-music careers these days.  His second wife was the brilliant, willful Argentine pianist Martha Argerich.  And this reputed Casanova type also lived with the svelte Korean violinist Kyung Wha Chung before marrying Marie-Josee Drouin, economist and executive director of a leading Canadian think tank.  Whether Mr. Dutoit has the right stuff for the New York Philharmonic is another matter.  Certainly he's proved his ability to inspire a demoralized orchestra to new heights -- something the Philharmonic sorely needs.  But Metropolitan Opera maestro James Levine, a leading contender for the Berlin Philharmonic vacancy created by Herbert von Karajan's retirement shortly before his death, is better equipped temperamentally to deal with the Philharmonic's potentially recalcitrant musicians.  The St. Louis Symphony's Leonard Slatkin has far more experience conducting contemporary American music.  The British maestro Colin Davis, who reportedly declined the post the last time around, is considered a more profound interpreter.  By contrast, Mr. Dutoit, who owns a black Toyota with his name inscribed in gold on a rear window, is more often concerned with style and sound than substance.  Still, his musical strengths are considerable, as was evident when he led the Boston Symphony in two programs at Tanglewood recently.  Schubert's youthful First Symphony had a Mozartean fluidity and grace, accentuated by a reduction of the strings to near-Classical proportions.  The same composer's rarely performed "Mass No. 6 in E-flat," was as expressive as it could be.  Written a month before his death, it is a curious mixture of gut-wrenching beauty (the Kyrie and Agnus Dei) and bland, conservatively set text.  In Beethoven's "Missa Solemnis," the concluding cries of "Pacem" are a demand; in Schubert's E-flat Mass, the grim "Dona nobis pacem" (Give us peace) sounds more like a skeptic's plea.  The highlight of the weekend, however, was the complete version of Stravinsky's "Firebird," which the maestro will repeat at Carnegie Hall in October.  Mr. Dutoit's affinity for Stravinsky is obvious in his uninhibited "Rite of Spring" for London Records.  His "Firebird" at Tanglewood had the same masterful pacing, and the shimmering string tone he coaxed from the orchestra was spellbinding.  The creation of a luminous, well-balanced sound was one of Mr. Dutoit's first priorities when he became music director of the Montreal Symphony in 1977.  "As is usually the case in America," he declares in lightly accented English, "the brass and percussion played too loud.  And therefore the strings have to dig in so much in order to survive.  I prefer a more relaxed sound, not so edgy."  He also endeavored to give them a better understanding of appropriate historical style.  "Unfortunately," he complains, "too many ensembles today have a middle-of-the-road style.  It's "passe-partout," all-purpose. . . .  Many orchestras play much of the repertoire with a thick, heavy sound.  That's fine for Wagner and other late-19th-century music, but when they perform Beethoven or Berlioz they should never use the same sound.  In rehearsal, I often ask the musicians to imagine a tennis game.  If you throw your ball heavily on the court and the ball does not bounce back up, it just goes bahhh," he says, making a low, dull grunt.  "Then the sound will be like that when it should be bumm" -- he hums a light, airy tone.  Mr. Dutoit studied violin and viola at conservatories in Geneva and his native Lausanne.  If necessary, he can tell the strings exactly what he wants in terms of "how much bow to use in a piano or a forte, how much more air I need so the sound has more flexibility."  On other occasions, he may draw an analogy to art or literature to evoke the emotion he seeks in a performance.  "But you don't talk too much to an orchestra," he quickly adds.  "What I use the most is conducting technique itself.  If you want the most floating, transparent sound, and you beat time like a schoolmaster, you will not get it."  During Mr. Dutoit's tenure in Montreal, the orchestra won its first recording contract, an exclusive with London.  It also inaugurated its annual appearances at Carnegie Hall and began world-wide touring.  The affable maestro's success in this boosted his status on the guest-conducting circuit.  Last December, he made his Metropolitan Opera debut leading "The Tales of Hoffmann"; he returns this winter to do "Samson and Delilah" and "Faust."  In 1990, he becomes artistic director and principal conductor of the Philadelphia Orchestra's summer season at the Mann Music Center and the Saratoga Performing Arts Festival.  He'll also be back this season in Boston and New York.  Should he succeed Mr. Mehta at the Philharmonic, it will be the second time he has followed in that conductor's footsteps: Mr. Mehta was music director of the Montreal Symphony from 1961 to 1967, and his brother, Zarin Mehta, currently manages the Canadian orchestra.  Moreover, both Mr. Dutoit and Zubin Mehta have made hit recordings of Ravel's "Bolero."  There the connection ends.  If the Philharmonic does hire Mr. Dutoit, New York audiences will be getting a welcome year-round exposure to the obvious commitment and pleasure he brings to his podium appearances.  "When you start the Verdi 'Requiem,'" he enthuses, "you see this big orchestra and chorus in front of you, you give the downbeat and this small A-minor chord begins an hour-and-a-half of incredible music.  It's a wonderful feeling."  ---  Ms. Jepson is a free-lance writer in New York.  A group that includes the San Francisco-based investment banking firm of Volpe & Covington said it holds a 5.67% stake in Western Micro Technology Inc.'s common shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, the group said it holds 158,900 Western Micro common shares, all acquired from January through the end of July for about $5.50 to $7.625 each.  The purchases were made for investment purposes, the group said in its filing.  Executives at Western Micro, Saratoga, Calif., a distributor of semiconductor parts, couldn't be reached for comment.  Polish Prime Minister Czeslaw Kiszczak ended his bid to form a Communist-dominated government, a move that U.S. analysts said could be a decisive step toward ending the Communist monopoly on political power there.  In an effort to resolve a burgeoning domestic crisis, Mr. Kiszczak offered the task of forming a government to the leader of the small United Peasant Party, which, along with another fringe party, holds the balance of power between the Communists and the once-outlawed Solidarity labor union in Poland's new Parliament.  U.S. analysts say a successful effort by the United Peasant Party to form a coalition government, which would include Communists in key slots, would represent an unprecedented, partial ceding of political power by an East-bloc Communist regime and would pave the way for promised free elections in four years.  The Polish government's move was seen by some in Warsaw as an effort to block Solidarity from trying to form a government without the Communists.  The Associated Press reported that Sen. Jaroslaw Kaczynski, Solidarity leader Lech Walesa's envoy to coalition talks, said that the independent trade-union movement wouldn't abandon its efforts to form a government.  The news agency quoted Solidarity lawmaker Henryk Wujec as calling the Polish government's offer to the United Peasant Party "an idiotic move" and in all likelihood, one unacceptable to Mr. Walesa.  U.S. officials say the move is likely to bring Solidarity into the government as a major partner.  That probably would result in attempts to slow the pace of economic reforms, a change that Solidarity favors.  The sudden lifting of the lid on food prices Aug. 1 resulted in price rises of as much as 500% that have produced growing public anger and helped spawn the current crisis.  The Soviets, who recently have accused Mr. Walesa of provoking the crisis by refusing to join a Communist-led government, are expected to accept the latest move.  "They probably knew in advance and didn't block it," a State Department official said.  "Moscow will accept this as long as Communists keep the key ministries," he added.  Last week, Mr. Walesa proposed that the United Peasant Party and another small party, the Democratic Party, join Solidarity to form a non-Communist coalition.  Analysts said there is a growing perception among Polish and Soviet officials that Mr. Walesa's proposal violated the spirit of the Roundtable Agreement, the pact signed by Solidarity and the Communist government earlier this year legalizing the trade union and calling for Poland's first free elections since World War II. Mr. Kiszczak said the proposal hampered his efforts to form a government; Moscow echoed the criticism.  Mr. Kiszczak's decision to abandon his effort to form a government "will defuse what was becoming a very tense situation," said the State Department official.  But the decision also could present a moment of truth for Solidarity.  If it enters the government, Solidarity must decide whether to remain a trade union or become a broader political party.  Solidarity has been in the vanguard of political liberalization in Poland, but reforming Warsaw's stagnant economy requires harsh measures that would translate into job losses and declining living standards that would hit the trade union's members the hardest.  U.S. analysts expect that in a new coalition government such key ministries as defense, interior and foreign affairs would be held by Communist ministers.  Reuter reported that Solidarity, the United Peasant Party and the Democratic Party were on the verge of agreeing how to distribute ministries.  The news agency quoted a United Peasant Party official as saying Solidarity might have the prime minister's slot.  In last June's elections, Solidarity-backed candidates won all 161 seats open to them in the 460-member Sejm, or parliament.  Solidarity also swept 99 of 100 seats in a newly created senate.  The senate advises the Sejm and has certain veto powers.  The Communists control about 37% of the Parliament and Solidarity about 35%.  The non-Communist United Peasant and Democratic parties together control about 22% of the seats.  The Roundtable Agreement guaranteed the Communists a certain proportion of seats, but the government agreed that subsequent elections will be more democratic.  Gen. Wojciech Jaruzelski, the Communist leader, was elected president of Poland by a narrow margin and appointed Mr. Kiszczak earlier this month to form a government.  When Mr. Kiszczak gave up the effort, he asked Roman Malinowski, leader of the United Peasant Party, to form a government "in which there would be representatives of all forces represented at the parliament," he said in a statement.  Rising interest rates tripped the stock market.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average tumbled 6.07 to 2677.92.  But broader barometers showed the selling spread far beyond the big stocks.  Standard & Poor's 500-stock index skidded 1.68 to 343.06-a loss equivalent to a 12-point drop in the Dow industrials.  Among other measures, the Dow Jones Equity Market Index slipped 1.69 to 322.33 and the New York Stock Exchange composite index eased 0.90 to 191.37.  On the Big Board, declining stocks led advancing ones, 986 to 473.  Some 142,010,000 shares traded, the lightest volume since Monday, July 24.  Traders said sluggish trading may reflect some hesitation ahead of this week's round of major economic reports, which include data on July industrial production and consumer prices and the trade deficit in June.  The economic reports could bolster the growing consensus that economic growth remains slow and stable, giving the Federal Reserve no reason to immediately lower rates any further.  Stock investors' hopes for an easier monetary policy were seen in the market yesterday.  Treasury-market traders, betting that rates won't drop further soon, sold bonds and sent interest rates rising, broadsiding stocks in the process.  The Dow Jones Utility Average, which typically moves inversely with interest rates, tumbled 1.33 to 216.23.  Traders said some nervous, rate-watching investors are raising cash, taking profits or running to the relative safety of big-name stocks, such as those among the Dow industrials.  Procter & Gamble was strong yesterday, for example, rising 2 to 127.  Meanwhile, slow economic growth without further easing by the Fed may not help the earnings outlook for some sectors.  Hewlett-Packard and Computer Factory took a beating on bad earnings news, a sign of how skittish investors are over the outlook for corporate profits.  Hewlett-Packard fell 2 1/2 to 52 3/4 on volume of two million shares after the company said third-quarter earnings will be below analysts' forecasts.  Computer Factory fell 3/4 to 9 5/8 after the company reported a large drop in earnings.  Smith Corona, the most active Big Board issue, plummeted 4 3/8 to 18 on 2.3 million shares, making it the largest loser in percentage terms on the exchange.  The company, which went public in late July at $21 a share, said it plans to reduce the number of its temporary manufacturing workers by about 10% because of high inventories of its personal typewriters and a softening U.S. demand.  American Telephone & Telegraph fell 7/8 to 38 1/2 on 1.9 million shares.  Other stocks in the communications-technology sector were also weak; General Instrument dropped 1 to 32 3/8, Communications Satellite lost 3/4 to 37 and Harris eased 1/2 to 33 3/8.  Blue-chip issues that slumped along with AT&T included Woolworth, which fell 2 1/4 to 63 1/4 following a surge late last week, and Philip Morris, which lost 3/4 to 159 1/4.  Conversely, Merck rose 3/4 to 74 3/8, Du Pont advanced 1 3/8 to 117 3/8 and McDonald's climbed 3/8 to 29 on 1.9 million shares.  Harcourt Brace Jovanovich rose 7/8 to 17 1/8 on 1.2 million shares.  The company is reportedly near an agreement to sell its four Sea World theme parks and other properties in its entertainment unit.  Federal Express gained 2 to 55.  Morgan Stanley issued a buy recommendation on the stock, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Long Island Lighting rose 3/4 to 18 1/4 in active dealings after declaring a common-stock dividend of 25 cents a share, its first payout since February 1984.  Tidewater, which agreed to clear the way for a group headed by investor Irwin Jacobs to sell its 20.6% stake, fell 5/8 to 9 1/8.  The company also said the Jacobs group was no longer interested in buying its compression business.  Pinnacle West Capital lost 7/8 to 11 5/8 following a top official's disclosure that the company, facing problems at its Merabank thrift unit, has been temporarily denied credit by its bankers and restricted in its access to public debt markets.  Lac Minerals declined 1 3/8 to 10 after losing its legal battle over the Page-Williams gold mine, Canada's largest.  A Canadian appeals court affirmed decisions granting ownership of the mine to Corona, whose Class A shares rose 1/4 to 7 5/8 on the American Stock Exchange.  The American Stock Exchange Index fell 1.64 to 379.00.  Volume totaled 11,170,000 shares.  Lincoln N.C. Realty Fund went down 1 3/8 to 7 1/8.  The real estate investment trust said it plans a write-down of $1,750,000 in the third quarter as part of a planned debt refinancing and expects to reduce dividends substantially.  Bay Meadows Operating, whose units jumped 2 3/4 Friday, added 1 to 24 1/2.  The advance got under way after Henry F. Swift & Co., a San Francisco investment firm, repeated its buy recommendation on the issue.  Ellistan Partners L.P., which has options to buy 56.1% of Valley Forge Corp. from seven shareholders, has engaged in discussions with the company concerning a possible merger or business combination, according to a Securities and Exchange Commission filing.  However, Ellistan, a New York investment concern, gave no assurance that any specific plan will develop from the talks.  In the filing, Ellistan said it "intends to acquire control of the company" and is "evaluating various strategies for obtaining control."  Ellistan's options to acquire the block of Valley Forge Stock are to expire Wednesday, the filing said.  Valley Forge, of San Rafael, Calif., is a holding company with interests in marine and industrial products.  Executives for the company couldn't be reached to comment on the Ellistan investment plans.  In composite trading on the American Stock Exchange, Valley Forge closed yesterday at $14.25 a share, up 50 cents.  McGraw-Hill Inc., New York, named Charles W. McConnell vice president, marketing communications, a new post.  Before joining this publishing and information services company, he was executive vice president and managing director of Harvard Group, a unit of WPP Group PLC.  Directors of Elders IXL Ltd. have formally rejected an offer by Harlin Holdings Pty. that values all the Australian brewing, agribusiness, financial-services and resources company at about 5.4 billion Australian dollars (US$4.13 billion).  Harlin is a closely held concern controlled by Elders executives, including chairman John Elliott.  Harlin is offering to buy Elders shares for three Australian dollars each on the stock market between Aug. 28 and Sept. 27.  Elders directors, as expected, said in a statement to shareholders that Harlin's offer "doesn't reflect the full value of Elders IXL."  They cited a report by First Boston Australia Ltd., which was retained as an independent expert to appraise Elders stock, that values the shares between 3.36 and 3.79 Australian dollars.  Harlin already owns about 18% of Elders.  UNITED AIR'S PARENT has held intensive talks with its pilots union about a new contract and possible employee ownership, sources said.  The pilots' apparent willingness to join with UAL Chairman Stephen Wolf in a management buy-out of the carrier could make it more difficult for investor Marvin Davis or any other potential bidders to prevail.  ---  Bush's nominee for SEC chairman is Richard Breeden, a White House troubleshooter and pragmatic conservative who was a key thinker in the S&L bailout bill.  But Breeden faces a tough review on Capitol Hill, where there is some skepticism about whether he has enough experience.  ---  American Airlines plans to cut restricted fares on all routes over the U.S. mainland.  The move significantly expands fare reductions announced over the weekend by TWA and makes it likely the cuts will spread to most markets nationwide.  ---  Hewlett-Packard said errors in predicting demand for its product lines depressed earnings far below analysts expectations for the second consecutive quarter.  The news sent the company's stock down nearly 5%.  ---  The U.S. agreed to add laptops and other portable computers to the list of high-technology products that Western companies can freely sell to the Soviet bloc and China.  The additions were urged by European allies.  ---  Falconbridge has attracted a new suitor.  Bronfman-controlled Noranda and Sweden's Trelleborg plan a joint offer of $31.49 a share, or $1.81 billion, for the firm.  Rival suitor Amax may sweeten its proposal, analysts say.  ---  Resorts International plans to present a "revised business plan" to debtholders on Sept. 19 that will probably include a restructuring of part or all of its $925 million in bonds.  ---  Smith Corona's stock slid $4.375, to $18, on news that it would lay off 10% of its work force.  The stock has now lost 14% of its value since the typewriter concern went public July 28.  ---  Hanson PLC posted a 19% rise in quarterly profit and announced the first sale of Consolidated Gold Fields assets since last week's takeover.  ---  Dean Witter Reynolds lost a major arbitration case against its former corporate-bond trading chief, whom it fired after the October 1987 crash.  ---  Stocks and bonds declined as speculation faded that the Fed will push down interest rates anytime soon.  The Dow Jones industrials closed off 6.07, at 2677.92.  The dollar strengthened.  ---  Atari's profit plunged 94% in the second quarter.  The company cited depressed video-game sales and currency-rate fluctuations.  ---  Business inventories grew 0.4% in June, while sales declined 0.3%.  Despite the increase, which followed a revised 0.9% jump in May, inventories remain at manageable levels.  ---  Kidder Peabody hired a merger specialist from S.G. Warburg, Nigel Christie, to become head of its London mergers and acquisitions group.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 142,010,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2677.92, off 6.07; transportation 1413.94, up 0.71; utilities 216.23, off 1.33.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3262.16, off 40.01.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 128.45, off 0.78; spot index 129.64, up 1.64.  Dollar: 141.95 yen, up 0.10; 1.9485 marks, up 0.0080.  Kidder, Peabody & Co. took another step to rebuild its mergers and acquisitions business while attempting to enlarge its toehold in the booming international takeover market.  Kidder, General Electric Co.'s 80%-owned securities unit, hired Nigel B. Christie, a specialist in North American mergers and acquisitions at S.G. Warburg & Co. in New York, for the newly created post of head of Kidder's London M&A group.  An announcement is expected today.  Mr. Christie, a 40-year-old native of Britain, said in an interview that he plans to expand Kidder's London M&A staff, and that his strategy will be two-pronged.  He said he aims "to build up a cross-border M&A advisory business going in both directions, between the U.K./Europe and the U.S., and, utilizing GE's capital base, to do leveraged merchant-banking transactions in the U.K. and Europe."  He said he would arrive in London in October.  Mr. Christie becomes the third recent high-level investment-banking hire at Kidder.  The firm's investment-banking department, once a Wall Street powerhouse, was riddled with defections after GE in January picked Michael Carpenter, a longtime GE executive, as president and chief executive of the firm, rather than naming a Kidder executive.  Mr. Carpenter, hiring from the outside, last spring named a new head of investment banking: Scott Newquist, formerly of Morgan Stanley & Co.  He also made B.J. Megargel, formerly of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., Mr. Newquist's deputy for M&A.  Mr. Christie will report to Mr. Megargel.  "I obviously recognize that this is a rebuilding exercise," Mr. Christie said.  "That was very exciting to me.  I saw the opportunity to get in among a young team who really want to build an operation."  At Warburg, Mr. Christie mainly was involved in advising British companies on friendly acquisitions of U.S. corporations or their units.  Mr. Megargel said in a separate interview that he "wouldn't rule out hostile takeovers" at the London operation "if that's what our clients want us to do, but we aren't positioning ourselves as a purely 'hostile' firm."  Mr. Megargel said Kidder now has five M&A professionals in London and expects Mr. Christie to double the staff.  He said there has been "a blur" between London-based M&A activity and other investment banking, and that Mr. Christie's appointment was designed to fix specific responsibility for mergers and acquisitions.  Both men declined to disclose Mr. Christie's compensation at Kidder.  Philip Keevil, Mr. Christie's former superior at Warburg in New York, couldn't be reached for comment.  The Securities and Exchange Commission suspended Stephen Clark, a partner with Peat, Marwick, Main & Co., in the first sanction of a top accounting firm partner since 1978.  The SEC charged that Mr. Clark erred in signing an opinion that Midwestern Cos.' 1982 financial statements were in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.  The SEC said that Midwestern improperly had included $17 million in revenue from the sale of five ethanol plants.  The SEC said "there is no doubt" that Midwestern had lied to Mr. Clark and noted it has taken action against the Joplin, Mo., company.  "But he still had the basic sales documents in front of him that clearly showed that revenue recognition was improper," said Susan Ferris Wyderko, SEC senior litigation counsel.  The SEC sought punishment because such conduct was not "in accordance with professional standards."  Mr. Clark, without admitting or denying the charges, agreed to the suspension, which forbids him from practicing audits for publicly held companies for nine months.  Ms. Wyderko called the sanctions "harsh."  Mr. Clark couldn't be reached for comment.  Peat Marwick said in a statement: "Through this settlement, Clark chose to put these six-year-old issues behind him and the matter is at an end."  The statement continued: "Moreover, as the SEC expressly acknowledged, Clark and the audit team were the target of an elaborate and sophisticated fraud perpetrated by Midwestern."  Only three partners of top accounting firms have been penalized by the SEC: two in 1978, and one in 1952, according to a spokeswoman.  DON'T YOU UNDERSTAND??]]]  That's what many corporate officials and management experts advise bosses.  J.B. Fuqua, founder and chairman of Fuqua Industries, says "anger is in poor taste" and gets "bad results."  It shows lack of self-control, says Howard Woltz, head of Insteel Industries, a Mount Airy, N.C., wiring maker.  Slow, soft talk does more than fist-pounding and a raised voice, insists George Anderson, Asarco's executive vice president.  A supervisor's outburst can spur better work for a while but alienates workers, says Randall Schuler, a management professor at New York University's Stern School of Business.  Still, Michael Leven, president of Days Inns of America, has thrown phones through windows to make a point.  He says a boss has to earn the right to use anger.  If the boss doesn't make up later, the worker should try to defuse the situation, Mr. Schuler says.  "DOWNSIZING" CONTINUES unabated, as worries about the economy grow.  Fully 39% of 1,084 companies and nonprofit groups surveyed by the American Management Association cut work forces in the past year, up from 35% in the 12 months through June 1988.  "Business downturn" was cited by 43% as the main reason, with better staff use and merger results cited by 30% and 10%, respectively.  While only 17% of surveyed companies say they'll reduce crews by June 1990, this doesn't mean fewer cuts, says an AMA official.  Typically, less than half of actual downsizers plan cuts at the start of a year; long-range planning for work-force cuts is unusual, he says.  Citing pressures to make quick gains, Management Practice Quarterly says firms that can cut further "better not tarry."  THE NLRB SEEKS to get its hospital organizing rule back on track.  A recent National Labor Relations Board decision would make it easier for nurses and others to join unions by permitting them to organize into eight separate bargaining units, such as clerks and technicians.  But U.S. District Judge James Zagel in Chicago enjoined the rule, saying the board went beyond Congress's intent, by allowing so many units.  The NLRB defers action on over 100 pending cases.  The board, AFL-CIO and the American Nurses Association seek quick action by an appeals court to overturn Judge Zagel's decision.  The NLRB ruling is "central" to allowing increasingly active nurse-organizing to succeed, an attorney for the nurses' group says.  Meantime, organizing efforts will forge ahead, unions say.  The judge's ruling recognizes healthcare providers' "special needs," the American Hospital Association says.  FULL-FUNDING LIMITS for defined-benefit pension plans were exceeded in 1988 by 53% of 465 plans surveyed by Buck Consultants, a benefits firm.  Tax deductions cannot be taken for excess contributions.  An additional 21% were underfunded, requiring extra premium payments of $3 million to the federal Pension Benefit Guaranty Corp.  DELTA AIRLINES bars workplace smoking, but balks at a ban for long flights.  Some studies show tobacco smoke impairs crew functions, notes anti-smoking activist Aaron Leichtman.  He seeks a Delta stockholder vote on a total flight ban.  Delta says it wants to accommodate smokers on long flights, but applauds the existing two-hour ban.  THEY'RE UNIMPRESSED: Senate-passed legislation to exempt some workers from the federal pay scale and let the Defense and Energy Departments pay 525 scientists and engineers up to $134,250 a year is called a "poisonous stew" by the Senior Executives Association.  It wants a pay boost for all top career workers.  RECORD AMOUNT: New York state agrees to pay $2.9 million in back wages, the largest such public-employer remedy, to 500 "houseparents" who tend children at 27 community urban homes and youth development centers.  The federal consent judgment resolved Labor Department charges of overtime violations over three years.  DISABILITY RIGHTS legislation perplexes many employers.  A bill pending in Congress would ban discrimination against the handicapped in employment and public accommodations.  Big firms like Ashland Oil, Hewlett-Packard and BankAmerica see little or no effect.  But Robert Robertson, head of White Hen Pantry, an Illinois convenience-store firm, says it could be "hairy" for stores to remodel for a wheelchair-bound worker, and lawsuits could be a "nightmare."  Expanding jobs could outpace a disabled employee's abilities, worries Custom Machinery Design, in Appleton, Wis.  "I'm all for employing the handicapped -- within reason," says Steven Stein, president of Allied Security, in Pittsburgh.  Complying would cost "thousands," complains Ace Mailing in San Francisco.  "What is going to happen is a mutiny," predicts Scott Hauge, president of Cal Insurance, also in San Francisco.  THE CHECKOFF: Only Alabama and American Samoa still have "workmen's compensation"; other states and territories have changed to "workers' compensation." . . .  Some 64% of 878 truckers survey ed in Florida by a trucking group said at least 20% of fellow drivers drive under the influence of illegal drugs. . . .  Americans who've reached $45,000 to $50,000 incomes are least "stressed out," says Carnegie Mellon University psychologist Sheldon Cohen.  POLAND'S KISZCZAK ABANDONED his bid to form a Communist-led coalition.  In an effort to resolve a political crisis, Kiszczak gave the task of forming a government to the small United Peasants Party.  Kiszczak, an ex-interior minister who was elected premier Aug. 2, also appeared prepared to resign.  A Solidarity official said the move appeared aimed at blocking Walesa's attempt to form a government that excludes the Communist Party.  The union leader has been trying to persuade the UPP and the Democratic Party, both traditionally aligned with the Communists, to join a coalition.  A Solidarity-led coalition has alarmed the Soviet Union and would be the first non-Communist government in the East bloc since the late 1940s.  ---  BOTHA RESIGNED as South Africa's president over a feud in the ruling party.  In a televised announcement, the 73-year-old Botha, who had been president for 11 years, relinquished his post after losing a leadership struggle with Education Minister de Klerk, head of the governing National Party and Botha's heir apparent.  De Klerk is expected to be named acting president today.  Botha, who had a stroke in January and was expected to resign shortly after parliamentary elections Sept. 6, said he was "being ignored by ministers serving in my cabinet."  The power struggle erupted over the weekend when de Klerk arranged to meet Aug. 28 with Zambian President Kaunda.  Botha opposed the meeting.  ---  Iran's Khamenei ruled out talks with the U.S. about the the possible release of Western hostages in Lebanon.  The Iranian supreme leader also rejected the possibility of diplomatic relations with Washington unless it ends support for Israel and renounces its alleged oppression of "weak nations."  ---  Bad weather in Ethiopia stalled efforts to recover the bodies of Democratic Rep. Leland of Texas and 15 companions from a mountain ravine in the southwestern part of the country, where their plane crashed a week ago.  The wreckage of the aircraft, which was en route to a refugee camp near the border with Sudan, was found Sunday.  Mississippi Rep. Smith was killed in a crash of a single-engine plane in a forest near New Augusta, Miss.  He was 45.  The pilot of the aircraft also was killed.  The freshman Republican's plane, which had disappeared Sunday night, was on a 90-mile flight to Gulfport from Hattiesburg.  ---  Syria assembled troops and armor near a strategic Christian garrison in the mountains above Beirut, security sources in Lebanon said, raising speculation about another Syrian-led ground assault.  Artillery duels around Lebanon's capital, meanwhile, killed eight people.  The U.S. condemned Syria and its Moslem allies for the fighting.  ---  U.S. and PLO officials met in Tunis, and Washington pressed Arafat's organization to accept an Israeli plan for Arab elections in the occupied territories.  The U.S. also sought assurances of the PLO's peaceful intentions following a call last week for the group to "escalate armed action."  ---  Connecticut agreed to end its segregation of prison inmates with AIDS.  The settlement of a federal lawsuit is believed to be the first in which a state agreed to rescind a blanket quarantine of inmates with AIDS-related symptoms, and runs counter to prison policy in 20 other states.  ---  Bush pardoned industrialist Armand Hammer, who was convicted for making illegal contributions to Nixon's 1972 campaign, administration officials said.  The Justice Department had recommended the pardon of the Occidental Petroleum chairman.  ---  Thousands of Azerbaijan workers rallied in the Soviet republic's capital, Baku, after a day of work stoppages to back demands for greater local autonomy.  In Estonia, the Communist Party chief urged ethnic Russian workers to end a six-day strike over a new law tightening residency requirements.  Strikes also were threatened in Georgia.  ---  Miners in Peru launched an indefinite strike for wider collective-bargaining rights, affecting operations at major mines in the country's copper industry.  The strike by 70,000 miners added to the labor unrest facing President Garcia's government, which already is battling a guerrilla insurgency.  ---  A Beijing University official said all of next term's new students would be sent to army academies for a year's military and political training.  The university, where last spring's pro-democracy protests began, also plans to cut enrollment to 800 students from the more than 2,000 initially planned.  ---  Police in Northern Ireland fired plastic bullets to disperse youths in Belfast who set fire to four vehicles in scattered violence marking the 20th anniversary of the arrival of British troops.  In Londonderry, Irish Republican Army supporters staged a march.  ---  Prosecutors in Chicago dropped rape and kidnapping charges against Gary Dotson, 10 years after he was convicted on testimony later recanted by his accuser.  The action, which clears the 32-year-old Dotson of any legal wrongdoing in the case, immediately followed a defense motion for a new trial.  ---  Died: William Shockley, 79, a Nobel Prize-winning creator of the transistor and a controversial racial theorist, Saturday, in Stanford, Calif., of prostate cancer.  Barnwell Industries Inc. reported net income for its fiscal third quarter more than quadrupled.  The Honolulu company said net for the quarter ended June 30 rose to $2.3 million, or $1.65 a share, from $530,000, or 38 cents a share, a year ago.  Revenue rose 83% to $5.8 million from $3.2 million.  Barnwell has interests in Canadian oil and gas production and Hawaiian land development and contract drilling for water wells.  The company credited the record results to the performance of Kaupulehu Developments, a joint venture of a Barnwell unit and Cambridge Hawaii L.P. Kaupulehu is involved in resort development.  Oil and gas revenue also improved in the quarter, Barnwell said.  The latest results include a capital gains loss carry-forward of $300,000, related to transactions by Kaupulehu.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading, Barnwell shares closed at $22.875, up 75 cents.  USAir Group Inc. disclosed in a government filing that it has a 10-year standstill agreement with Warren E. Buffett, the Omaha, Neb. investor which acquired last week $358 million of preferred stock that is convertible after two years into a 12% stake in the airline holding company's common stock.  According to a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Mr. Buffett, chairman of Berkshire Hathaway Inc., said he wouldn't acquire more than a 14% voting stake in USAir Group unless given approval by the directors of USAir Group.  Under its agreement to sell the convertible stake to Mr. Buffett, which was characterized by both parties as a friendly investment, USAir Group also has the right of first refusal to buy any of its shares from Mr. Buffett.  The filing also disclosed Mr. Buffett can, under certain default circumstances, elect two directors of USAir Group.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, USAir closed yesterday at $49.75 a share, down $1.375.  In the Far East, analysts are busy touting shares of a stock fund that is trading at a seemingly awesome price.  Still, some U.S. money managers aren't racing to buy.  So what, say the backers of the Korea Fund, if the fund's shares are already trading at nearly twice the value of the fund's stock portfolio.  In the bulls' view, this single-country, publicly traded stock fund is poised for a takeoff on the heels of an expected surge in the slumbering South Korean stock market.  After soaring in recent years, South Korean stocks in general have fallen flat in 1989.  But they are likely to climb in the months ahead, as South Koreans plow more of their increasing incomes into the market and the fundamentals of South Korean companies improve, the bullish analysts say.  And this, in turn, should boost the value of the $375 million Korea Fund.  Shares of the fund, which trade on the New York Stock Exchange, already have jumped 37% this year, far faster than the fund's net asset value.  The result: A staggering 95% premium to the value of its stockholdings -- the highest among all closed-end funds. (Unlike open-end mutual funds, closed-end funds are publicly traded at a premium or discount to the value of their portfolios.)  "Despite the high current premiums, investors can earn high returns," says Lee Se Geun, executive director of Daewoo Securities.  Chung Jin Ho, research director for Prudential-Bache Securities in Seoul, says the fund's net asset value could triple by 1992, based on estimates of 7.5% real growth in South Korean gross national product, booming domestic demand, and a growing current-account surplus.  But the ride could be bumpy.  South Korean political unrest could curb market gains, for one thing.  Any severe slump in the U.S. market could drag down the Korea Fund, too.  Currency losses also could eat into returns, though economists expect the South Korean won will rise in value against the U.S. dollar.  And buying a fund for more than its portfolio value can be treacherous, some analysts say.  This is because, even if the portfolio value rises, investors still can lose out if the fund's own stock price lags.  Several times last year, for example, shares of the Taiwan Fund fell even as the Taiwan market was surging.  A U.S. money manager, Colonial Group's Paul Samuelson, says he has found a number of Asia-oriented alternatives to the Korea Fund that are trading at more attractive prices, including the Taiwan Fund, Scudder New Asia Fund, India Growth Fund and First Australia Fund.  Arch Spencer, manager of the $750 million IDS New Dimensions Fund, hasn't bought any more Korea Fund shares since stacking up a heap of them last year.  He doesn't plan to buy more until there is a pullback in both the U.S. and South Korean markets.  Still, the Korea Fund remains one of the few ways Americans can invest in South Korea's strictly regulated market.  Though this market will slowly be opened to foreign investors through 1992 -- a process that is likely to erode the fund's premium -- investors aren't likely to get hurt, analysts say.  "The premium is more likely to shrink as a result of net asset value rising, rather than share price declining," says Michael Porter, a Smith Barney analyst.  The premium actually has shrunk from last week's level of about 110%.  One reason: An additional $50 million share offering, part of the government's gradual opening process, was priced at the higher share price, rather than the portfolio value, and this diluted the premium.  Launched by Scudder, Stevens & Clark in 1984, the Korea Fund owns stocks in many of that country's blue-chip manufacturing companies.  The fund has heavy exposure to electronics and automobiles Samsung Electronics and Kia Motors are two large holdings -- as well as the only publicly quoted airline, Korean Air.  And despite its lofty premium, the Korea Fund still is a bargain, compared with its sister Korea-Euro Fund.  This fund, which trades on the London Stock Exchange, trades at a premium of more than 100%.  Moreover, some analysts say Japanese demand for South Korean stocks will keep the Korea Fund's price propped up.  Estimates put Japanese ownership of the fund at more than one-third; South Korean brokers say there is considerable interest by Japanese institutions in diversifying into Asian markets, of which South Korea is one of the most attractive.  "Returns in Korea will look good by comparison to others in Asia," William A.G. Ramsey, a director of Baring Securities in Tokyo, says.  "So the demand will be there."  But some say there may be better ways to play the South Korean market.  One of the best plays: Buy the Asia Pacific Fund, which boasts the Korea Fund as its second-largest holding, making up about 6% of the portfolio.  South Korean stocks make up fully one-fourth of the Asia Pacific Fund, which itself traded recently on the Big Board at about a 16% discount to the value of its holdings.  "It's a beautiful way to play the Korea Fund and that market," Smith Barney's Mr. Porter says.  "And you're not paying up for it."  ---  Korea Fund  NYSE; Symbol: KF  Business: Publicly traded single-country stock fund  Year ended Dec. 30, 1988:  Net asset value: $15.93  Aug. 11, 1989 vs.  Aug. 12, 1988:  Net asset value: $18.24 vs. $13.09  Average daily trading volume:  55,042 shares  Common shares outstanding: 20.6 million  Note: Dollar figures reflect 3-for-1 stock split effective Sept. 30, 1988.  Newport Electronics Inc. canceled a pact to have all its stock acquired by Sensor Control Corp. in favor of High Technology Holding Co.'s bid to buy 35% of the stock at a higher per-share price.  Earlier this month, two of Santa Ana, Calif.-based Newport's five directors said they would tender shares to the High Technology offer of $11 a share for 35% of the 1.15 million common shares outstanding.  Sensor, a Sunnyvale, Calif., maker of pressure sensors and gauges, had offered to buy all of Newport's stock, 43% at $9.75 a share, and the rest at $9 a share.  Newport, a maker of electronic measuring devices, said Sensor first bid $8 a share for all of its stock last December.  Sensor raised its offer to $9, with the provision that if the offer didn't go through, Newport would pay Sensor a $300,000 fee; the fee later was revised to $400,000.  Then this year, High Technology, Stamford, Conn., offered $9.50 a share for 35% of Newport's stock.  Newport considered a lower bid for all shares preferable.  But High Technology lifted its bid to $11 a share for the 35% stake, and this month two Newport board members, including the chairman, said they would tender their combined 24.6% stake to that offer.  In over-the-counter trading yesterday, Newport shares closed unchanged at $8.75.  A group including Value Equity Associates I Limited Partnership said it boosted its stake in Xtra Corp. to the equivalent of 13.43% of the common outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, it said it controls 858,309 common shares, assuming preferred conversion.  According to the filing, it bought 317,800 common shares Aug. 4 to Aug. 11 for $30.25 to $30.75 each.  It also bought 51,500 shares of Series B $1.9375 cumulative convertible preferred stock between June 28 and Aug. 3 for $25.125 to $26 each, the filing said.  Value Equity Associates is a New York partnership controlled by Gilbert Butler and Martin L. Solomon of New York.  Mr. Butler is president of Butler Capital Corp., a private investment banking firm, and Mr. Solomon is managing director of Value Equity Associates and Value Equity Management I L.P., another group member.  In Boston, a spokesman for Xtra declined to comment on the group's additional purchases of its stock.  Xtra leases transportation equipment.  Integra Financial Corp. said it offered to acquire First Banc Securities Inc., of Morgantown, W.Va., in an exchange of $94 million in Integra common stock.  The offer, valued at $31 a First Banc share, tops First Banc's previously announced agreement to be acquired by Huntington Bancshares Inc. in an exchange of $85 million in Huntington stock, or the equivalent of $28 a share.  Huntington is a bank holding company based in Columbus, Ohio.  In over-the-counter trading yesterday, Integra fell 12.5 cents to $28.75.  First Banc rose 75 cents to $25.25, while Huntington fell 12.5 cents $21.375.  Integra Financial, which operates seven banks and has assets of about $6.5 billion, said it holds more than 100,000 shares of First Banc common.  "We are one of the larger shareholders and we are very much interested in protecting our investment."  Integra added, "We are a substantial long-term shareholder in many West Virginia and Pennsylvania banks.  We don't want to see any of them sold for inadequate prices, and we have demonstrated our conviction with this offer.  First Banc Securities is too good to be sold at a discount price."  First Banc is a bank holding company with assets of about $520.2 million.  First Banc acknowledged receipt of Integra Financial's offer, but said it isn't permitted to entertain offers other than the one from Huntington Bancshares pending execution of a definitive merger agreement or termination of its letter of intent to merge with Huntington.  The U.S. Bankruptcy Court approved an emergency $24 million infusion of debtor-in-possession financing for L.J. Hooker Corp.  The U.S. subsidiary of Australia's Hooker Corp. filed for protection under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code last Wednesday.  The financing, part of a $50 million line of credit to be provided by GE Capital Corp., will be used mainly to secure inventory for Bonwit Teller and B. Altman & Co., L.J. Hooker's retail units.  The two chains have been hurt as vendors said they would supply new merchandise on a cash basis only.  Sanford C. Sigoloff, the company's new chief executive officer, said Hooker will return to court Aug. 28 to seek approval for the remaining $26 million in the credit line.  Bankruptcy court rules require 15 days' notice for post-petition financing, except for funds needed to prevent irreparable damage to the concern.  Manufacturers greeted the news with enthusiasm.  "Providing certain guarantees are in place, it increases the possibility that we'll get them fall goods in a timely manner," said Richard Conrad, chief executive officer, of Castleberry Knits Inc. "We've been putting aside as much fall merchandise for B. Altman as we could."  Steve Stoller, chairman of Karin Stevens Apparel Group, said he intends to ship to Bonwit Teller as soon as he gets credit approval.  "This is definitely a vote of confidence.  This is a positive development," he said.  Oak Industries Inc., in the wake of a successful proxy fight by dissident directors in June, reported a loss of $7.1 million for the second quarter.  The electronic and communications equipment company earned $539,000, or one cent a share, in the year-earlier period.  Net sales rose 4.3% to $50.6 million from $48.5 million a year earlier.  The latest results include $6.4 million in nonrecurring expenses, including $2 million in expense from the proxy fight, which was split by the competing slates of directors; $945,000 in corporate reorganization expense; and $2 million stemming from asset re-evaluations and required reserves.  The company also incurred expenses of $1.5 million from the operation and liquidation of its discontinued telephone advertising business.  The year-earlier quarter included $920,000 in nonrecurring income.  Rex Warden, president pro tempore, and Andrew Chitiea, chief financial officer pro tempore, said they had reviewed Oak's operations and established reserves and asset re-evaluations to more accurately reflect the company's position.  After examining its Harper-Wyman unit, the company recorded a $679,000 inventory adjustment, a $577,000 reserve for an environmental matter; and a $246,000 charge for costs of a disposition that had previously been deferred.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Oak shares closed unchanged at $1.375.  "I'd rather be king of a small country than prince of a big one," says Ronald Friedsam, who left his job as a vice president at Unisys Corp. in 1986 to become chief executive at Structural Dynamics Research Corp., a small Cincinnati software house.  Mr. Friedsam, now 46 years old, got his wish to be a king all right, but he knew the kingdom he inherited was deeply troubled.  SDRC, a once-booming company whose software was still more advanced than most competitors', had severe cash problems and was no longer growing.  "The company was spending more than it was making," Mr. Friedsam says.  Equally troubling, nobody seemed to bear responsibility for marketing, or for setting and hitting sales and profit targets.  Mr. Friedsam's rescue effort consisted of using -- selectively -- the big-company management methods he had learned in 21 years at Burroughs Corp. (which became Unisys after merging with Sperry Corp. in 1986).  Among other things, he froze hiring and moved middle managers into sales.  He got tough on slow-paying customers and directed his sales staff to find new accounts.  And there were some things Mr. Friedsam didn't do.  He didn't, for instance, fire all the top management or create a big central staff.  Three years later, owing partly to a rebound in the company's main market, Mr. Friedsam has achieved a solid turnaround.  Revenue has nearly doubled to $90 million, and earnings rose to $6 million last year from $1.8 million in 1986.  As such, SDRC is a good illustration of how big-company methods can sometimes be the best medicine for an ailing smaller company.  It is a stark reminder, perhaps, that for all the rigidities and bureaucracy of big U.S. corporations, in some circumstances rigid discipline is exactly the right thing.  As Mr. Friedsam puts it, "Almost everything I do is drawn directly from my 21 years at Burroughs Corp."  Mr. Friedsam's tenure also offers a glimpse of an increasingly common type of career change -- and a sometimes difficult one -- where an executive leaves a big company to head a smaller firm.  A fast-tracker who by his mid-30s had a six-figure salary and was in charge of a $300 million division, Mr. Friedsam subsequently felt it would take decades longer to get a shot at the post of chief executive.  Clearly, the transition isn't easy for the company or the new chief.  Small businesses aren't used to outsiders imposing rigid procedures on their often familial settings.  Many transplants from big business, meanwhile, don't fit the entrepreneurial mode and are frustrated at having to do everything from writing news releases to calling their own taxis.  "Corporate executives who join a small business expecting a country-inn atmosphere are shocked to find they have to work harder than before," says Jeffrey Sonnenfeld, a business professor at Emory University.  "And a pound of the fist on the desk isn't going to carry the same weight.  They're going to have to be cheerleaders."  Mr. Friedsam, an outgoing, boyish-looking executive, carefully selected some of the practices that had worked for him at Unisys.  For example, SDRC, which had previously been run by its founding engineers, had never set profit goals, a staple of corporate America.  "When I asked for a forecast, managers just pointed to last year's revenue and said they hoped to beat that," Mr. Friedsam recalls.  He immediately set monthly performance goals for each of the company's 30 or so sales offices.  He also drafted the company's first organization chart.  "Before, managers did pretty much whatever they wanted" and lines of authority were blurred, Mr. Friedsam says.  Intent on controlling costs, he instituted a strict accounts-receivable system, cutting collection time by more than half, to 40 days.  Intent on wooing new customers, he also ordered sales managers to go after large, Fortune 500 companies.  Mr. Friedsam didn't fire any top managers; even his predecessor as chief executive is still with the company, as a vice president.  Unlike new CEOs in big corporations, who often bring their own senior teams with them, Mr. Friedsam knew he had to work with and win the loyalty of the company's founders and original employees.  He realized their technological expertise was crucial.  "I didn't want to be a hatchet man who was going to clean house," says Mr. Friedsam, though he had been exactly that at Burroughs.  There he had gained a reputation as a turnaround specialist, talented at revamping ailing divisions.  As the company grew, Mr. Friedsam says, he resisted creating a large central staff akin to Burroughs's.  "I didn't want the staff at headquarters to second-guess line operations," he says.  "I let the field offices run the business themselves."  Still, Mr. Friedsam wanted SDRC "to think and act like a big business."  That meant a change in culture.  The first time he drove into his new company's parking lot at 7 a.m. -- his typical starting time at Unisys -- only five cars were there.  Determined to boost productivity while also winning over his subordinates, he introduced profit-sharing and bonus plans for all employees.  Now at 7 a.m., the parking lot is almost full.  Mr. Friedsam had to adapt, too.  On business trips, he couldn't rely on limousine service and chartered airplane flights.  And he couldn't turn to an underling to provide him with a report on a customer or competitor.  "You have to do a lot of things yourself, and the perks aren't there," he says.  He also had to become more patient with subordinates, he says, and give them time to gain experience.  "At a major corporation, you're working with more experienced people," he says.  In small business, "people sometimes don't do what you think is basic."  Now, three years after joining the software company, his results have been impressive.  Besides doubling sales and restoring the company to profitability, funding for research and development has increased fivefold to $16 million.  Analysts expect further improvement: They estimate earnings at $8.3 million this year and $11 million in 1990, with revenue rising to at least $112 million next year.  The company's success isn't all due to Mr. Friedsam.  Industry specialists say that as a group, engineering-software companies -- whose products are used by manufacturers to design, test and analyze products electronically -- are prospering.  "Ron came in and did a great job of rejuvenating the sales force at the right time," says Rick Ruvkun, an analyst with Morgan Stanley & Co. in New York.  "It always had a good product, but the market just wasn't ready for it."  Still, SDRC's turnaround hasn't been just a matter of timing.  "We were going nowhere," recalls Albert Peter, a founder who still serves as a vice president.  Last year, the company's sales grew 37%, faster than the 25% growth rate for the engineering-software industry as a whole.  Albert L. Klosterman, senior vice president and head of research who has been with the company since its start, says SDRC had the "technological vision," but lacked a business structure.  "There was a feeling that the company owed it to its people" to fund whatever project was proposed, Mr. Klosterman says.  Now, there is "a lot of focus and discipline," and the company concentrates on funding technology that will have a "major" rather than marginal impact, he adds.  For Mr. Friedsam, too, the move to SDRC is paying off.  Though he took a pay cut when he joined (he won't say how much), he also took an equity stake in the company.  Even more than the money he stands to make as the company grows, however, he says he's relieved that he no longer has to put up with a corporate bureaucracy and politics.  "I very rarely see posturing here," he says, "and you don't have to go through nine levels to get a job done."  President Bush chose Richard Breeden, a White House troubleshooter and a pragmatic conservative, to be chairman of the Securities and Exchange Commission, suggesting the agency will have a closer relationship with the White House than it has had under David Ruder.  But Mr. Breeden will get a tough review on Capitol Hill, where there is some skepticism about whether he would bring enough experience to the job of overseeing the markets less than two years after the crash.  Several other openings at the SEC would give Mr. Breeden a unique opportunity to help shape the agency if he is confirmed by the Senate.  Mr. Breeden was nominated to fill the position of Charles Cox, whose term has expired.  Mr. Ruder said he will leave by the end of September, and at least one more of the five commissioners will leave within a year.  As well, the sensitive post of enforcement chief has been vacant since Gary Lynch left last month.  Colleagues and friends describe Mr. Breeden, a key thinker behind the massive savings and loan bailout legislation, as a conservative who generally favors deregulation and free-market approaches but who also believes there is a need for government to set and enforce rules in the marketplace.  "Richard believes in markets, but he also believes government has an important role to play," said William Isaac, a former head of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.  "It's always a balancing act.  I think he has a preference to let the markets operate, particularly when it comes to {eliminating} barriers against competition."  Mr. Breeden hasn't weighed in publicly on some key issues, such as whether the walls separating the banking and securities businesses should be torn down, but he gained a reputation as favoring deregulation when he shepherded a task force on financial regulation for then-Vice President Bush in the mid-1980s.  "I haven't sensed any objection from him to banks playing a pretty significant role in the securities markets," said John Medlin, chairman of First Wachovia Corp. and a friend Mr. Breeden consulted on the task-force report.  But while the SEC has some role in deciding on the barriers between banking and securities activities, that largely is a legislative matter.  Mr. Breeden is best known for his experience as a private banking attorney from 1985 until he joined the White House staff this year.  He was a key figure in the administration's effort to push the savings and loan bailout plan through Congress.  Yesterday, Senate Banking Committee Chairman Donald Riegle (D., Mich.), said the committee will closely question Mr. Breeden's qualifications.  The panel likely will hold hearings on the nomination in September.  Mr. Breeden "did fine work on the S&L reform package and in other governmental assignments," Mr. Riegle said, "yet he brings little direct market experience to this critical assignment, and that is a matter of some concern when the SEC faces a time of epic challenge."  Mr. Riegle said he would probe Mr. Breeden's "market knowledge and experience as well as his view on such key issues as market reform, tender offers, leveraged buy-outs, insider trading, and program trading."  Wall Street was relieved that the months-long wait for a chairman was over.  The Bush administration sent signals early this year that it wouldn't renominate Mr. Ruder, but it set aside the task of choosing a new chairman as it concentrated on the savings and loan bailout bill and a new plan to handle Third World debt.  "I'm glad a chairman has been named," said Hardwick Simmons, vice chairman of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. and the chairman of the Securities Industry Association.  "There's a lot of issues at stake: global competitiveness, global clearance and settlement issues, keeping up the good work" in enforcement and attacking penny-stock fraud, he said.  Mr. Simmons also said Mr. Breeden's views on specific issues were unclear.  Last month, Mr. Breeden met with a number of Wall Street executives, including Mr. Simmons, but didn't outline his philosophy.  "We simply wanted to get to know him," Mr. Simmons said.  "He was relatively unknown as far as our industry was concerned."  Some top aides to Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady were cool to Mr. Breeden's selection, partly because they think he doesn't share the call for unified regulation of the financial markets made in Mr. Brady's 1988 report on the markets.  They also think he doesn't have enough experience.  As it became clear in recent days that Mr. Breeden was a front-runner for the job -- along with Paul MacAvoy, an academician pushed by Mr. Brady -- Mr. Breeden began quietly trying to dispel the idea that he has solely been a banking lawyer.  Mr. Breeden, 39 years old, started his legal career in 1976 doing banking and securities work as a lawyer with the New York firm Cravath, Swaine & Moore.  From 1982 to 1985 he was deputy counsel to Mr. Bush.  In late 1985 he joined the Washington office of Baker & Botts, a prominent law firm, whose founders included the great-grandfather of Secretary of State James Baker.  "Richard is an eminent banking expert but also a well-trained securities lawyer," said James Doty, the senior securities lawyer at Baker & Botts.  "He worked on hostile takeovers, underwritings and mergers."  Mr. Ruder said Mr. Breeden "has a strong background in the areas of securities law and financial securities regulation.  He is well suited to lead the commission in its important role as a national and international capital markets regulator."  It's expected that Mr. Breeden would have closer relations with the White House than Mr. Ruder, whose two-year reign was marked by some stormy differences with the Reagan Treasury.  Mr. Ruder, for instance, distanced himself from the cautious suggestions of the Treasury's post-crash task force and suggested more interventionist measures.  "Breeden has a high energy level and is very creative.  When you combine those traits with his relationship with the president, I think you can expect an SEC chairman who will be very effective," said Mr. Isaac, the former FDIC chairman, who now runs Secura Group, a banking consulting firm.  At the White House since January, Mr. Breeden has been something of a crisis manager, taking time out from lobbying for the thrift bill to oversee administration policy toward the Exxon Valdez oil spill in Alaska.  Mr. Breeden got his undergraduate degree at Stanford, where he was on the varsity sailing and tennis teams, and then went on to Harvard Law School.  Federal-Mogul Corp., Southfield, Mich., said it is exploring "potential business opportunities" with a West German company, Glyco-Group.  Among the options being considered are a joint venture or an acquisition of Glyco-Group by Federal-Mogul, a Federal-Mogul spokeswoman said.  However, she said talks were in the early stages.  Federal-Mogul, which operates 37 plants, is a supplier for the transportation, farm equipment, construction and manufacturing industries.  Glyco, with headquarters in Wiesbaden, is a closely held company that manufactures diesel and automotive engine bearings in Germany and Brazil.  K mart Corp. said its second-quarter profit fell 10.9% to $145 million, or 72 cents a share, in part because May sales were unexpectedly weak.  K mart's results were in line with Wall Street's expectations, said Stacy Ruchlamer, an analyst for Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., New York.  The retailer said its May sales were lower than expected, despite its campaign to trim shelf prices.  K mart said it expects sales and earnings to improve, but it didn't elaborate.  Analysts expect fiscal third-quarter and fourth-quarter earnings to be up only modestly in the wake of the earnings declines registered by K mart in the second quarter and first quarters, when it was hurt by cold weather and a new marketing strategy by rival Sears, Roebuck & Co.  In the year-ago quarter, K mart earned $162.8 million, or 81 cents a share.  Sales for the second quarter ended July 26 rose 4.8% to $7.01 billion from $6.68 billion.  Sales at stores open for at least one year rose 1.5% for the quarter.  For the first six months, K mart said profit fell 15.7% to $239.1 million, or $1.19 a share, from $283.6 million, or $1.41 a share.  Sales increased 4.4% to $13.07 billion from $12.53 billion for the year-earlier period.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, K mart closed yesterday at $39.625, down $1.  Handy & Harman reported a 17% drop in second-quarter profit, citing lower prices for precious metals and other essential raw materials.  The New York-based fabricator, processor and refiner of precious metals and producer of specialty metal products said net income declined to $2.5 million, or 18 cents a share, from $3 million, or 22 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose 1.3% to $167.8 million from $165.7 million.  The figures reflect "substantial fluctuations in non-precious metal raw material prices," the company said.  Richard N. Daniel, chairman, said in a statement that profit expectations are better for the rest of the year as raw materials prices become more stable and as operating adjustments the company has made improve its competitive position.  Varlen Corp., Naperville, Ill., said it expects to report that earnings for the second quarter ended July 29 rose about 20% despite a $540,000 reserve it is establishing to cover bad debts.  Varlen, a railroad products and metal fabrication concern, said the reserve is related to the request by some of its customers for protection under federal bankruptcy laws.  Varlen, which said it expects to report second-quarter earnings in about three weeks, said the reserve would reduce quarterly earnings by about seven cents a share.  For the 1988 second quarter, Varlen posted profit of $2.4 million, or 57 cents a share, on sales of $47.7 million.  The Philadelphia Stock Exchange, the Pacific Stock Exchange and the New York Stock Exchange said they are studying the feasibility of an electronic system to link equity options markets.  During the past year, the Big Board and other exchanges have come under increasing pressure from the Chicago Board of Trade and Chicago Mercantile Exchanges, the nation's largest futures markets, to consider electronic trading systems.  Both the Board of Trade and the Merc plan electronic trading systems, which many analysts say will prove more efficient and equitable for customers than the current system in which traders interact on the floor.  The advent of electronic trading received an additional boost from the recent indictment of many traditional "open outcry" traders for alleged customer abuse at the two Chicago exchanges.  U.S. exchanges also view electronic trading as a way to recapture business that has escaped to foreign exchanges when the U.S. exchanges are closed.  Tellefsen Consulting Group Inc. of New York has been selected to conduct the study, the stock exchanges said.  The firm specializes in issues involving market structure, telecommunications and data processing in areas such as equities, fixed income, options and commodities.  The study is scheduled to be completed in early September, and is expected to be included in comments to the Securities and Exchange Commission.  The SEC has set a Sept. 18 deadline for public comment on its white paper on options market linkages.  Not included among the three exchanges that commissioned the electronic-link study is the American Stock Exchange, a major equity-options mart.  The heads of the American and Philadelphia exchanges have been holding talks about a merger or consolidation.  The American exchange declined to comment on the new study.  Gitano Group Inc. said its second-quarter net income fell 18% because of seasonal factors and higher capital expenditures.  The apparel maker said net fell to $4.9 million, or 35 cents a share, from $6 million, or 51 cents a share, in the previous-year period.  Sales rose 17% to $132 million from $112.8 million a year earlier.  Gitano closed at $28.50 a share, down 37.5 cents, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Haim Dabah, Gitano's president, said the quarter-earnings decline was expected because the company's product mix is changing.  Gitano's growing retail, intimate-apparel and menswear divisions are all strong second-half businesses, he said.  Gitano also said its second-quarter expenditures were 48% higher compared with the year-earlier period because of costs related to the expansion of its in-store shops as well as start-up costs for its new Gloria Vanderbilt product line.  For the first six months, Gitano's net rose 5.1% to $16.7 million, or $1.20 a share, from $15.9 million a year, or $1.34 a share, a year earlier.  Sales rose 14% to $290.8 million from $255.1 million a year ago.  Clairvoyant Computer  Would Even Zap TV Ads  SOME BIG-NAME designers in the computer industry are trying to turn their technology loose on such products as television sets, videocassette recorders and compact-disk players.  The project -- started by the founder of Frogdesign, which did the industrial design for Steve Jobs's Next work station -- aims to produce a home-entertainment system with much higher-quality television.  The system would also contain a Sparc processor and four to eight megabytes of memory -- giving it the power of some Sun Microsystems work stations.  That power would be used to control related devices such as VCRs, stereos and compact-disk players, and make them easier to use.  For example, someone programming a VCR would guide the image of a tiny hand on a screen to a TV listing, then grab the program with the hand and drop it into a representation of a VCR.  Some people who have seen early versions say they include a feature that would be sure to stir up controversy: The computer watches for signals that networks send affiliate stations to alert them to the beginning and end of commercials, enabling the VCR to tape shows while skipping ads.  "The technology is very extreme," says Hartmut Esslinger, the Frogdesign founder who initiated the project and formed Frox Inc., Campbell, Calif., to pursue it.  He says he has been working on the project for two years and has 25 people assigned to it.  But he declines to discuss technical details because the product needs more work and considerable financing to become reality.  Whatever happens, the list of those involved is impressive.  Besides Mr. Esslinger, there is Andy Hertzfeld, one of the designers of Apple Computer Inc.'s original Macintosh, and Andreas Bechtolsheim, the hardware expert in the group that founded Sun.  Computer for Disabled  Reacts to Human Voice  IF A BLIND person says, "Charlie, please read me the newspaper," the voice that responds may now be electronic.  Transceptor Technologies Inc., Ann Arbor, Mich., recently started shipping a computer for the disabled called Personal Companion.  The user trains the machine to recognize his voice by reciting some standard phrases.  He also gives the machine a name, which he must use when telling the computer to do something.  The computer automatically dials an 800 number at 4 a.m. every day and, so to speak, picks up the morning paper -- only USA Today at the moment, but Transceptor says it hopes to have more papers available soon.  If the machine is hooked up to an apartment's central wiring system, a disabled person can use it to turn appliances on or off and to dial the telephone.  Software also lets the user store phone numbers -- so he can just say, "Call Mom."  There are limitations, mainly because speech-recognition technology is still so crude that the computer at the heart of the system can handle just a small number of words in each application.  That means, for instance, that to get the score on a Pirates baseball game, a user would have to ask for the paper to be read, wait as the various sections were listed, say "yes" when the sports section was mentioned, and then wait until the computer read the headline for the Pirates game.  Electronic Cargo Data  May Speed Up Customs  THE U.S. CUSTOMS Service thinks it can shorten the lines for clearing customs -- at least for businesses.  Customs is testing the possibility of letting businesses use an electronic data interchange standard called Edifact to transmit electronically all the necessary information on a shipment as soon as a cargo plane takes off.  If Customs tentatively decides not to inspect the shipment, as happens 98% of the time, it sends back an approval, and the shipment can sail through.  At the moment, lengthy documents have to be written out by hand after a shipment lands, and processing them can take hours.  If that means the shipment misses a connecting flight, cargo can be delayed at least a day.  A limited amount of information about shipments already can be sent electronically, but Edifact would significantly increase the volume of data.  Edifact will still need fine-tuning at some international negotiating sessions, mainly to broaden the standard to cover more types of information.  "There is a potential for a great deal of time saving," says Mark S. Campbell, corporate customs manager at Texas Instruments Inc.  He says the electronic transmission also will mean less recopying of documents, reducing the number of errors and saving money.  Device Links Faxing  And Laser Printing  HYBRID FAX Inc., Dallas, has started selling a device that hooks up to a laser printer and lets it receive faxes.  The main benefit is that laser printers use regular paper and produce much better copies than normal fax machines.  The new product also shows how fax technology is mutating to let the machines fit better into computer networks.  The Hybrid device facilitates automatic distribution of faxes throughout a personal-computer network.  Hybrid's two-inch-wide device costs $1,195, compared with the $5,000 or more price tag for a fax machine with a laser printer as the engine.  The technology isn't all the way there, though: Hybrid's device can only receive faxes, not send them.  In addition, the price is still higher than many people will go for when they can buy a regular fax machine for a few hundred dollars.  Ivaco Inc. said it plans to sell or close three North American units and announced a joint venture in Poland.  The Montreal maker of steel and steel products hopes to sell two of the units, ArrowHead Metals in Toronto and Capital Wire & Fence in Baltimore.  Ivaco said ArrowHead, which employs 400, incurred "substantial losses" over the past several years, but declined to elaborate.  Ivaco said it formed a joint venture with Foreign Trade Enterprise Universal Ltd., of Warsaw, Poland, to make 50,000 metric tons of nails annually at a plant in Poland.  Ivaco said most of the manufacturing equipment for the venture will come from Ivaco's Florida Wire and Nail unit in Quincy, Fla., which will be closed.  Tidewater Inc. said Irwin Jacobs and a group of long-term investors that sought on two occasions to acquire the company have agreed to sell their 20.6% stake.  The offshore marine services concern said the agreement includes a standstill clause that could keep the Jacobs group from buying Tidewater shares for as long as five years.  The group offered this year to acquire the Tidewater shares it didn't own for $9.50 each.  The bid, later raised to $11 a share, or an indicated value of $182.4 million, was rejected.  A few years ago, the Jacobs group made what the company describes as a "very soft" bid that was also rebuffed, a Tidewater spokesman said.  Mr. Jacobs, who is chairman of Minstar Inc., a Minneapolis marine and recreational vehicles concern, couldn't be reached for comment.  Although the Jacobs group could collect $41 million from the sale of the shares, Wall Street analysts estimate that Mr. Jacobs and associates have had a loss on their approximately 5 1/2-year investment.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Tidewater's common fell 62.5 cents to close at $9.125 a share.  Mr. Jacobs "played out his hand," said James Carroll, an analyst with PaineWebber Inc.  "He created a lot of takeover speculation within the company, and the speculation pushed the stock above its intrinsic value.  This is a good price from which he could exit."  Tidewater said the agreement calls for the group to sell its 4.6 million shares through underwriters within 60 days.  If unsold, the shares will be offered through a shelf registration during a second 60-day term, the company said.  A standstill agreement calls for the Jacobs group to refrain from buying Tidewater shares for specified periods -- some as long as five years -- depending on how many shares the group sells, the company said.  Tidewater also said the Jacobs group would give up its two board seats if it sells three-quarters of its stake.  Canadian consumer confidence fell sharply in the second quarter, partly because of Canada's comparatively high interest rates, Conference Board of Canada said.  The board, which does quarterly surveys of consumer sentiment, said its index of Canadian consumer attitudes in the April-June period dropped more than 24 points to 83.8, its lowest level since 1982.  "Such a large deterioration in optimism typically signals significant cutbacks in discretionary consumer spending," the board said.  The board is an economic research and advisory organization.  "With interest rates remaining high, employment growth slowing and contractionary {federal and provincial} government budgets delivered in the second quarter, the consumer has fallen into a somber mood," the board said.  Short-term Canadian interest rates are almost four percentage points higher than comparable U.S. rates.  MCA Inc. was a proud papa over the weekend as its Universal unit's "Parenthood" enjoyed a second weekend as the top-grossing film -- edging out "The Abyss" by the Fox Inc. unit of News Corp.  The Universal comedy grossed $9.7 million on 1,300 screens, according to the studio, compared with $9.3 million on 1,533 screens for "The Abyss," an expensive-to-make and hard-to-market film that Fox had hoped would benefit from a weekend No. 1 rating.  The second week of success for "Parenthood" means audiences are telling their friends to see it, word-of-mouth that should keep the film playing robustly into the fall.  Fox, which had been a wallflower at this summer's box office party, did get a respectable showing out of its undersea adventure.  Nevertheless, it loses the valuable psychological impact of winning the top box office spot at its opening, and can't afford much of a drop-off this coming weekend if it is to squeeze profits from the movie.  The weekend tally brings the total gross for the first days of "The Abyss," which opened Wednesday, to $13 million.  In releasing these figures, Fox was quick to point out that revenue would have been greater if the film weren't over two hours long, cutting down on the number of shows theaters could run.  "Parenthood" dropped only 8% from its opening weekend.  "That's almost the minimum that any picture will drop, and it indicates they're in for a long run," says John Krier, president of Exhibitor Relations Co., which analyzes box office data.  With "Parenthood," Universal continues to quietly keep its head above water in the box office sweepstakes.  Although it trails Warner, Paramount, Disney and Columbia/Tri-Star in overall market share, lower-profile pictures like "Field of Dreams" and "Do the Right Thing" have shown staying power.  With "Back to the Future II" and Steven Spielberg's "Always" due later this year, Universal could be right up there with the purveyors of "Batman" and other splashy summer films.  New Line Cinema's "A Nightmare on Elm Street, Part V: The Dream Child" managed third place, or $8.2 million, in its opening weekend, a disappointing finish for this fourth sequel.  Its predecessor last summer grossed $12.8 million in its opening weekend on fewer screens.  Films in this series have tended to open with a bang, then taper off fairly quickly: The past weekend indicates that "Parenthood" is appealing not only to baby boomers but to "Nightmare's" young male audience as well.  Elsewhere, "Batman" opened in the U.K., pulling in 18.7% more in ticket revenue than any other film in its British opening weekend, according to Warner Bros.  Chase Manhattan Bank said its Delaware affiliate agreed to purchase about $36 million in credit-card accounts from Leader Federal Bank for Savings of Tennessee.  Chase, a unit of New York-based Chase Manhattan Corp., said the Visa and MasterCard accounts represent only a portion of Leader Federal's credit-card portfolio.  Earlier this year, the affiliate, Chase Manhattan Bank (USA), purchased credit-card accounts from Independence One Bank of Rapid City, S.D., a unit of Michigan National Corp., and from Meritor Financial Group of Philadelphia.  This year's acquisitions total more than 1.2 million accounts with more than $1.2 billion in loans outstanding, and bring Chase's credit-card portfolio to eight million accounts totaling more than $8 billion.  McDonnell Douglas Corp. received Navy contracts of $489.5 million for 40 F-18 aircraft for Kuwait and $29.1 million for 17 F-18 aircraft for Spain.  The company was also awarded a $16.6 million Air Force contract for modification kits for F-15 fighters.  Aerojet Solid Propulsion Co., a unit of GenCorp Inc., received a $191.8 million Air Force contract for full-scale engineering development for the MX mobile missile system.  Honeywell Inc. was issued a $164 million Air Force contract for support of the world-wide military command and control unit information system.  SCI Technology Inc. got a $30.4 million Air Force contract for non-secured digital voice terminals.  Martin Marietta Corp. was awarded a $25 million Air Force contract for low-altitude navigation and targeting equipment.  National Heritage Inc. said it plans to spin off its nursing-home management business to shareholders by issuing a dividend of one share of the new company for each six National Heritage shares owned.  The company previously said it would spin off its medical products and retirement-center management unit to shareholders on Sept. 14.  The spinoff of that company into National Heritage Medical Resources Inc. has been opposed by Southmark Corp., which owns 62.5% of National Heritage.  Southmark has tried to change National Heritage's bylaws through a consent solicitation so that National Heritage can't restructure.  A Southmark spokeswoman said that Southmark will "take whatever remedies are available" to stop the spinoffs because it believes that they aren't in shareholders' best interest.  Southmark said it opposes the spinoffs because it believes National Heritage will issue large numbers of shares to employee stock ownership plans at the new companies, diluting current shareholders.  However, National Heritage last week won a temporary restraining order from a federal judge in Atlanta preventing a Southmark unit from enforcing its consent solicitation.  A hearing on that order is expected this week.  In addition, a U.S. bankruptcy judge refused to enjoin National Heritage from restructuring, saying the issue wasn't within his jurisdiction.  Southmark is operating under protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code while it tries to work out a plan to pay its debts.  Under its plan, National Heritage would spin about three-fourths of its assets into National Heritage Medical Resources and the remainder would be spun off as National Heritage Healthcare Management Inc.  After the spinoffs, National Heritage Inc. wouldn't have any active businesses and would be liquidated, it said.  Brae Corp. said it agreed to sell its railcar leasing and management operations to GE Capital Railcar Services, a unit of GE Capital, for $126.3 million in cash plus the assumption of certain lease obligations.  Brae said it estimates that, based upon June 30 balances, it will record a $9.4 million pretax gain from this sale and will also report an income tax credit of about $6 million related to the transaction.  GE Capital is a unit of General Electric Co.  Separately, the San Francisco electronic and transportation equipment leasing concern posted a second-quarter loss of $368,000, compared with year-ago net income of $793,000, or nine cents a share.  Revenue slid 23% to $13 million from $17 million.  For the six months, Brae posted a loss of $117,000 compared with a loss of $541,000 a year ago.  Revenue declined 10% to $27.8 million from $30.9 million.  Hunt Manufacturing Co. said steelworkers at its Florence, Ky., plant went on strike at 12:01 a.m. EDT yesterday, when their contract expired and negotiations reached an impasse.  Although all production has stopped, the office supply and crafts producer said shipping, warehousing, and receiving operations continue under employees who are not part of the striking bargaining unit, United Steelworkers of America Local No. 14289, which represents 94 employees.  The Florence plant is one of two Hunt facilities that manufacture and distribute Lit-Ning brand office products, which include metal desk organizers, office files and furniture.  Management said it feels confident that the strike will not disrupt service to customers.  "It will have some impact because we have an idle facility," said Rudolph M. Peins Jr., senior vice president for finance and administration.  "But at this point we believe we'll be able to maintain continuity of service."  The contract issues in dispute weren't detailed, and although the union and management are in communication, Mr. Peins said, no formal meetings have been set.  Golden Nugget Inc. reported a loss of $8.4 million for the second quarter against a loss of $6.8 million a year earlier.  The Las Vegas, Nev., casino company reported operating revenue of $65.3 million, up 62% from $40.3 million for the 1988 quarter.  The results for the latest period include $29.7 million in net non-operating expenses, which include higher interest expense from the company's Mirage resort being built along the Strip and the April 1989 financing by units operating its downtown Golden Nugget casino.  Expenses also include a non-cash charge of $11.1 million related to amendments under the company's executive retirement plan, in which Golden Nugget issued 935,628 restricted common shares to certain executives in lieu of their receiving $16.5 million in future cash payments under the plan.  In the year-earlier quarter, the loss resulted mainly from financing charges for the Mirage and a $6.9 million judgment and other expenses from a lawsuit by the trustees of the Central States, Southeast and Southwest Areas Pension Fund.  For the six months, Golden Nugget reported net income of $1.7 million, or nine cents a share, against a loss of $2.8 million a year earlier.  Operating revenue was $115.1 million, up 39% from $82.9 million a year earlier.  Tosco Corp. elected one of its directors, Thomas D. O'Malley, to the post of president beginning Oct. 1 and to the additional positions of chairman and chief executive officer beginning at year end.  Mr. O'Malley, 48 years old, succeeds Clarence G. Frame, 70, who intends to retire by year end from the oil refining company.  Mr. O'Malley, a former Salomon Inc. vice chairman, is a principal in Argus Energy L.P., a Stamford, Conn., investment partnership and Tosco's largest shareholder.  Argus holds 23.5% of Tosco's shares on a fully diluted basis.  Mr. Frame will continue as a Tosco director.  Tosco last year had net income of $90.4 million, or $1.32 a share.  Five years earlier, the company had a loss of $378.1 million.  Over the same period, its long-term debt has been cut to $166.3 million from $804.5 million.  This improved financial position has attracted a number of major holders, including Argus Energy.  Australia awarded a contract to build at least eight frigates valued at 3.5 billion Australian dollars (US$2.66 billion) to Australian Marine Engineering Consolidated Ltd., or Amecon, a company controlled by closely held Transfield Holdings Pty.  Blohm & Voss AG, of West Germany, designed the frigates and will take a significant financial interest in Amecon, an official of the Australian company said.  Australian Defense Minister Kim Beazley said the government will sign a contract with Amecon to build 10 ships, with options to vary the number to either eight or 12.  That leaves the way open for New Zealand to join the so-called Anzac frigates project.  New Zealand hasn't yet decided on participating, although Australia has said relations between the two countries will suffer unless the Wellington government goes ahead with a previous plan to buy four of the frigates for its navy.  The frigates will be built at Williams town, near Melbourne, and at Newcastle, near Sydney.  The first is expected to be delivered to the Australian navy in the fiscal year ending June 30, 1996, and the rest at the rate of one a year.  Australian and New Zealand industry will get 80% of the work.  European companies expected to win major subcontracts include Thorn EMI PLC, Siemens AG, Nobel Industries AB's Bofors Electronics unit and Telefon AB L.M. Ericsson.  Heinz C. Prechter, chairman of ASC Inc., Southgate, Mich., said he lowered his stake in Wynn's International Inc. to 4.77% of the common shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Mr. Prechter said he sold 4,000 shares on Aug. 4 for $26.75 and 11,000 shares on Aug. 8 for $26.841 each, resulting in a lowering in his holdings to 180,000 shares.  Mr. Prechter didn't give a reason in the filing for reducing his stake in the Fullerton, Calif., company.  A spokesman for Wynn's said the company, which produces certain automotive products, had no further information on Mr. Prechter's filing.  Standard & Poor's Corp. said it raised its rating to double-A-minus from single-A-plus on about $30 million of the company's subordinated debt.  The rating concern said the insurance broker's 1988 net income was inflated by a large gain from the sale of its investment in Minet Holdings PLC, a London-based insurance company.  ---  FRANK B. HALL & Co. -- Moody's Investors Service Inc. lowered the ratings on the insurance brokerage company's subordinated notes to Caa from single-B-3 and on its cumulative convertible preferred stock to Ca from Caa.  The rating firm attributed its actions, which affect $75 million in notes and $50 million of preferred, to Hall's losses from discontinued operations, negative net worth and contingent liabilities.  ---  IMPERIAL CORP. OF AMERICA -- Moody's Investors Service Inc. lowered the rating for long-term deposits of Imperial Savings Association, the main unit of this San Diego, Calif.-based thrift holding company, to single-B-3 from single-B-2.  The move stemmed from continued weakness in the bulk-purchased consumer-loan portfolio, the rating company said.  ---  WASHINGTON MUTUAL SAVINGS BANK (Seattle) -- Standard & Poor's Corp. said it raised its rating on certificates of deposit to triple-B minus/A-3 from double-B/single-B.  The bank's subordinate debenture rating was raised to double-B plus from single-B plus, the rating agency said.  About $60 million of debt was affected by the change, which was attributed to the company's strong capital levels, reduced exposure to interest rate risk and strong market presence, offset by higher than average levels of nonperforming assets, S&P said.  Core profitability is expected to improve, reflecting reduced overhead and an anticipated decline in nonperforming assets, S&P added.  Atari Corp. said second-quarter profit plunged 94% to $327,000, or one cent a share.  The maker of personal computers and video games cited a drain from depressed video-game sales and currency-rate fluctuations.  In the year-earlier quarter, Atari posted net of $5.6 million, or 10 cents a share, after a $2.3 million charge from the discontinued operations of Federated Group.  There was no such charge in the current period.  Sales in the period fell 19% to $82.7 million from $102.5 million.  Sam Tramiel, president and chief executive officer, said in a statement that U.S. video-game sales continued to be depressed by a foreign competitor "now the subject of litigation" -- an apparent reference to Nintendo Co., the dominant video-game manufacturer being sued by Atari for alleged monopolistic practices.  Atari officers weren't available to comment further on the company's performance.  Nintendo is believed to enjoy an 80% share of the U.S. market for video games.  For the six months, Atari's net fell 68% to $3.6 million, or six cents a share, from $11.2 million, or 19 cents a share.  The year-earlier quarter reflected a charge of $11.7 million related to Federated Group.  Sales fell 15% to $171.5 million from $200.8 million.  Atari described as "very encouraging" the initial marketplace response to the company's hand-held personal computer, Portfolio.  The company also said it intends to begin volume shipments of its new, hand-held, color-game system, Lynx, in the fourth quarter.  Datapoint Corp. said Michael M. Michigami, 42 years old, was named president, chief executive officer and a director of this maker of computer systems, succeeding Robert J. Potter.  Datapoint said Mr. Potter resigned to pursue other interests.  Mr. Potter declined to comment on why he left the company and said he doesn't yet know what he will be doing.  However, he said he believes Datapoint "is well positioned for the future and I sincerely hope the company prospers."  Mr. Potter was brought in to turn around Datapoint in 1987 by Datapoint Chairman Asher B. Edelman.  His predecessor, Doris D. Bencsik, already had taken write-downs and reduced the work force by about a third, and Mr. Potter continued the work.  Datapoint posted a profit for the year ended July 30, 1988, its first annual profit in several years.  In the latest year, however, the company's results ran in the red again.  In the third quarter, Datapoint had a net loss of $21.3 million, including an $11.1 million charge from reducing the work force again and a $5.5 million write-down of inventory and software products.  For the nine months, it had a loss of $20.3 million on revenue of $233.6 million.  Mr. Michigami said his agenda includes restoring the company to profitability and moving it into more global markets.  He previously was president of the Control Systems division of United Technologies Corp.  Rozanne L. Ridgway, recently retired U.S. assistant secretary of state for European and Canadian affairs, was named a director of this maker of tapes and adhesives, among other things.  The election increases the size of the board to 15 directors.  Russell G. Cleary, former chairman, president and chief executive officer of G. Heileman Brewing Co., was named a director of this franchisee of Chi-Chi's Mexican restaurants.  The move increases the size of the board to seven directors.  First it was the Plaza Hotel.  Then it was the Eastern Shuttle.  And now the Trumps want to own the name Ivana.  Ivana Trump, wife of New York developer Donald Trump, filed suit in federal court in Manhattan to prevent a Nyack, N.Y., cosmetics company from selling Ivana lipstick.  The lawsuit says the name Ivana is widely associated with Mrs. Trump's business dealings, and that Pavion Ltd.'s Ivana lipstick is "an attempt to capitalize on {Mrs.} Trump's celebrity status."  The lawsuit, which seeks damages of at least $10 million, also says that Mrs. Trump is using the name for her own line of perfume.  Mrs. Trump's attorney, James David Jacobs, said the lipstick planned by Pavion is a violation of New York state law because it is an unauthorized commercial exploitation of a celebrity name.  "If you are promoting a product using a name that trades off another person's fame and personality, you can't get away with it," Mr. Jacobs said.  Stanley Acker, Pavion president, said his firm didn't intend to trade on Mrs. Trump's name.  "Revlon is an oddball name, Pavion is an oddball name, Ivana is an oddball name," he said.  "The name had nothing to do with her."  Mr. Acker said he tried to adopt the name Ivana as a trademark in 1987.  But U.S. Patent Office proceedings in that matter were stalled when Mrs. Trump filed an objection to his plans.  Mr. Jacobs said the lawsuit should resolve the trademark dispute.  Mr. Acker said that neither the lipstick nor Mrs. Trump's perfume is on the market yet.  Mr. Jacobs said he doesn't know whether the perfume is being sold at this time.  Healthcare International Inc. said it expects to report a loss for its fourth quarter ended June 30 and said it couldn't make a regular quarterly $2-a-share dividend on its Series B cumulative preferred stock.  The company also said that a Merrill Lynch Capital Markets affiliate has suspended issuing commercial paper backed by the company's receivables, a move that could worsen Healthcare's already serious cash crunch.  To ease the crunch, the owner and operator of health care facilities said it is in "substantive negotiations" to sell certain facilities.  It said it also is negotiating with others for an equity investment in the company and to sell certain investments.  Further, it said it hopes to raise more than $10 million by selling and leasing back medical equipment it owns.  The company said it expects to report a pre-tax $5.6 million loss from operations for the fourth quarter and said it also is considering write-downs on facilities that it might sell.  While it didn't estimate the size of the write-downs, it said it expects the net loss for the quarter to be large enough to more than wipe out the $22.5 million in stockholders' equity it had at March 31.  For the fiscal 1988 fourth quarter, Healthcare posted net income of $1.4 million, or 16 cents a share.  It said it expects to report revenue of $77 million for the fourth quarter just ended, up about 2.8% from the year-earlier $74.9 million.  The company attributed its troubles to high cash needs associated with opening new facilities and to difficulties at its acute care hospitals and some psychiatric facilities in competitive markets.  Because of the cash bind, it said it wasn't able to declare the regular dividend on its 40,902 Series B preferred shares that was due Aug. 3.  It also missed a $4 million lease payment due Aug. 1 to HealthVest, an affiliate.  Healthcare has until Aug. 28 to make that payment to avoid defaulting under its lease and mortgage agreements with HealthVest.  Vestron Inc. said it expects to post a sizable second-quarter loss and a substantial decline in revenue resulting from a previously announced restructuring of its operations.  The company said the loss mainly reflects major film-asset write-downs as part of the restructuring announced last June.  Vestron wasn't more specific about the anticipated loss.  In the year-earlier second quarter, the company had net of $4.3 million, or 11 cents a share, on revenue of $93 million.  Vestron's restructuring was prompted by a tight cash situation that resulted from Security Pacific National Bank's termination of a $100 million credit line last October.  "That termination led to the suspension of a debt-securities offering that had been undertaken and severely impaired the company's ability to secure adequate alternative financing," the company said in a statement.  The restructuring involves the curtailment of Vestron's feature-film production, distribution and acquisition activities.  Vestron's domestic home-video distribution business remains unchanged, and the development of motion-picture projects continues on a selective basis, the company said.  Last month, Vestron authorized Merrill Lynch Capital Markets to explore various alternatives, including merger or sale of all or part of the company.  Vestron said those alternatives continue to be pursued by its investment banker.  Vestron also said it completed a one-year, $65 million revolving credit arrangement, which was announced last July, with Chemical Bank and Credit Lyonnais Bank Nederland.  The agreement, which replaces a $50 million credit proposal of last April, includes the right to extend as much as $15 million of the loan for an additional six months.  The new credit line will be used to refinance or repay certain existing senior debt, including a $25 million note to Wells Fargo Bank, and for working capital.  The loan agreement also allows Vestron to repurchase a limited amount of its 9% convertible subordinated debentures.  Separately, Credit Lyonnais will provide Vestron with a one-year, $15 million credit, which will replace a recently provided short-term working-capital loan, Vestron said.  Engineer Jerry Tippe revs up the GP-38 diesel locomotive and we trundle uptrack a ways to be switched across to a loading ramp.  There double-decker rail cars just loaded with Jeeps from Chrysler's nearby Toledo assembly plant are waiting.  Conductor Ron Worthington, communicating with Jerry by hand-held radio, connects us with a string of four cars and we move them to a siding for pickup by Conrail, which will make them part of a train heading for Pittsburgh at 4 p.m.  Such is a morning in the life of the Ann Arbor Railroad, which is lucky to be alive at all after what it has been through over the past decade.  It is not only alive, but beginning to prosper.  It is one of the several hundred short lines that have resulted from Staggers act reorganization of the nation's railroad system.  With just 50 miles of main line from Toledo to Ann Arbor, it is only a stub of the 300-mile railroad it was 20 years ago.  But it is making money.  Its employees, now non-union, seem happy despite the fact that Mr. Tippe and Mr. Worthington are doing a job that under union work rules once required as much as a five-man crew.  "It's nice to have only two bosses," says Mr. Worthington, meaning the two men who run the railroad and, with a third partner, own it outright.  Because it is so little encumbered with red tape, the Ann Arbor can get Chrysler's Jeeps loaded and out onto a trunk line in a single shift, an achievement even in this age of more efficient and competitive railroading.  A bankruptcy trustee, Clark Durant III, put the Ann Arbor back on its feet, extracted it from the coils of state bureaucracy and finally sold it to its management last year.  It now has emerged from Chapter 11, and its prospects seem good.  The AA was an orphan of the railroad storms caused by excessive federal regulation and management misjudgments in the early 1970s.  It was a Penn-Central subsidiary when that great corporate tangle was dumped into the hands of the federal government and became Conrail.  Even the feds, despite political pressure to retain uneconomic routes, didn't like the looks of its money-losing operations, mainly a 250-mile route from Ann Arbor northwestward to connect with its car ferries across Lake Michigan to Kewaunee and Manitowoc, Wis.  To forestall abandonment, the state of Michigan took control of the entire road in 1976.  But in 1982, a dispute over subsidies erupted between the state and a company called Michigan Interstate, which was operating the road.  To cut huge losses, Michigan Interstate shut down the northern operations and laid off 300 employees.  In early 1983, the road filed for Chapter 11.  Mr. Durant's enthusiastic support for Ronald Reagan may have helped get him on the list of choices for trustee.  He now is campaigning for the Republican nomination for U.S. Senate, which most likely will pit him against incumbent Democrat Carl Levin next year.  "The bankruptcy judge asked me if I really wanted to do it, because it looked like a hopeless situation," recalls Mr. Durant.  "We had $43,000 in the bank.  We were to soon have close to $100 million in labor and vendor claims filed against the property.  The track was in horrible shape.  The morale was horrible.  The relationship with the state of Michigan had deteriorated, which is why the bankruptcy came about."  But Mr. Durant, a practicing attorney, took the job.  Ultimately he decided a management change was necessary, which meant firing a large and formidable CEO named Vincent M. Malanaphy, who reputedly had once driven his fist through a wall during a dispute at the Detroit, Toledo 7& Ironton.  "I had to let Vince go.  It was a hard decision to make and execute.  Here was a man as old as my father who was a 43% shareholder, who had a lot of clout in a number of different circles.  I didn't know what would happen if I let him go but I knew I had to let him go if I was to restore harmony with the state and with my employees.  I went up to Owosso, where the headquarters was then.  I took with me a lawyer, the head of security and the vice president of operations, and let him go.  That was a turning point."  The Ann Arbor at that time had contracts with 14 unions, but had only 48 employees.  Some of the unions represented no one.  Mr. Durant nonetheless got off on a good footing with the railroad brotherhoods and encountered little serious resistance when the road went non-union.  Negotiations with the state were something else.  Finally, Mr. Durant told the state that the only solution was to sell the railroad and settle up with the creditors.  The successful bidders were Michael J. Barron, the CEO Mr. Durant had selected; senior vice president Patrick J. O'Meara, and Stephen J. Linsenmeyer, a Monroe, Mich., real estate man.  They paid $6 million, which enabled Mr. Durant to settle all allowed claims at 100 cents to the dollar.  "Pat and Mike" are two professional railroaders who had worked in marketing on major roads.  Mr. Linsenmeyer says he was attracted to the deal by his confidence in the two executives and by his knowledge of real estate possibilities of Ann Arbor properties.  The owners got a seven-year $7 million loan from Irving Trust to further improve the property, which Mr. Durant already had upgraded with the aid of a $2.5 million federal loan -- now repaid -- and a $500,000 state grant.  Some $1 million of the Irving Trust loan has been repaid as well.  How did Mr. Barron feel about putting his savings into such a venture?  "Every once in a while I think I could come a cropper.  But if you look at major railroads today, there's tremendous upheaval at the Santa Fe, the CNW, the CSX. I've seen careers ended by a Wall Street move.  The way Pat and Mike look at it, we're pretty good at what we do and we know we'll do well.  Why not do it for ourselves?  Yes, there's a risk but there is just as big a risk hanging on with a big corporation.  This way, if you make it it'll mean a little personal wealth.  If you don't you go somewhere else.  "In our society, that Chinese cultural revolution is not new.  It has been going on since the 1800s.  If you recognize it, you do what you have to do.  I take a risk, but it's no more risk than going to work for General Motors."  Quite possibly, that's all true.  Since building the Chrysler ramp, the Ann Arbor has boosted the number of rail cars it handles there to 5,000 a year from 3,500.  The Ann Arbor has a strategic location, in that four major trunk lines, the CSX, Conrail, Norfolk Southern and Canadian Pacific's Grand Trunk Western, cross its line.  So shippers who originate freight with the Ann Arbor have a choice of four trunks, with a possibility of getting competitive bidding.  Mr. Barron plans to exploit the carrier's strategic location.  How do the Ann Arbor's veteran employees feel about their little, non-union railroad?  "Morale is pretty good," says Mr. Tippe.  Quite possibly a recent profit-sharing bonus helped.  "We don't have an elegant formula," says Mr. Barron.  "We said we think everyone's entitled to a share, so here's a check.  Next year, if we do well, there may be a bigger check."  Is this any way to run a railroad?  Could be.  The U.S. Export-Import bank said it will guarantee a $12.7 million loan by Chase Manhattan Bank to a steel producer in Colombia to buy a used steel wire rod mill from USX Corp.  Chase Manhattan Bank is a unit of Chase Manhattan Corp., of New York.  Acerias Pas Del Rio S.A., of Bogota, is buying the reconditioned Chicago mill, which USX closed in 1981.  The Ex-Im Bank said the mill, originally built in 1974, will be dismantled, rehabilitated, upgraded and reassembled in Colombia, where it will replace an outdated rod mill operated by Acerias.  Several U.S. companies will supply engineering services and new machinery and parts for the project, the Ex-Im Bank said.  The total cost of the upgraded rod mill will be about $16.8 million.  Mercury Asset Management Ltd. of London said it purchased 170,000 shares of Max & Erma's Restaurants Inc., raising its stake in the company to 6.8% of the common shares outstanding.  A spokesman for Max & Erma's, a restaurant chain based in Columbus, Ohio, said the company is attempting to contact the British company.  The spokesman added: "To the best of our knowledge, they're purely passive, long-term investors.  We are attempting to reach them to say hello, introduce ourselves and talk."  Mercury Asset, which manages portfolios for investment clients, purchased the shares between May 9 and July 24, according to a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  The filing added that the shares were acquired for investment purposes at $5.625 to $7.25 each.  Yesterday, in national over-the-counter trading, Max & Erma's stock closed at $7.25, unchanged.  Friday, August 11, 1989  Following is a weekly listing of unaudited net asset values of publicly traded investment fund shares, reported by the companies as of Friday's close.  Also shown is the closing listed market price or a dealer-to-dealer asked price of each fund's shares, with the percentage of difference.  @ Stock N.A. Stock %  @ Fund Name Exch.  Value Price Diff.  @ Diversified Common Stock Funds  @ Adams Express NYSE 19.37 16 3/8 - 15.46  @ Baker Fentress NYSE 28.64 23 7/8 - 16.64  @ Blue Chip Value NYSE 8.38 7 1/8 - 14.98  @ Clemente Global Gro NYSE b10.59 8 3/8 - 20.92  @ Gemini II Capital NYSE 20.68 17 1/4 - 16.59  @ Gemini II Income NYSE 9.70 12 7/8 + 32.73  @ General Amer Invest NYSE 21.87 18 1/4 - 16.55  @ Growth Stock Outlook NYSE 10.37 9 1/2 - 8.39  @ Lehman Corp. NYSE 16.76 14 1/8 - 15.72  @ Liberty All-Star Eqty NYSE 9.84 8 - 18.70  @ Niagara Share Corp. NYSE 17.91 14 3/4 - 17.64  @ Nicholas-Applegate NYSE 11.17 9 3/8 - 16.07  @ Quest For Value Cap NYSE 17.22 12 5/8 - 26.68  @ Quest For Value Inco NYSE 11.75 12 5/8 + 7.45  @ Royce Value Trust NYSE 11.23 9 3/4 - 13.18  @ Schafer Value Trust NYSE 12.16 11 1/8 - 8.51  @ Source Capital NYSE 43.76 42 1/4 - 3.45  @ Tri-Continental Corp. NYSE z z z  @ Worldwide Value NYSE 21.58 17 3/4 - 17.75  @ Zweig Fund NYSE 11.57 11 7/8 + 2.64  @ Closed End Bond Funds  @ CIM High Yield Secs AMEX 8.98 8 1/2 - 5.35  @ Franklin Prin Mat Tr NYSE b9.24 10 1/8 + 9.58  @ Franklin Universal Tr NYSE b9.52 9 5/8 + 1.10  @ Municipal High Inco NYSE 9.63 10 + 3.84  @ Zenith Income Fund NYSE 8.47 9 3/8 + 10.68  @ Flexible Portfolio Funds  @ America's All Seasn OTC 5.86 5 - 14.68  @ America's All S Inco OTC 9.14 9 1/2 + 3.94  @ Zweig Total Return Fd NYSE 9.67 9 5/8 - 0.47  @ Specialized Equity and Convertible Funds  @ American Capital Conv NYSE 24.27 21 5/8 - 10.90  @ ASA Ltd NYSE bc61.04 42 3/8 - 30.58  @ Asia Pacific NYSE z z z  @ Bancroft Convertible AMEX 21.96 18 3/4 - 14.62  @ Bergstrom Capital AMEX 62.12 58 5/8 - 5.63  @ BGR Precious Metals TOR be11.78 10 3/8 - 11.93  @ Brazil NYSE 19.01 11 - 42.14  @ CNV Holdings Capital NYSE 10.60 5 - 52.83  @ CNV Holdings Income NYSE 9.50 12 + 26.32  @ Castle Convertible AMEX 22.57 19 - 15.82  @ Central Fund Canada AMEX b5.02 5 - 0.40  @ Central Securities AMEX 12.86 10 1/4 - 20.30  @ Couns Tandem Secs NYSE 12.47 10 1/4 - 17.80  @ Cypress Fund AMEX 11.09 9 7/8 - 10.96  @ Duff & Phelps Sel Utils NYSE 8.53 8 5/8 + 1.11  @ Ellsw Conv Gr & Inc AMEX 9.13 7 7/8 - 13.75  @ Engex AMEX 14.03 9 5/8 - 31.40  @ Financ'l News Compos NYSE 20.89 20 1/8 - 3.66  @ 1st Australia AMEX 10.59 8 5/8 - 18.56  @ First Financial Fund NYSE 11.60 11 - 5.17  @ First Iberian AMEX 10.03 8 3/4 - 12.76  @ France Fund NYSE b12.74 12 - 5.81  @ Gabelli Equity Trust NYSE 14.58 13 3/4 - 5.69  @ Germany Fund NYSE 9.80 9 1/8 - 6.89  @ H&Q Healthcare Inv NYSE 9.70 8 - 17.53  @ Hampton Utils Tr Cap AMEX b11.84 9 7/8 - 16.60  @ Hampton Utils Tr Pref AMEX b48.92 47 1/2 - 2.90  @ Helvetia Fund NYSE 12.96 11 1/8 - 14.16  @ India Growth Fund NYSE f13.17 13 3/4 + 4.40  @ Italy Fund NYSE b11.80 9 1/2 - 19.49  @ Korea Fund NYSE 18.24 35 5/8 + 95.31  @ Malaysia Fund NYSE 11.80 11 7/8 + 0.64  @ Meeschaert G & C MWSE 8.21 8 - 2.56  @ Mexico Fund NYSE b11.25 10 1/8 - 10.00  @ Morgan Grenf Sm Cap NYSE 10.58 9 1/8 - 13.75  @ Patriot Prem Div Fd NYSE 9.86 10 3/8 + 5.22  @ Petrol & Resources NYSE 29.84 25 1/4 - 15.38  @ Pilgrim Regional NYSE 11.23 9 7/8 - 12.07  @ Rl Estate Sec Inco Fd AMEX 8.73 8 3/4 + 0.23  @ Regional Fin Shrs Inv NYSE 9.78 8 7/8 - 9.25  @ ROC Taiwan Fund NYSE z z z  @ Scudder New Asia NYSE 14.57 11 1/8 - 23.64  @ Spain Fund NYSE 13.62 15 + 10.13  @ Taiwan Fund NYSE b14.12 15 5/8 + 10.66  @ TCW Convertible Secs NYSE b9.01 7 7/8 - 12.60  @ Templeton Em Mkts AMEX b12.16 11 3/8 - 6.46  @ Templeton Value Fund NYSE b10.73 9 1/2 - 11.46  @ Thai Fund NYSE 15.19 16 7/8 + 11.09  @ United Kingdom Fund NYSE 12.14 10 1/4 - 15.57  @ Z-Seven OTC 14.60 14 1/2 - 0.68  a-Ex-dividend. b-As of Thursday's close. c-Translated at Commercial Rand exchange rate. e-in Canadian dollars. f-As of Wednesday's close. z-Not available.  Friday, August 11, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9 1/16% high, 8 15/16% low, 8 15/ 16% near closing bid, 9% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.675% 26 to 48 days; 8.45% 49 to 59 days; 8.25% 60 to 89 days; 8% 90 to 119 days; 7.875% 120 to 149 days; 7.75% 150 to 179 days; 7.375% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.80% 30 days; 8.65% 60 days; 8.55% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.15% one month; 8.10% two months; 8.04% three months; 7.97% six months; 7.89% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.85% one month; 8.70% three months; 8.60% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.77% 30 days; 8.63% 60 days; 8.55% 90 days; 8.45% 120 days; 8.32% 150 days; 8.22% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% one month; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% two months; 8 3/4% to 8 5/8% three months; 8 11/16% to 8 9/16% four months; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% five months; 8 9/16% to 8 7/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 15/16% one month; 8 3/4% three months; 8 9/16% six months; 8 1/2% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August, 7, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.94% 13 weeks; 7.70% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.90%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.88%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.65%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.49%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Abbott Laboratories said Jack W. Schuler resigned as president and chief operating officer, citing "differences in philosophy" with Abbott's chairman and chief executive officer, Robert A. Schoellhorn.  An Abbott spokesman declined to elaborate.  Neither Mr. Schoellhorn nor Mr. Schuler could be reached for comment.  Abbott, a medical products concern, said Mr. Schoellhorn will assume the chief operating post immediately and that the board "is reviewing a number of organizational alternatives" before filling the president's position.  Mr. Schuler's departure makes him the third Abbott official to resign the chief operating job over differences with Abbott's strong-willed chairman.  The other two, James Vincent and G. Kirk Rabb, resigned in 1980 and 1985, respectively.  The departures of all three executives were at Mr. Schoellhorn's insistence and were the result of personality clashes, sources said.  On Friday, Mr. Schoellhorn, 61, presented Abbott's board with a "Schuler or me" ultimatum and the board reluctantly sided with the chairman, sources said.  Mr. Schuler's resignation comes at a time when Abbott is under fierce pressure from competitors seeking a piece of its lucrative infant formula market.  Similac, which is manufactured by Abbott's Ross Laboratories division, is the top-selling infant formula brand in the U.S., controlling about 54% of the market.  But the company has had to engage in heavy price cutting in the last year to stave off competition and maintain market share.  Analysts estimate that in 1987, Similac and other pediatric products accounted for nearly 40% of Abbott's operating earnings, but that more recently Abbott has had to rely on sales of its diagnostic and hospital supply products to bolster earnings.  Mr. Schoellhorn has set a rigid 15% annual earnings goal for Abbott and industry sources said he and Mr. Schuler may have clashed over how to maintain that goal in the face of the company's battle to retain its share of the infant formula market.  Mr. Schuler's departure could also provide Mr. Schoellhorn with a means to avoid Abbott's policy of mandatory retirement at 65, the sources said.  Abbott doesn't break out its earnings by segment, but for 1988 the company reported net income of $752 million, or $3.33 a share.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Abbott closed at $62.50 a share, down $1.  The announcement of Mr. Schuler's resignation came after the market's close.  CORPORATE PRINTING Co., New York, worked with Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. on the buy-out of RJR Nabisco Inc. earlier this year.  An earlier edition misidentified the printer.  (See: "Financial Printers Still Fight Red Ink Despite Market's Recovery From Crash" -- WSJ Aug. 11, 1989)  Circle K Corp. said a new strategy of raising prices at its convenience stores has improved profit margins, but some analysts doubted that it is enough to attract a buyer for the company, which put itself on the block this year.  Circle K disclosed the strategy, begun in the spring, in its annual report to the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Essentially, the Phoenix, Ariz., company decided to press its suppliers for lower prices and pass on any wholesale price increases to its customers, Circle K said.  A spokesman said the profit improvements, on both merchandise and gasoline sales, came in May and June.  He wouldn't speculate, however, "as to the profitability of the company" for its first quarter, ended July 31.  The company had a fourth-quarter loss of $23.1 million, after year-earlier net income of $14 million, or 29 cents a share.  Sales rose 39% to $931.3 million from $669.3 million.  But some analysts think the pricing strategy isn't the answer to Circle K's other problems, including a debt-laden balance sheet as a result of adding 1,060 stores this year.  In April, those acquisitions forced Circle K, the industry's second biggest convenience-store operator behind Southland Corp.'s 7-Eleven chain, to renegotiate a credit agreement with its banks.  The revised accord lowered the amount the company could borrow to $325 million from $500 million.  "I'm not sure of their ability to sustain that margin improvement," said Christopher Vroom, who follows Circle K for Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc. in Baltimore.  "Raising prices is never a long-term answer."  On the other hand, Circle K has stopped expanding and is "concentrating management's attention on shaping up the store base they now have," said Donald L. Cassidy, an analyst at Boettcher & Co. in Denver.  "Quite often when you do that, profits turn around; not overnight, but they do turn."  Karl Eller, Circle K's chairman and chief executive officer and owner of 7% of the company, has said he might pursue a leveraged buy-out.  Carl Lindner's American Financial Corp., a Cincinnati-based holding company, has also said it might attempt a buy-out.  Neither Mr. Eller nor Mr. Lindner, however, has come forward with a proposal.  Unless they make a move soon, Mr. Vroom expects more downward pressure on the stock price.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Circle K closed at $11.625 a share, down 87.5 cents.  "As time goes on and investors begin to doubt more and more management's ability to effect a transaction, the company will start to trade on its earnings," Mr. Vroom said.  "In that case, I wouldn't be surprised to see the stock in the $8 range."  Mr. Eller and Mr. Lindner weren't available for comment.  The Circle K spokesman pointed out that Mr. Eller's standstill agreement not to acquire more than 10% of the company expires Aug. 31.  SUN MICROSYSTEMS Inc.'s stock price showed a sharp decline in a table that appeared in a recent edition.  The table didn't indicate that a 2-for-1 stock split distributed in December 1988 accounted for much of the drop.  (See: "Technology & Medicine -- Corporate Focus: Sun Microsystems' Slump Has Endurance --- Internal Operations Problems Leave Firm Reeling" -- WSJ Aug. 11, 1989)  Chubb and a group of Midwest farmers will share in an $8 million settlement of a suit against Good Weather International Corp., an agent they claim sold more drought insurance than was authorized.  The parties reached a settlement Friday, minutes before a jury verdict was reached awarding $40 million to the farmers and nothing to Chubb.  Under the settlement, Chubb will receive about $3.7 million and the farmers a total of $4.3 million, a Chubb attorney said.  The jury had decided to award the farmers $20 million in compensatory damages for negligent misrepresentation and $20 million in punitive damages, said Stanley Chesley, an attorney for the farmers.  "It wouldn't have made any difference," Mr. Chesley declared.  "All they could collect was $8 million."  The settlement, which supersedes the jury verdict, will be paid by Fireman's Fund Corp., which held a policy of errors and omissions insurance for Good Weather.  Although Good Weather consented to an "entry of judgment" of $73 million, according to Mr. Sheehy, the Fireman's Fund policy had a liability limit of $8 million.  Good Weather "had no other assets," and $8 million was the limit on the insurance policy it had, said John J. Sheehy, the attorney for Chubb.  Mr. Sheehy said the $73 million entry of judgment allows Chubb and the farmers to collect if "let's say we found Good Weather had an interest in an oil well.  Then we'd seize that."  Mr. Sheehy said, "Good Weather exists, but they're just barely surviving."  The attorney said he didn't know whether Good Weather was still writing crop insurance, but he said "one thing you can be sure of {is that Chubb} will not be writing this kind of insurance" any more.  Chubb and the 8,800 farmers in the class had sought about $77 million in damages from Good Weather.  In addition, the farmers had sought $20 million plus punitive damages from the managing insurance agent, claiming the company oversold crop insurance before and during last summer's drought.  The dispute arose last summer when farmers, facing severe drought, applied for nearly $400 million in crop insurance when Chubb had planned to write only $40 million of coverage.  The dispute moved into the courts after Chubb began telling farmers their applications hadn't been accepted.  Chubb has asserted that Good Weather, acting as its agent, exceeded its authority in accepting a large volume of applications.  Last November, Chubb agreed to pay about $48 million to settle a suit by a group of farmers who were denied insurance against damage from last summer's drought.  That settlement was eventually adjusted to about $55 million, attorneys said.  According to Mr. Chesley, farmers who filed drought-related suits have received a total of about $81 million, including about $19 million in claims paid.  We here at the Worcester Foundation for Experimental Biology were pleased to read the July 20 entry in your Centennial Journal: 100 Years in Business, entitled "A Pill That Wasn't Difficult to Swallow, 1951."  The pioneering research of Gregory Pincus, M.C. Chang and their Worcester Foundation colleagues and its culmination in the development of the first oral contraceptive are a dramatic scientific success story.  As the historian Philip J. Pauly said recently (in "Controlling Life: Jacques Loeb and the Engineering Ideal in Biology"): "Gregory Pincus moved out of academia and into biotechnology."  It has been two years now since Matej Gaspar was born in Yugoslavia and was designated the world's five-billionth person by the United Nations Fund for Population Activities.  Overpopulation, together with continuing deterioration of the environment, threatens our fragile global village.  Yet research on population control is vastly underfunded, both by federal agencies (e.g. the National Institutes of Health) and by private foundations.  The Worcester Foundation is working now on a male contraceptive, aimed at inactivating the sperm cell's swimming machinery.  With hard work, and luck, we hope that we once again shall be able to contribute importantly to the problem of overpopulation.  Thoru Pederson  President and Scientific Director  Worcester Foundation for Experimental Biology  Shrewsbury, Mass.  Investors have struck gold in the Prospector Fund, but it's not quite what they were panning for.  The tiny gold fund has mailed shareholders more than $18 million in three distribution checks stemming from a bizarre fraud caper.  Nearly $1.5 million more will be on the way, says a recent shareholder letter.  The payouts are from a settlement of a class-action suit filed two years ago by holders in the $40 million asset fund.  The suit alleged that Prospector ran afoul of federal and state securities laws by violating its investment restrictions.  But the fund, it seems, also was victimized.  The culprits: Prospector's former portfolio manager, who a Canadian court found was bribed by two Canadian stock promoters to buy worthless stock on the Vancouver Stock Exchange that cost the fund about $16 million.  To get the money, the fund itself filed several civil lawsuits; tracking down assets involved detective work from the Bahamas to Britain.  Criminal charges by Canadian authorities also ensued.  "It has not been fun," says Clark Aylsworth, founder and former chairman of United Services Advisors Inc., the fund's adviser, in the shareholder letter.  The current lowdown: The fund's former manager, Carl Lazzell, is out of prison after serving a short sentence in Canada.  "As far as I know, {he} is residing in his home free as the breeze not too far from our offices" in San Antonio, Texas, says Mr. Aylsworth in the letter.  Mr. Lazzell, who was fired by the fund in 1985, couldn't be reached for comment.  One of the stock promoters, David Ward, is out on parole after a short jail term.  The other promoter, Edward Carter, filed for bankruptcy-law protection from creditors and is facing a separate criminal trial on the charges this fall.  Neither man could be reached for comment.  The approximately $18 million received by fund shareholders represents losses and interest, the fund says.  An additional $1.5 million in interest will be mailed in increments within three years.  Meanwhile, the fund -- which has been closed to new investors since late 1985 -- is considering reopening soon, United Services officials said.  The fund group manages 11 portfolios with a total of about $600 million in assets.  And what does the fund want investors to do with their checks?  "We hope that most of you will reinvest your recovered assets in one or more of the United Services funds," says the shareholder letter.  "We have enclosed a postage-paid envelope for your convenience."  In your July 19 Marketplace article "The Pitches and Pitfalls of Auto Leasing" there is a major omission.  You compare lease payments with purchase payments and come up with an apparent savings of $16,000 by leasing.  Unfortunately, you neglected the equity buildup of the purchased vehicle at the end of five years.  A five-year-old Mercedes 260 will have a wholesale value of at least $16,000, thus totally negating the indicated cost savings of $16,000 with the lease.  Stuart J. Dizak  Pittsford, N.Y.  Midwest Communications Corp. and Chyron Corp., Melville, N.Y., are exploring the possibility of a merger of the television-broadcasting-equipment concerns through a tax-free exchange of stock, the companies said.  The companies haven't decided on terms, including which would be the survivor, said David K. Barnes, Midwest president and chief executive officer.  Chyron stock closed Friday at $4, up 37.5 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading, and Midwest closed at $8.50, unchanged, in national over-the-counter trading.  Midwest, the larger concern, is a distributor of camera, video-recording and other broadcasting equipment, and also is an integrator that assembles most equipment systems needed by television stations and television-program producers.  Chyron manufactures graphics equipment, computer-assisted video, film and audio editing systems, and other equipment, some of which is distributed by Midwest.  Combination of the distribution strength of Midwest and the manufacturing capabilities of Chyron would produce a powerful concern, Mr. Barnes said.  Sales would exceed $200 million annually, the companies said.  In Melville, Chyron's chairman, president and chief executive, Alfred O.P. Leubert, said the company expects to report sales of just under $50 million for the year ended June 30.  "We didn't have any significant growth this year," he added, declining to estimate earnings.  In fiscal 1988, Chyron earned about $1.2 million, or 10 cents a share, on sales of about $46 million.  Chyron has engaged Janney Montgomery Scott Inc. as its investment banker, and Midwest expects to select an investment banker very soon, the companies said.  The investment bankers will explore the relative values of each company to help officers and directors of the two concerns in negotiating a stock-exchange ratio.  Midwest has about three million shares outstanding, Mr. Barnes said, and Chyron has more than 11 million.  Your July 10 editorial "Drifting to National Health" characterizes the National Health Service as "that great solution that nearly bankrupted England and brought health-care rationing. . . ."   No one familiar with the NHS would discount the problems.  But no one interested in accuracy would overlook the fact that Britain spends a far smaller proportion of gross national product on health care than we do.  Yet by the best measures available -- infant mortality and life expectancy -- Britain, like most other modern countries, is well ahead of us.  Nearly bankrupted by the health service?  Haven't you noticed that the United Kingdom is running a budget surplus of some #10 billion (about $16 billion)?  This compares with our deficit of somewhere between $100 billion and $200 billion, depending on what one chooses to count.  You are quite right in suggesting that the net effect of increased federal intervention in health-care fields has been counterproductive.  Specifically, Medicare billions pumped into the system have raised prices dramatically even as the elderly were left worse off in terms of their own pocketbooks than before Medicare was enacted.  Such disasters, however, result not from federal intervention per se, but rather from the fact that the money is thrown into a chaotic, greed-driven system by formulas designed to make it politically acceptable to physicians and hospitals and to keep the political-action committee money flowing.  Is health care rationed in Britain?  Yes.  Is it here?  Of course.  In the one case by waiting lists of noncritical procedures; in the other by money.  Which is better is a matter of perspective, but what is beyond dispute is that the British get more for their money.  Joseph Ripple  Professor of Government  Missouri Western State College  St. Joseph, Mo.  ---  There are no perfect solutions to the U.S.'s complex health-care mess.  Certainly neither citizens in the U.K. nor Canada would tout their solutions as perfect.  However, your editorial blithely ignores the hard facts.  British and Canadian citizens generally support their National Health programs and do not want to change.  Both life expectancy and infant mortality, about the only two reasonably objective measures of health-care effectiveness, are more favorable in the U.K. and Canada than in the U.S. Measured as a percentage of total or per-capita GNP, the U.K. and Canada spend much less for health care than the U.S. by a wide margin.  In short, their national health systems produce better results at far less cost than whatever kind of system we have in the U.S.  That makes our business uncompetitive because of its high cost and leaves one-third of our population with no insurance at all.  Samuel A.L. Taylor Jr.  Carmel, Ind.  ---  Your editorial is yet another example of dated and wrongheaded thinking about the tragic state of health care in the U.S.  With more than 37 million Americans, many of them working people, without health coverage of any kind, I very strongly believe that most citizens would throw out the current health-insurance mess in a minute for a soundly devised national health plan.  Regardless of the expected ideological flak from groups such as the American Medical Association and the insurance companies, I hope a visionary congressman or senator will demonstrate a true "profile in courage" by introducing legislation that will provide universal health coverage regardless of age, physical condition or work status.  It is no honor for the U.S. to be linked with South Africa as one of the only two industrialized nations of the world without national health insurance.  Good health is a basic human right -- not a privilege for the wealthy or for those who work in large companies.  I, for one, am willing to pay my share of the added cost.  Edmonde A. Haddad  Studio City, Calif.  Michael S. Knoll's June 28 editorial-page article, "Mortgages for the Masses," discusses PLAM (price-level adjusted mortgages).  A PLAM charges interest at the real rate of interest, with an annual inflation adjustment rather than a fixed 30-year inflation premium.  This levelization reduces initial payments in favor of constant real payments.  The premise is that as incomes rise with inflation, buyers are able to keep up with the payments.  The flaw in this reasoning is that the security for the PLAM is the buyer's house, not his income stream.  The willingness of a buyer to make PLAM payments is therefore contingent only upon the value of his house rising with inflation.  Given the failure of housing in much of the U.S. to keep pace with inflation and our walkaway bankruptcy laws, PLAM becomes a one-way bet on housing prices at a higher leverage than is now possible.  Unless PLAMs require very large down payments, thus defeating the whole idea, "Mortgages for the Masses" will quickly become PLAM-scam.  Harry Chernoff  McLean, Va.  ---  Mr. Knoll focuses on low monthly payments from the PLAM, but overlooks the revolutionary feature of the PLAM: With the principal indexed for inflation, the borrower does not benefit from inflation.  All other mortgages provide inflation-based gains to the borrower, since the value of the house rises, while the mortgage liability remains fixed.  Even if the interest rate on a non-PLAM reflects inflation, the interest is tax deductible, so the interest cost is less than the tax-free gain on the house price.  The PLAM is an expense for shelter, instead of a speculation on inflationary gains.  F. Barry Nelson  Cold Spring Harbor, N.Y.  Scar Wars  I followed your advice --  Hitched my wagon to a star.  But I find that didn't  Get me very far.  In fact, I may be forced  To choose another calling.  You didn't warn me not to  Pick a star that's falling]  -- Henry F. Hill.  ---  Changing Course  My being on a roll Isn't always a thrill,  Because sometimes the roll Is strictly downhill.  -- Joshua Adams.  ---  Truth Capsule  Maturity is not in having all the answers, but in knowing which ones you can live without.  -- Ivern Ball.  The Chemical Specialities Manufacturers Association and the California Chamber of Commerce filed suit in state appeals court, seeking to overturn Proposition 105, adopted by voters in November.  The measure required, among other things, that alleged hazardous household products carry danger warnings, and required more disclosure by nursing homes, sponsors of voter initiatives, and concerns doing business in South Africa.  The two business groups allege the initiative violates a provision of the state constitution prohibiting ballot initiatives that involve more than one subject.  "What bothers us is that the initiative tied together so many unrelated issues, making it virtually impossible for voters to pay proper attention to each," said Ralph Engel, president of the chemical makers group.  The suit, seeking a ruling that the measure's adoption was unconstitutional, was filed in the state Court of Appeal here against Gov. George Deukmejian, Attorney General John Van de Kamp and other state officials.  Mr. Van de Kamp's office said that it would defend the officials against the suit, and said that the attorney general's position was that Prop. 105 was constitutional.  The chemical makers group includes more than 400 companies that make and sell household products, including pesticides, polishes and detergents.  Mark A. Agee, a founder and major shareholder of this telecommunications products maker, resigned as president and was named chairman, a new position.  Joseph W. Selden, a Phoenix, Ariz., business consultant and a Xeta director, was named interim president.  John J. Ellis was named chairman and chief executive officer of the Hudson Bay Mining & Smelting Co. unit of this natural resources company.  He had been managing director of Western Gold Exploration & Mining Co., which is 50%-owned by Inspiration; a successor wasn't named.  As chairman, Mr. Ellis succeeds Allen T. Lambert, who retired but remains a director of Hudson Bay.  As chief executive, he succeeds Burton M. Joyce, who remains executive vice president and chief operating officer of the parent company.  On Oct. 29, 1986, Sheik Ahmed Zaki Yamani's career as oil minister of Saudi Arabia came to an end and with it an era.  For more than two decades, the sheik had guided the oil policy of Saudi Arabia, the world's largest oil producer, and dominated the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries during its early years.  Oil traders and others hung on Sheik Yamani's every gesture and word.  Stories about the natty minister, who concocted his own scents to perfume his beard and never traveled without his astrology book, filled the magazines.  Although Sheik Yamani wasn't a member of the royal family, he was treated like a son by King Faisal, who showered him with great wealth and appointed him minister in 1962 when he was only in his early 30s.  It was King Fahd, Faisal's considerably less open-minded successor, who fired Sheik Yamani when the sheik was at the peak of his power.  Jeffrey Robinson argues that the oil minister's high profile was a major reason for his downfall in "Yamani: The Inside Story," (Atlantic Monthly Press, 302 pages, $19.95).  As he came to symbolize Saudi Arabia to the Western world, the sheik alienated the king and other members of the royal family.  Mr. Robinson's book presents a fascinating portrait of this master politician dealing craftily with, among others, Henry Kissinger and top executives from the four companies constituting the Aramco partnership.  For instance, he describes how the Saudis attempted to pressure the U.S. government to abandon Israel in 1973 using Mr. Kissinger and the oil chiefs as messenger boys.  Sticking with Israel brought the oil embargo.  King Faisal did not have long to ponder our discomfort.  Two years later, just as the king was joking with Sheik Yamani at a private reception, a disgruntled nephew shot him three times before turning on the sheik, whose life was saved by a quick-thinking security guard.  Even more hair-raising was the sheik's encounter with Carlos one year later.  Leading a band of terrorists dedicated to extirpating Western capitalism, Carlos rushed into an OPEC meeting and took the oil ministers hostage.  While some of the other ministers eventually were freed as Carlos flew from country to country in search of a friendly port, Sheik Yamani remained on board, glumly pondering his fate.  The sheik remembers Carlos telling him: "You will be killed."  Only a last-minute reprieve as the plane sat for hours at an Algerian airport seems to have saved him from this fate.  The mastermind behind this bizarre escapade has never been identified, though a likely candidate is Libya's Moammar Gadhafi.  When asked for his opinion by Mr. Robinson, the sheik just nodded ever so slightly and said, "Take your best guess."  Although the book offers intriguing glimpses into the higher echelons of Saudi Arabia's hierarchy, it occasionally bogs down with rambling monologues from the sheik.  "Yamani has hob-nobbed . . . with the world's leaders," is Mr. Robinson's lame introduction to a string of quotes describing the sheik's social calls on Imelda Marcos, John Paul Getty, Indira Gandhi.  Still, a few anecdotes are amusing -- the fare at Mr. Getty's table was so frugal that the sheik stopped for a second lunch.  When the book was published last year in the United Kingdom, it received some criticism.  Much of that faultfinding came from journalists who failed to get the access to Sheik Yamani that Mr. Robinson, the author of "The Risk Takers" and "The Minus Millionaires," managed to attain, apparently by sheer tenacity.  Still, Mr. Robinson does seem to go out of his way to paint King Fahd as a benighted figure too dumb to bask in the radiance of his glowingly intelligent minister.  As one of Mr. Robinson's critics recently put it: "King Fahd may have been jealous of Yamani, but he wasn't stupid."  Sheik Yamani, for his part, has also expressed unhappiness with the book, trying even to stop publication in London with a court order.  He claimed he had an agreement with the author to avoid all discussion of the Saudi royal family and his dismissal.  But it's almost impossible to accept that a man so attuned to the Western media could delude himself into believing an author would willingly drop topics and leave himself with a boring book.  But "Yamani" does depict accurately the sheik's role in global oil affairs.  And at this point, disagreements among critics as to whether Mr. Robinson's version of why the sheik was fired is completely accurate are just so much sand in the wind.  In the end, the sheik's fall from grace was pretty soft.  He remains an enormously wealthy man who keeps a hectic schedule globe-trotting with his beautiful wife Tammam and their five children.  In lavish estates and hideaway apartments, large staffs and cooling swimming pools await their arrival.  Managing his own portfolio is an arduous task, as he makes plain to Mr. Robinson: "I can't just let my investments slip.  You know it costs me a lot of money to live."  ---  Ms. Sullivan covers oil for the Journal.  James A. Middleton, president of the Arco Oil & Gas Co. unit of Atlantic Richfield Co., was elected a director of this electric utility holding company, succeeding Burl Hulsey Jr., who is retiring.  Lawrence J. Aiken, formerly president and chief operating officer of Parfums Givenchy Inc., was named president and chief executive officer of the Sanofi Beauty Products Inc. division of this cosmetics and skin-care products company, filling a post vacated in January by Stanley Kohlenberg, now president and chief executive of Alfin Inc.  Peter D. Fitzgerald, general manager of the consumer services division, photographic products, was elected a vice president of this photography, chemicals, pharmaceuticals and office equipment concern.  Robert Cohen, 40 years old, was named executive vice president and manager of U.S. branches in the Credit Lyonnais U.S.A. subsidiary of this banking company.  Mr. Cohen had been senior vice president of treasury and deputy manager in the U.S. unit.  He succeeds Jean Cedelle, 43, who returned to Paris as a director of the major international corporate clients division of the parent firm.  Gilbert W. Smith, an investment banker at Robert Fleming Inc., was elected a director of this shipping and travel and leisure concern, filling a vacancy on the six-member board.  Mr. Smith, 75 years old, remains a director of Norex Corp., a Bermuda corporation that is the principal shareholder of the U.S. company.  Norex, formerly Bermuda Star Line Inc., recently sold its cruise operations.  James J. Bigham was named to the new posts of executive vice president and chief financial officer at this closely held commodity trading and processing firm.  He had been a director of Hoechst Celanese Corp. and president of its advanced technology group.  Barbara Pollard, English department chairman at New York's La Guardia High School of the Arts, in the Winter 1988-89 College Board News:  In the 1960s, when I was teaching in London, the State Comprehensive High Schools offered different programs to each of three groups: those who were "leaving" at age 15 or 16 (and most were), those who were taking the GCE "O" level examinations for the technical colleges, and those who were going on to the GCE Advanced Level examinations for admission to the universities.  The English did not seem at all embarrassed by these distinctions.  As an American, I was outraged by the inequities of the system, and saw it as an insidious method of maintaining class distinctions.  I remembered with pride my own school days, and the fact that in my American high school, we all read Dickens and Shakespeare, we all studied European and American history.  In the U.S., there were expectations for all of us.  By the time I returned to the United States in the late 1960s, the source of my pride in American education had begun to crumble.  What I found when I arrived was a British school system in the making.  Course requirements and curriculums were being abandoned.  We had to increase our global perspective.  We had to find more "relevant" material for the disaffected student.  We had to give various ethnic groups their own literature and history, as if Western culture were not their birthright as well.  We had to find something "those kids" could read. . . .   For a moment, the cry became "Back to basics]" But no one was quite sure what they were, and hadn't they caused all the trouble in the first place? . . .   I would like all policymakers, politicians and teachers, before they support any approach or curriculum, to consider if it is one they would choose for their own children.  A voice in my head says, "Don't be silly. 'Our' children are different, more capable and more motivated."  Are they?  One only has to observe all the tutoring and summer preparatory programs in our private schools to realize that not all middle- or upper-class children are born scholars.  When they are "our children," we assume that they must be pushed and pulled until they get where they want to go.  To make other assumptions for other people's children, to do less for "those kids" as opposed to our kids seems, at the very least, immoral.  At the very worst, it can destroy the fabric of that society of which many of us, and for good reason, were so very proud.  Richard A. Zona, a partner at Ernst & Young, was named executive vice president and chief financial officer of this bank holding company, effective Sept. 1, to succeed Gerald B. Fischer, who will head its newly formed corporate affairs division.  MAI Basic Four Inc. said it expects to report a "significant" loss for the third quarter ended June 30, after taking nearly $40 million in unusual charges, and incurring as much as $6 million of operating losses.  The computer maker said it expects to report a nonrecurring charge of $25 million from its recently aborted hostile takeover offer for Prime Computer Inc., Natick, Mass.  The $25 million includes $12.2 million of charges deferred from the fiscal second quarter.  The company wouldn't specify the size of the third-quarter loss.  Late last month, MAI dropped its hostile tender offer for Prime in the wake of a higher, friendly bid from J.H. Whitney & Co. MAI let stand an alternative offer for Prime's minicomputer business, but MAI abandoned that attempt last week.  Although MAI is no longer pursuing Prime, MAI's chairman, Bennett S. LeBow, will forge ahead with a planned proxy fight to unseat Prime's seven-member board through his Brooke Partners L.P.  In addition to the charges from the takeover attempt, MAI will post a nonrecurring charge of $13 million to $15 million for a major restructuring program it launched earlier this month.  That streamlining effort will result in the elimination of about 10% of MAI's world-wide work force of 4,100 over three months.  MAI said it decided to pursue the restructuring because of the "general decline in the midrange computer business," which led to the operating losses of between $5 million and $6 million for the third quarter.  In the year-earlier third quarter, MAI had net income of $6.8 million, or 45 cents a share, on revenue of $112.3 million.  MAI said it expects the restructuring will reduce direct costs and expenses by $25 million to $30 million annually.  The company said it believes it can return to profitability by the first quarter of fiscal 1990.  Some Wall Street observers were shocked by the amounts of the third-quarter charges.  "The size of the loss strikes me as just being enormous," said Sewall F. Hodges, an analyst with Arnhold & S. Bleichroeder in New York.  "I think the viability of the company is called into question."  But Robert M. Johnson, a technology analyst with Rotan Mosle Inc. in Houston, said he is confident that if MAI "can take some of the costs out of the business, there can be some hope. . . .  Clearly they've pulled the cat out of the bag before.  They may be able to do it again."  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, MAI closed at $5.125, down 50 cents.  A new synthetic variation of vitamin D, developed at the University of Wisconsin, is being tested in humans as a possible treatment for osteoporosis.  Vitamin D controls the body's absorption and use of calcium.  Osteoporosis is a weakening of bones caused by the loss of calcium that commonly occurs in women after menopause.  Results of an initial test in humans to determine safe dosages of a compound called 1-alpha-hydroxyvitamin D-2 were reported in abstract form in the advanced program for an international meeting of bone specialists next month in Montreal.  The program appears in the August issue of the Journal of Bone and Mineral Research.  The new compound is of interest because it was developed by Hector F. DeLuca, professor of biochemistry at the University of Wisconsin-Madison and a noted expert on vitamin D. Prof.  DeLuca has developed a number of synthetic variations of vitamin D, one of which is widely used in Japan for treating osteoporosis.  Strangely, however, that compound, 1-alpha-hydroxyvitamin D-3 (instead of D-2), produces a much higher incidence of adverse effects among northern Europeans than it does among Japanese and, thus, isn't likely to be approved by regulators for use in the U.S.  The new compound, the D-2 version of the vitamin, was tested at different dosages on 15 post-menopausal women at Creighton University in Omaha, Neb.  The compound "is well tolerated at the doses used, and should have a therapeutic window that is wider than the previously used 1-alpha-hydroxalated vitamin D-3 compounds," the abstract states.  This indicates that the new compound may have fewer adverse effects in Americans than the one used in Japan.  "We don't yet have evidence for regeneration of bone {in the women}, but clinical trials are under way," said biochemist Charles W. Bishop of Bone Care International in Madison, sponsor of the human tests.  It would take several months of use before any bone regeneration could be detected, he said.  Mr. Bishop, however, noted that during the few weeks the women used the drug, their blood levels of a substance called osteocalcin increased.  This biochemical change is suggestive of increased absorption of calcium by the bones, he explained.  Bone Care International has licensed rights to the new compound from the Wisconsin Alumni Research Foundation, the agency that handles the licensing of inventions patented by the university's faculty.  Bone Care is a subsidiary of Lunar Radiation Corp., a closely held maker of equipment to measure bone density founded by another University of Wisconsin professor, Richard B. Mazess.  Publication of the abstract was used by Deprenyl Research Ltd., Toronto, to announce that it had acquired an option on Canadian marketing rights to the new compound from Bone Care.  Deprenyl also said that for an undisclosed sum it bought from Bone Care a convertible note that, if converted, would give it a 20% equity interest in Bone Care.  Deprenyl was in the news several days ago because it has rights to another drug, deprenyl, that may retard the progress of Parkinson's disease.  David A. Fleck, 41 years old, previously chief executive officer of Fleck Co., was appointed executive vice president and chief operating officer, a new position at this maker of high-precision thermoplastic custom products and supplier of custom polymeric compounds.  Less than a year after ending a moratorium on its foreign bank debt, Brazil seems increasingly likely once again to stop paying foreign creditors, bankers and officials say.  That is partly because Brazil hasn't been able to resolve differences with the International Monetary Fund over the country's failure to meet agreed targets for its bloated budget deficit and inflation rate, which is averaging 30% a month.  Because of the deadlock with the IMF, approval has been delayed for as much as $3 billion in loans from the IMF, the World Bank, commercial banks and Japan.  Brazil, which will hold presidential elections in November, may be unable to resolve its impasse with foreign creditors until next year, according to some bankers.  Brazil is slated to make payments of more than $2 billion to foreign creditors next month, with the bulk of that due to foreign banks.  Finance Minister Mailson da Nobrega said in Brasilia last week that his country wants to avoid a confrontation with its creditors and that it would like to negotiate a delay in payments.  Other Latin American debtors may have more luck with the IMF. Argentina, which is in arrears to its foreign bank creditors by a few billion dollars, is trying to negotiate a loan of $1 billion or more from the IMF.  The IMF, which in the past year shunned the requests of that country's former Radical Party government, is apparently pleased with the economic program of President Carlos Saul Menem, who was elected in May.  Both Brazilian and Argentine officials hope their countries soon will be able to take advantage of the revised U.S. debt initiative known as the Brady strategy that emphasizes the reduction of both debt and interest payments.  Mexico recently agreed with its main bank creditors on the outline of a debt settlement plan that incorporates options for both.  Meanwhile, Colombian President Virgilio Barco has signed a $1.65 billion loan with 125 foreign commercial banks.  That loan, which took about a year to negotiate, won't be disbursed for several weeks.  Colombia has decided it doesn't wish to be a candidate for the Brady strategy, bankers say.  "They can do it without debt reduction," states a commercial banker familiar with Colombia's finances.  Like many borrowers, Colombia is concerned about the effects the Brady strategy might have on its continued access to foreign bank credit.  If banks are forced to take cuts in the value of their loans, Colombian officials fear they may have difficulty receiving attractive interest rates.  Turnover rates in service industries are appalling.  The average annual turnover for full-service restaurants is 210%, meaning that every job slot must be filled twice a year.  In fast food, annual turnover is 270% -- the average jobholder lasts just four and a half months.  The hospitality industry -- with a turnover rate of "only" 104% -- is slightly better off.  But since it costs about $2,500 to replace each hotel worker, turnover still is enormously costly.  These trends have worrisome implications for our national competitiveness.  High turnover is partly caused by the well-noted aging of the baby boom generation.  The traditional entry-level labor pool for the services industry -- 16- to 24-year-olds -- has already begun its decline to just two million by the year 2000, so the competition for these workers is becoming more intense.  The decline of our education system is also to blame.  Employees who are functionally illiterate (or for whom English is a poorly understood second language) often quit in discouragement and drift from job to job without hope of advancement.  Managers who have not adapted to demographic changes are yet another part of the problem.  The workforce is growing older, it is swelling with immigrants from south of the border and more and more households have two wage earners.  These changes present a whole new array of workforce issues to contend with.  At Holiday Inns, we realized some time ago that we had to begin to slow the revolving door by developing management programs aimed at attracting and retaining qualified applicants.  These programs have had a major impact.  At our 170 company-owned or managed hotels, we have reduced turnover from 100% to 65% -- nearly 40 percentage points better than the industry norm.  As a result, the number of openings to be filled at a 200-employee hotel has dropped from 200 to 130 annually, our training costs have declined dramatically, and the quality of service has improved as well.  Our strategy isn't fancy, but it works.  Here's what we'd suggest to managers facing similar challenges:  Let bonuses abound.  Offering bonuses to every employee -- as we began to do five years ago -- is a powerful weapon in the fight against turnover.  Every line employee of a centrally owned and operated Holiday Inn receives a $50 quarterly bonus and a $100 annual bonus if the hotel reaches 95% of its profit goals and the employee meets his or her own performance objectives.  These bonuses are doubled if the hotel reaches 100% of its operating goals.  For a worker who makes $11,000 annually, an additional $500 to $600 a year gives good reason to perform well and to stay with the company.  The design of bonus packages is -- within limits -- developed by individual management teams.  At many Holiday Inn Crowne Plaza hotels, for example, employees receive "crownes" for outstanding work.  For accumulating 10 crownes, the employee receives $25; for 50 crownes, a day off with pay.  To keep them, teach them.  Employees have the highest degree of job satisfaction when they know exactly what is expected of them.  Have all staff members participate in a video orientation when they start their jobs, and, if necessary, make it available in languages other than English.  Holiday Inn University, which began as a residential institution for management training, now provides field instruction for all levels of Holiday Inns personnel.  Under our "Roads Scholar" program, for example, trainers traveling in company vans -- equipped with prototypes of our new computerized reservations system -- visited 1400 U.S. hotels in 1988, training every Holiday Inn front desk employee.  Reveal a path, not a treadmill.  Because many basic service jobs are maligned as dead-end positions, it's critical to provide advancement opportunities for all employees.  Workers are more likely to stay with their jobs if they see a real career path before them.  We make sure that opportunities for advancement are well known throughout our workforce.  All available supervisory positions throughout the company, from front-desk supervisor on up, are listed on the company's computerized communications system.  Once a week, information on these openings -- including salary, location and contact -- are printed out and posted on the employee bulletin board of each of our hotels.  As a result, scores of our employees who began in entry-level jobs now hold positions of significant responsibility.  For instance, the Holiday Inns executive who who developed and oversees the Roads Scholar program began with us a decade ago as a desk clerk.  Nurture the entrepreneurs.  Managers who are on the front lines of the turnover battle sometimes find creative, entrepreneurial remedies.  Put their insights to good use.  For instance, Victor Vongs, a native Thai who is the general manager of a Holiday Inn Crowne Plaza in White Plains, N.Y., has developed programs to aid employees who are new to the U.S.  He registers them in free English classes, helps them find apartments and provides vital moral support.  "Because many of our employees left their immediate families behind, they think of our hotel as a second home," he explains.  By building employee loyalty, Mr. Vongs has turned a demographic "problem" (an increase in immigrant workers) into an advantage: In just two years, he has reduced turnover at his hotel from 82.5% to 10.5%.  Start at the beginning.  Since half of those employees who quit do so within the first 30 days, we train our managers in interviewing techniques so they can seek out the right attitudes, skills and work habits in prospective employees.  Recently, we developed a screening program that identifies those applicants most likely to excel.  Under the program, answers to about 25 basic questions are correlated with the responses of our most successful current employees.  With this comparison, we can begin to predict three key components of job performance: customer service, job attitude and competence.  Rapid turnover is not an isolated problem, but the manifestation of a disaffected workforce.  Employees enjoying a high degree of job satisfaction will not only stay with the company longer, but work better as well.  And while demographics may create unprecedented challenges for today's managers in the battle against rampant turnover, they need not dictate the success or failure of any business.  ---  Mr. Hamlet is president and CEO of Holiday Inns Inc.  Italy's foreign trade deficit narrowed to 711 billion lire ($519.3 million) in June from 941 billion lire a year earlier, the state statistical office Istat said.  The June gap also narrowed sharply from May's deficit of 2.118 trillion lira.  Istat said the trade balance in the first six months of 1989 showed a deficit of 14.151 trillion lire, widened from 8.453 trillion a year earlier.  It said the figures are provisional and aren't seasonally adjusted.  Credit ratings on banks' non-depository obligations could suffer as a consequence of the thrift rescue legislation signed into law last week.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. is studying the legislation's implications for such creditors, especially holders of standby letters of credit issued by banks.  The law gives the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. wide latitude in deciding what obligations of failed banks it will accept.  Christopher Mahoney, a Moody's analyst, said, "We've not taken any action as yet, but this bill could affect ratings on letters of credit.  We will be issuing a comment sometime in the future."  Banks' legal advisers agreed that the law could lead to widespread downgradings in the ratings on certain bank obligations.  One bank adviser said, "This is going to make U.S. banks less competitive with foreign banks on letters of credit.  It could also affect deposits in foreign branches."  Another bank attorney added, "A lot will depend on how the FDIC chooses to implement the law."  A standby letter of credit enables the creditor of a third party to draw against the bank's funds if the third party fails to live up to contractual obligations.  Letters of credit are used routinely to enhance the credit-worthiness of securities.  Generally, banks' standby letters of credit have carried identical ratings to insured deposits, based on the assumption that the FDIC would honor insured as well as uninsured obligations of individual banks, if not their parent companies.  The Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act signed by President Bush Wednesday gives the FDIC wide discretion to choose which obligations of failed banks it will assume and which will be left with the failed bank.  The FDIC has signaled its desire to reduce the cost of bank bailouts by gradually narrowing the types of obligations that it will honor.  Earlier this year, when it declared most of Dallas-based MCorp's 25 banks insolvent, the FDIC for the first time chose not to assume the failed banks' standby letters of credit, according to Moody's.  Holders of those obligations are challenging that decision in court.  But, if some bankers fear the new law's repercussions, others are cheered by provisions that will greatly reduce the amounts of capital that U.S. banks will have to set aside for their portfolios of interest and currency swaps.  In a swap contract, banks enable a party with floating-rate debt, for instance, to reduce the risks of higher rates by exchanging their payment obligations with a party that has fixed-rate debt.  The new legislation allows banks to set aside capital based on the net rather than the gross amount of their swaps exposure.  The change should also reduce the costs of swaps arranged by U.S. banks and give them a competitive advantage over foreign banks and investment banks.  Mark C. Brickell, a vice president of Morgan Guaranty Trust Co. of New York and president of the International Swap Dealers Association, said, "This frees up millions of dollars in bank capital systemwide and reduces the amount of interbank exposure by billions."  Mr. Brickell said the association is urging Congress and foreign bank regulators to adopt the same netting provisions for investment banks and foreign banks.  Yankee Cos. rescheduled its special stockholder meeting for Sept. 22.  Holders will vote on a plan to change the company's name to National Environmental Group Inc. and to exchange its preferred stock for common and warrants.  The record date for the meeting, which had been scheduled for July 26, will continue to be June 30.  Yankee is an environmental-services concern.  In joining a suit seeking to block the dismantling of Shoreham on environmental grounds, the Bush administration is stepping up its efforts to save the Long Island reactor.  Acting at the Energy Department's request, the Justice Department on Friday intervened in a suit that challenges the agreement under which Long Island Lighting Co. is to transfer Shoreham to the state, which would then dismantle the facility.  The Energy Department has long expressed strong opposition to the plan to kill Shoreham, but officials previously said they were looking for the proper grounds on which to challenge the plan in court.  Separately, President Bush is planning to meet with New York Gov. Mario Cuomo tomorrow to discuss the administration's opposition to the Shoreham agreement.  The department said its concerns about Shoreham include the need to ensure adequate and reliable power for the region.  Moreover, according to the department, destroying Shoreham will increase the area's dependence on plants that burn fossil fuels, which contribute to acid rain and possible global warming.  The agency said the federal government has a significant interest in Shoreham because of various federal facilities on Long Island.  The department said that under a New York law, the state is required to prepare an environmental-impact statement -- and to solicit comment from federal agencies -- before approving the dismantling of Shoreham.  Such a process, which could take months, is required before approval of any action "that might have a significant effect on the environment," including actions that would result in a "major change" in the quantity or type of energy used, according to the Energy Department.  In an interview, Deputy Energy Secretary Henson Moore said, "It is clearly under our jurisdiction to be concerned about environmentally safe energy."  The suit was originally filed by some Long Island residents and a nonprofit group, Scientists and Engineers for Secure Energy Inc., the department said.  Last month, Energy Secretary James Watkins sent a letter to the Nuclear Regulatory Commission suggesting it take steps that would throw up legal roadblocks and delay the dismantling.  Mr. Watkins didn't formally request any action, but asked the NRC to consider holding a public hearing and stopping Lilco from removing fuel rods and reducing staff pending the license transfer.  Invoking a federal environmental law, he said federal law also requires the preparation of an environmental-impact statement before the hearing.  Despite its continuing market share decline, General Motors Corp. appears ready to join its domestic rivals in aggressively raising 1990-model car prices.  The No. 1 U.S. auto maker disclosed only the outlines of its 1990 pricing strategy in a statement Friday.  But it appears GM is determined to boost profits by offsetting the high costs of new safety equipment and sales incentives, even if that means giving consumers a stiff bout of sticker shock.  In its statement, GM said prices for its 1990 cars will rise an average of 2.5% over "comparably equipped" 1989 models on sale now.  In addition, GM said the cost of new safety equipment will raise prices an additional 0.9% on average.  These figures, however, understate the actual price increases consumers will see in the showroom, because the GM figures treat new standard equipment, such as more powerful engines, as if that equipment had been standard on the older models.  GM didn't release prices for individual models.  Dealers contacted Friday said they hadn't received any detailed information, either.  A GM spokesman said the details would go out to dealers early this week.  Last year, GM raised base prices of 1989 cars 4% to 8% over 1988 models, and said that worked out to an average 2.9% price increase, after adjusting for new standard equipment.  The other two major domestic auto makers have signaled equally sharp price rises for the coming model year, blaming much of the rise on federal requirements that all 1990 domestic cars have either airbags or automatic seat belts.  Ford Motor Co. indicated in preliminary figures disclosed to dealers late last month that it wants to raise base prices on most of its cars 5% to 7% when the 1990 model year begins this fall.  Chrysler Corp. has released to dealers preliminary figures that indicate base prices on many of its 1990-model cars could jump between 3.7% and 8%.  Prices on Chrysler's popular minivans, classed as trucks, could go up as much as 16.8%.  The impact of safety equipment costs could vary widely among the Big Three.  Ford is putting airbags on about 40% of its 1990-model cars, while Chrysler is installing airbags on all of its domestically built models.  GM, however, is putting airbags on only about 15% of its 1990 cars.  Since airbag systems can add $300 to $500 to the cost of a car, sticker prices on Ford and Chrysler cars could go up more on average than GM models simply because more of them will have airbags.  GM said its 1990 prices will reflect the costs of new safety equipment, and "provide for the partial recovery of higher raw material, labor, health care and other costs."  GM's "other costs" include carrying two to four more North American car assembly plants than it needs, given its current sales and market share.  The enormous cost of this excess capacity is squeezing GM's automotive profits at a time when domestic and foreign rivals -- eager to keep their own North American plants profitable -- are discounting their cars more heavily than ever.  Analysts estimate GM is currently offering discounts averaging more than $1,000 a car in its effort to move 1989 inventory.  By sharply raising 1990 prices, GM can give itself more leeway if it decides to offer discounts on the new models.  The result of all this is that consumers will pay more not only for a basic GM car, but also for optional equipment.  In April, GM raised prices on many optional features, such as air conditioning and power windows.  Those price increases ranged from 2% to 3% for air conditioning, to as much as 31% for aluminum wheels on certain models.  GM also eliminated most of the discounts it had offered on certain factory-determined packages of options.  For 1990, GM plans to eliminate almost all of the discounts on option packages, and again raise some option prices, a GM spokesman said.  Further, GM plans to launch its 1990 cars without consumer rebates, he added.  However, even with the current discounts, GM hasn't halted its sales and market share slide.  At the end of July, GM's share of the U.S. car market for the year to date was 35.7%, down from 36.9% a year earlier.  GM's total vehicle sales for the year through July 31 were off 7.4%.  GM officials say their goal is to boost the company's share of the car market to 37% in 1990.  Thus, it's questionable how long GM will be able to go in the 1990 model year without offering any discounts.  In the past, consumers have simply stayed out of showrooms when sales incentives ended.  Donald B. Dahlin, who recently resigned from the top post at PCS Inc., was named senior executive vice president of sales at this competing prescription processor.  When Mr. Dahlin, 38 years old, resigned from PCS in June, the company said it was for personal reasons.  McKesson Corp., San Francisco, has since said it would "review alternatives" with regard to its 86.2% stake in PCS, based in Scottsdale, Ariz.  It wasn't clear how the events were related.  Each company has interests in processing prescription claims.  Medco also fills prescriptions by mail order.  "It's a little bit like Evel Knievel, getting on his motorbike, trying to jump the Grand Canyon," said Sam Donaldson.  "If he makes it, terrific.  If he doesn't, it's a long way down."  Long anticipated and much ballyhooed, "Primetime Live" (ABC, Thursdays, 10 p.m. EDT) took off two weeks ago.  As of this writing, it's still up in the air.  Known around the industry as the "Sam and Diane Show," this prime-time news hour takes two of the most highly paid TV reporters -- Sam Donaldson and Diane Sawyer -- and makes them into stars.  The show's mission, as stated by Ms. Sawyer, is to "ask questions, drop in on locations around the world, bring you investigative reports, and introduce you to people we think you're going to want to meet."  In other words, a typical news magazine, mixing fact and fluff, poised halfway between "60 Minutes" and "20/20."  The debut of "Primetime Live" came blazing onto the screen with the trademark ABC glitz and gizmos-computer-generated graphics, a $400,000 video wall and so on.  Along with the flash, there appeared to be some journalistic coups as well.  A series of exclusive interviews was promised, including the first TV appearance of Thomas Root (the pilot whose mysterious plane flight was tied to everything from suicide to drug smuggling), Secretary of State James Baker on the hostage crisis, and TV star Roseanne Barr.  But the secretary of state said little, and Thomas Root said nothing.  "You appeared to be in bad financial shape," stated Mr. Donaldson.  "I am no more eager to talk about my financial affairs than you would be," said Mr. Root.  So what was he doing there?  And how come Sam and Diane, after the triumph of getting him on the air, let him slip away so easily?  Later came Diane Sawyer with Roseanne Barr, and that was an outright fiasco.  Trying to be chatty, Diane came off smarmy and uncomfortable, talking down to the former blue-collar entertainer with a faked joviality.  For her part, Roseanne responded as if she couldn't stand this thin stuck-up blond prom queen.  By the end of the interview, their antipathy was really embarrassing.  It didn't seem fair to judge "Primetime Live" by that first outing.  As expected, by the second show (last week), some of the opening-night jitters were over.  The hour led off with a hard-hitting investigative piece by Chris Wallace on "board-and-care homes," packed with shocking, sometimes sensationalistic images: sick, emaciated patients scrounging through garbage heaps for food -- a gruesome scene out of Calcutta or a concentration camp.  As comic relief there followed a profile of controversial new Dallas Cowboys owner Jerry Jones, a man "with a lot of money and a big mouth."  Judd Rose's spaghetti-western storytelling was amusing: "He rode into Texas with a fistful of dollars. . . ."   And supporting both stories were solid Sam Donaldson interviews.  Someone must have lighted a fire under Mr. Donaldson, because he was back in feisty combative form.  When Texas Attorney General Jim Mattox hemmed and hawed and admitted the bad board-and-care homes should be shut down, Sam said, "They should indeed -- why haven't you?"  As Mr. Mattox squirmed some more, Mr. Donaldson shot back, "That sounds like passing the buck. . . ."   So here's the prognosis for "Primetime Live" in midflight: 55-year-old Sam Donaldson and 43-year-old Diane Sawyer are two strong anchors, with the potential to be an interesting team -- good cop/bad cop, fire and ice, the abrasive Sam and the cool, poised Diane.  They've assembled a solid supporting cast of producers and correspondents.  And best of all, the show is live, with that extra little burst of Adrenalin (Ms.  Sawyer didn't miss a beat when her earring fell off in midsentence last week).  This is a show with all sorts of potential.  But right now, there are problems to be ironed out.  Set problems: Why are they sometimes sitting in one chair, sometimes standing up, sometimes walking over to another chair, asking a few questions, then walking back?  And what's the point of the video wall?  More important -- content problems.  With a lot of stories hyped as big deals, many turn out to be quite slim.  Besides the Root interview, one example was a hostage rescue plan, devised by former intelligence figures, who finally conclude that the hostages can't be rescued.  Then there was a live report from a correspondent in Beirut -- the first in a decade.  Now this was a PR coup, and an act of heroism -- but it wasn't news.  The correspondent had nothing new to say.  The single most pressing problem for Executive Producer Rick Kaplan and ABC News head Roone Arledge, as they tinker with "Primetime Live," is one of identity, of format -- actually, six formats.  Currently, this show is trying to be all things to all people.  It's an unwieldy marriage of local news, with friendly his and hers hosts; Phil and Oprah (or at least Town Meeting Ted Koppel), with an audience; "60 Minutes" style investigative taped pieces; breaking live special reports; "Nightline" style interviews; and I think I caught an echo of "Point/Counterpoint" in a particularly meaningless look back at Richard Nixon, 15 years later.  Sam and Diane engaged in some halfhearted banter about whether old Tricky Dick was actually a good guy or not.  Someone is forcing the pair to be Mr. and Ms. Chatty Local Anchor, and it's a big mistake.  The repartee between the two is not only a waste of time ("How would you feel, Diane, if you were a Dallas Cowboy cheerleader?"), it's also off-putting.  Sam, with the Vulcan eyebrows and the Spock intensity, looks as if he's spraining his face every time he tries to smile.  And Diane is fighting a losing battle to be as lovable as sitcom mom Roseanne Barr.  Frankly, I don't think anyone is tuning in to "Prime time Live" to see warm, happy buddies.  I think they respond to Sam and Diane's polish, their professionalism.  He's a tough interviewer; she's a crisp newswoman.  Let them do their thing.  Speaking of forced, no one knows what to do with that studio audience.  First, they ask them questions and get back speeches that begin, "Before I answer that I'd like to say. . . ."  Then, they avoid them entirely, except to stick one interviewee in the audience who could just as easily have been sitting at the desk.  As a rule of thumb, the town meeting/audience participation format seems to work only when it's a single-topic show.  Roone Arledge and ABC have bet the farm on "Primetime Live," and they weren't wrong.  News does have a future in prime time, and this show has several strengths -- notably a strong cast and staff.  Eventually, "Primetime Live" may well become an institution.  But right now, it needs work.  For Sam and Diane and Evel, I predict a safe landing, but they'd better buckle up -- it's going to be a bumpy ride.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  American Bancorp., offering of 250,000 common shares, via Legg Mason Wood Walker Inc.  Continental Bank Corp., offering of 8.5 million common shares by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp, via Goldman, Sachs & Co., Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., and Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  Isomedix Inc., proposed offering of 1,605,430 common shares, of which, 1.1 million shares will be sold by the company and 505,430 shares will be sold by holders, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Midlantic Corp., shelf offering of up to $200 million of debt securities on terms to be set at the time of sale.  New East Bancorp offering of one million common shares, via Wheat First Butcher & Singer Capital Markets, a division of Wheat, First Securities Inc.  Software Toolworks Inc., proposed offering of 2,430,000 common shares, of which, 1.5 million will be sold by the company and 930,000 will be sold by holders, via Montgomery Securities.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it upgraded the rating on about $2.5 billion of long-term debt of Shell Oil Co. and its guaranteed subsidiaries to triple-A from double-A-1.  The rating concern said the action recognizes Shell Oil's consistent operating record and conservative financial posture, which in recent years have enabled the company to reduce debt and strengthen its balance sheet despite the downturn in the oil industry.  Shell Oil Co., Houston, is a subsidiary of Royal Dutch/Shell Group of the Netherlands and Britain.  The American Stock Exchange listed shares of one company and shares of another will transfer from the over-the-counter market.  Air & Water Technologies Corp., a Branchburg, N.J.-based provider of air and water pollution control services and technologies, now trades Class A common shares under the symbol AWT.  Old Spaghetti Warehouse Inc., a Garland, Texas, restaurant operator, will move from the OTC market and trade shares with the symbol OSW on the exchange.  Nasdaq's National Market System listed shares of four companies.  Allstate Financial Corp., an Arlington, Va., financial services firm, started trading common shares with the symbol ASFN.  Image Bank Inc., a New York stock photography agency, started trading common stock with the symbol TIBI.  Pioneer Financial Services Inc., Rockford, Ill., started trading convertible, exchangeable preferred stock with the symbol PFSIP.  It markets insurance.  Serv-Tech Inc., Houston, started trading common stock with the symbol STEC.  It provides specialized maintenence services to the refining, gas processing and petrochemical industries.  Separately, the Pacific Stock Exchange began trading put and call options on the common stock of Conner Peripherals Inc., a San Jose, Calif., disk drive maker.  Emerging Growth Partners L.P., a Baltimore investment partnership, said it holds 5.6% of Dataflex Corp.'s common outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Emerging Growth said it holds 132,650 Dataflex common shares, which it acquired for $1,080,000.  It said it bought 35,000 shares between July 24 and last Thursday at $10.125 to $10.375 a share.  The stock was bought as an investment, the filing said.  Dataflex, based in Edison, N.J., markets data terminals.  Cie.  Generale de Sante of France said it boosted its stake in Lifetime Corp. to 11.2% of the common outstanding.  Cie.  Generale purchased 83,333 Lifetime common shares in a negotiated transaction Aug. 7 for $21 each, boosting its stake to 708,333 shares, a Securities and Exchange Commission filing said.  The filing didn't give a reason for the increase.  Lifetime is based in Boston.  Guy F. Atkinson Co. of California reported widening losses from construction projects, a pause in winning new contracts and a write-down of energy-related assets.  The construction concern said it had a $20.2 million loss in the second quarter on revenue of $216.7 million.  It had net income of $659,000, or seven cents a share, in the year-earlier period, when revenue was $398 million.  For the first half, Atkinson reported a $26.5 million loss.  It had net of $2.5 million, or 29 cents a share, in the 1988 period.  Revenue fell 8% to $398 million from $432.8 million.  "Our losses for the first six months were substantial and uncharacteristic," said Thomas J. Henderson, chairman and chief executive officer.  "Adverse performance, experienced or projected, on certain heavy civil construction projects was exacerbated by a severe loss on one . . . joint-venture project."  The company declined to identify the troubled projects.  Mr. Henderson added that Guy Atkinson's problems were compounded by an "inability to obtain and perform sufficient new work early enough to produce 1989 earnings and by a write-down of energy-related assets."  The assets, consisting of ownership positions in windmill and solar-energy projects, accounted for $2.5 million of the second-quarter loss, a spokesman said.  Mr. Henderson said the company has recently been the successful bidder on a "substantial amount of new work" and expects to add $270 million to its main construction unit's backlog when the contracts are awarded.  "Our drought in acquiring new work seems to have ended," he said.  Geoff Lindup, 48 years old, was named president and general manager of that unit, effective Aug. 2.  He succeeded Lynn Kerby, 50, who was named the subsidiary's senior vice president, operations.  Mr. Henderson characterized the management change as "intensifying our efforts to improve performance within our heavy civil construction business."  Termiflex Corp. said it cut its work force 20%, to 49, in an attempt "to return sooner to an acceptable level of profitability."  For the year ended June 30, the maker of hand-held computer terminals reported a loss of $106,308 on revenue of $7.8 million.  In the prior year, the company had net income of $370,941, or 28 cents a share, on $6.4 million in revenue.  The following were among Friday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ EUROBONDS  Asahi Breweries Ltd. (Japan) -- $1 billion of bonds due Aug. 31, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 1/8% coupon at par, via Nomura International Ltd.  Each $10,000 bond carries two warrants, exercisable from Sept. 18, 1989, through Aug. 17, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Aug. 17.  ANZ Banking Group Ltd. (Australia) -- 60 million New Zealand dollars of 13 1/4% bonds due Sept. 28 1992, priced at 102 to yield 13.04% less full fees, via Hambros Bank Ltd. Fees 1 1/2.  UBS Finance N.V. (Swiss parent) -- 75 million Australian dollars of 14% bonds due Sept. 12, 1994, priced at 101 7/8 to yield 14.04% less full fees, via UBS Philips & Drew.  Guaranteed by Union Bank of Switzerland.  Fees 2.  Banque Nationale de Paris (France) -- $50 million of 8 5/8% five-year bonds due Aug 3, 1994, priced at 101.75 to yield 8.66% less full fees, via Banque Nationale de Paris.  Fully fungible with BNP's $200 million outstanding of 8 5/8% bonds due 1994.  Fees 1 7/8.  Abbey National Treasury Services (U.K.) -- 100 million Swiss francs of 5 3/4% privately placed notes due Sept. 1, 1994, priced at 101 3/8 to yield 5.44%, via Deutsche Bank Suisse.  Guaranteed by Abbey National.  @ OTHER  National Credit Card Trust 1989-5 -- $752 million of 8 3/4% participation certificates, with an expected maturity of Aug. 15, 1994, and an average life of five years, priced at 99 10/32 to yield 8.84%.  The issue was priced 88 basis points over the Treasury's five-year note.  Rated triple-A by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Student Loan Marketing Association -- $150 million of 8.3% notes due Sept. 21, 1994, priced at par.  The notes were priced at a yield spread 34 basis points above the five-year Treasury note.  Merrill Lynch is lead underwriter on the noncallable issue.  Davis Water & Waste Industries Inc. said it expects to report a loss of between $450,000 and $600,000 for its first quarter, ended July 30.  Doyle White, president and chief executive officer, said in an interview that the loss is larger than the company expected.  In the year-earlier period, Davis had net income of $836,000, or 26 cents a share.  Mr. White said Davis expects to report revenue of $45 million, down 10% from $50.2 million the year before.  "We experienced an unanticipated downturn in our distribution business," he said.  Davis gets roughly 80% of its revenue from distributing pipes and other equipment for water and sewage carriage and the rest from manufacturing, installing and servicing water-treatment facilities.  Mr. White said volume in its distribution business was down about 21% in the quarter from the year before, while volume in the smaller water-treatment business was down about 15%, "as expected."  He attributed the distribution segment's downturn to sluggish residential construction because of higher interest rates and an unusual amount of rain in the Southeast, the company's stronghold.  He said the lower volume of business also put pressure on margins as competition heated up among suppliers.  Mr. White predicted that better weather and falling interest rates will spur better results later this year.  The company is continuing to expand its operations, he said, and expects to be "marginally profitable" in its second quarter.  Engelhard Corp. said its Japanese joint venture was approved for registration on the Tokyo over-the-counter market.  The Japanese Securities Dealers Association approved registration of N.E. Chemcat Corp., a joint venture 46%-owned by Engelhard and 54%-owned by Sumitomo Metal Mining Co.  Chemcat, which operated as Nippon Engelhard Ltd. until a name change in June, makes chemical, automotive and pollution-control catalysts, electronic chemicals, and other precious metal-based products.  Engelhard makes specialty chemical products and engineered materials and provides precious metal-management services.  NATIONAL CITY Corp. said it will call for redemption its $20.5 million of 14.25% notes, due 1992.  The notes, issued in 1982, are redeemable at par after Sept. 7, the bank holding company said.  Holders will receive $1,017.42 for each $1,000 of notes, representing the full face value plus interest to Sept. 15, the company said.  The redemption, which will be effective Sept. 15, will be financed with internally generated funds, National City said.  Japan's trade surplus, which narrowed for the third consecutive month in July, may continue to shrink for a few more months.  But the recent strengthening of the dollar could cause Japan's exports to surge again by the end of the year.  Japan's overall trade surplus, measured on a customs-cleared basis, fell 17% in July from a year earlier, to $5.99 billion from $7.18 billion, the Finance Ministry said.  The trade surplus with the U.S. narrowed sharply.  Analysts said the lower surplus with the U.S. was in part due to a slackening of the U.S. economy, which curbed Japanese exports to the U.S.  "The U.S. economy's slowdown is really beginning to affect the Japanese economy," said Ron Napier, an economist with Salomon Brothers Ltd.  In particular, auto exports to the U.S. fell 9.3% from a year ago.  Buoyed by strong domestic demand, imports continued to grow despite the strong dollar.  Imports rose 9.1% to $17.41 billion, while exports rose only 1.1% in July from a year earlier, to $23.41 billion.  The acceleration of import growth was important to the Japanese government, which is trying to lower the trade surplus and convince other countries of its efforts to heighten domestic demand.  Japan's exports to China fell 10% to $742.9 million, but imports rose 3.4% to $899.2 million.  The impact of the clashes between Chinese student protesters and soldiers in June isn't clear yet, ministry officials said.  Taking seasonal factors into account, the July trade surplus stood at $5.04 billion, down from $5.09 billion in June.  Adjusted exports dropped 2.1% to $22.23 billion from $22.72 billion in June, while imports fell 2.4% to $17.20 billion from $17.62 billion.  The surplus with the U.S. fell 15% from a year earlier, to $3.83 billion.  The surplus has shown a zigzag pattern recently, rising 0.3% in June from a year earlier after decreasing a sharp 19% in May.  Exports to the U.S. rose a slight 1.3%, to $8.06 billion, while imports from the U.S. climbed 21.9%, to $4.23 billion.  In addition to the slowing U.S. economy, behind-the-scenes pressure by the Japanese government on exporters restrained exports to the U.S., analysts said.  "There's a fear that the U.S. is going to clamp down on exports," said Jan VanDenBerg, an economist at Merrill Lynch Japan Inc.  "There has been more of an attempt to shift exports off the U.S."  The strong dollar has also been helping to shrink the overall surplus recently, because the immediate impact of a rise in the dollar is to make any given quantity of yen-denominated exports equal fewer dollars.  But economists cautioned that the dollar's strength may encourage Japanese makers to start exporting more by the end of the year, because it reduces the cost of Japanese goods to American buyers.  "Exports will rise at the end of the year, but not right now," Salomon's Mr. Napier said.  Imports from the U.S. included, in particular, aircraft, lumber and alcoholic beverages.  A change in tax laws last April effectively reduced prices of some imported alcoholic beverages, spurring consumption.  Japan's trade surplus with the 12 nations in the European Community continued to narrow.  The Finance Ministry said exports to the EC countries fell 3.5% to $3.98 billion, while imports rose 7.5% to $2.32 billion.  Japan's trade surplus with Asia, including China, rose 0.6% to $1.74 billion.  Exports to Asian countries, led by construction machinery, rose 5.7% to $7 billion.  Japan's imports from those nations increased 7.5% to $5.26 billion.  No one would tell me her name.  "It doesn't matter," her friend, Mrs. Nazimeye, explains.  "She is dying."  The ebbing soul must be at least 80 years old.  Although she could not walk, Bulgarian officials gave her a passport and forcibly deported her from her home in Cuma, then denied her admittance to a Bulgarian first aid station a few yards from the border.  A Turkish ambulance arrives to take her to a hospital in nearby Edirne.  "At least," announces Mrs. Nazimeye, "she can die knowing she is home."  The old lady is one of nearly 200,000 Turkish Bulgarians who, until three months ago, resided in the small farming and industrial towns of southern and eastern Bulgaria.  Then that country's communist government began deporting them by the thousands.  One senior Turkish foreign affairs official suggests the Bulgarian government, alarmed at the continued population growth of a Turkish minority that now makes up 10% of the Bulgarian population and at the failure of its campaign of forced assimilation, is trying to avoid a repeat of ethnic unrest that is confronting the Soviets.  They have been coming at a rate of about 4,000 refugees a day for weeks now.  No one knows how many of the more than 1 million of Bulgaria's Turkish minority will eventually be forced to leave.  The political ramifications of this exodus are potentially explosive.  Turkish intelligence reports more than two months of rioting in parts of southern Bulgaria.  Refugees report they have witnessed Bulgarian military personnel using a gas that left the bodies of protesters unmoving on the ground.  Stories -- unconfirmed but too numerous to discount -- suggest that however harrowing life might be for those Turks being driven out of their Bulgarian homes it is vastly worse for those left behind.  "The people are being persecuted for being Turkish and for being Muslim," says one Turkish journalist, Altemur Kilic, over lunch.  The story goes back several years to the early 1980s when the Bulgarian government began a major campaign of forced assimilation.  The Turkish language was banned, as was Turkish music and dance.  Turks were forbidden to circumcise their baby boys or to practice Islam.  Mrs. Nazimeye -- her name in Bulgaria was changed to Nevena -- says that soldiers with "big guns and dogs" entered her town several weeks ago.  "They were hitting us with the guns and letting the dogs attack us.  They just kept hitting us."  Her town had more than 200 houses -- now maybe 10 are inhabited.  Her companion, Mrs. Hulya, shows me bite marks on her arms and legs from the dog attacks.  Her daughter and two sons, all in their late 20s, were not allowed to leave the country.  They were put to work in the cotton and tobacco fields.  Mass protests were frequent in 1985 and 1986 and continue today.  It was at one of these protests in the town of Kurcali that Besin Haliloglu was arrested and sent to a work camp.  He had refused to accept the Bulgarian name given to him, Byon Hiristo.  For protesting he now bears on his wrist prison identification number 1986.  He was released from the camp several days before being told to leave the country.  Police would not give him a passport, and he was not allowed to bring his family or his belongings.  Mr. Haliloglu made quite a scene at the border when he made a desperate dash to the Turkish side without any identification.  Once free he was met with wariness from Turkish officials who'd reportedly caught several Bulgarian infiltrators at the border.  Neighbors from Kurcali eventually vouched for him.  The mayor of Edirne, Unal Erkan, has heard hundreds of such stories, as he visits the camp daily, arriving in the afternoon, flags flying from the fenders of his Mercedes.  As tea is served, a young girl tells of being ordered out of her family home in Bulgaria and being brought to the police station.  There she waited in line for more than eight hours for a passport -- only to be sent home without one.  Soon after, police arrived and told her family that it had less than eight hours to leave.  The police confiscated her watch and glasses.  She at least is lucky to have gotten out.  As Mayor Erkan explains, "Children born between the years of 1971 to 1974 are the last to be allowed out.  Young men old enough to enter the army are inducted against their will to work the cotton and tobacco fields.  The girls are also put to work.  Many of them are forced to run the family farms by themselves."  He describes the Bulgarian procedure for deportation: "Generally, they split the families up as much as possible.  A typical family of six, say, will have the mother and a young son forced to travel by bus to the border, while the father and a young son will go on foot.  What belongings they will be allowed to bring may have to be carried by the father, or they will be transported by a bus or train."  The family is never sure when it will be reunited.  Traveling Turks are allowed to bring only enough money to pay for transportation to the border.  Their bank accounts are frozen.  About 25 miles north of the crossing to Turkey, all expelled Turks must stay for three days at a holding camp, where women and young girls are inoculated.  The Bulgarian government has refused to disclose the purpose of the shots, and, the mayor says, World Health Organization officials have looked into the matter but have not been able to determine the shots' effect.  The only food available is bread for which the Bulgarians charge 20 Bulgarian lire, though outside the camp fresh bread normally sells for between three and five lire.  After the forced holdover, they resume their long walk to the border.  New arrivals to Turkey go through a central check-in at Kapikule.  If they have relatives in Turkey, the refugees are immediately sent to their family's district.  Those without local contacts are transferred to one of the 14 refugee centers in the country.  There, they receive medical attention and can enter their names for the job referral program.  Generally, according to the border chief of police, none of the refugees remain longer than a day at the border.  The relocation process -- directed from Edirne, rather than from Ankara -- is surprisingly orderly and efficient.  The mayor is proud of the job the people of his town are doing.  "If the government were to send the military or the United Nations here, I would take it as a sign that I was not doing a good job," the mayor observes.  "However, I don't think that the United Nations or the International Red Cross has even offered to help us.  That is disturbing."  But while the international response to the crisis has been muted, the U.S. has promised $10 million in refugee assistance.  The sun has set, and the human caravan continues across the border.  Some individuals celebrate their arrival in Turkey by kissing the soil.  Others pack and prepare for the next leg of their journey, one they hope will lead to a life of prosperity as well as freedom.  In that regard, they are no different from refugees or immigrants anywhere else.  As the mayor is concluding his daily visit, word comes across a staffer's walkie-talkie that one person's journey has ended.  The woman whose name didn't matter has died.  ---  Mr. McFadden is on the editorial page staff of The Wall Street Journal/Europe.  The semiconductor industry's leading indicator slipped again in July, reflecting seasonal doldrums, sagging chip prices and flat demand in many markets.  But although the figure fell short of most financial analysts' predictions, they said the index doesn't presage an industry recession.  "If it doesn't get any worse than this, we're in fine shape," said Millard Phelps, an analyst at Hambrecht & Quist.  The Semiconductor Industry Association said the so-called book-to-bill ratio for July was 0.95, down from 0.99 in June; figures for both months are preliminary.  The 0.95 figure means that for every $100 of products shipped, or billed, chip makers received $95 in new orders, or bookings.  The index has fallen or been unchanged every month since February, when it hit 1.07.  "We were prepared to see the rest of 1989 slow down and be flat at best," said Jeanne Alford, a spokeswoman for the association, based in Cupertino, Calif.  The trade group, along with its European and Japanese counterparts, forecast earlier that U.S. sales would fall in the third quarter, she said, so the 0.95 index for July wasn't a surprise.  The latest figures show a continuing slump, as both orders and deliveries declined from June levels.  The association said monthly orders for the three months ended July 31 averaged $1.19 billion, down 8.9% from $1.31 billion in the three-month period ended June 30 and down 5.9% from the year-earlier period.  Billings in July were $1.08 billion, a 25% decline from June's $1.44 billion and a 3.9% drop from July 1988.  But many chip makers had said they expected duller-than-normal growth in the summer as chip purchasers keep their stockpiles thin.  W.J. Sanders, chairman of Advanced Micro Devices Inc., has said several times that any growth in the market for 1989 has already occurred.  The low book-to-bill index "is not unexpected from our point of view," said a spokeswoman for National Semiconductor Corp.  Chip makers and the trade group point to flat purchases by major industries.  The U.S. Department of Commerce reported that computer and communications equipment orders decreased in June, said Ms. Alford of the semiconductor association.  These industries account for roughly half of semiconductor sales, she said: "If they hiccup, we get a cold."  Another culprit: falling prices.  Prices for dynamic random-access memory chips, which make up 20% of the world market, have fallen rapidly, as have prices for other standard chips.  This cuts the dollar value of orders in the book-to-bill index.  Analysts cautioned that the fall isn't uniform across the industry.  Companies such as Intel Corp. and Motorola Inc. have book-to-bill ratios above 1.00, said Thomas Thornhill III, an analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., while companies that are heavy on commodity items such as Advanced Micro and National Semiconductor, will be hard-pressed to meet sales goals for the next few months.  July's big fall in billings, the trade group said, was in part a calendar aberration: The July period included only four weeks, and the June period had five.  The low index also reflects traditionally slow summer sales, it said.  Some analysts predict an even lower ratio for August.  The summer data, said an official of a major chip maker who asked not to be identified, "make people cross their fingers and look toward September."  Many analysts and industry officials do expect better times in the last quarter of 1989.  Some auto-electronics companies and computer makers such as AST Research Inc. and Tandem Computers Inc., for example, have said they expect to increase their orders.  The index drop, Shearson's Mr. Thornhill said, is "a seasonal issue and not a cyclical kind of thing."  Mr. Thornill and some other analysts cautioned that the book-to-bill ratio, followed closely as a sign of the industry's strength, might not be an accurate indicator anymore.  Companies are cutting inventories and shrinking lead times as they implement "just in time" manufacturing methods, Mr. Thornhill said, and the ratio "is becoming less and less relevant" as an indicator.  McDonnell Douglas Corp. paid the Federal Aviation Administration a $180,000 fine -- the largest civil penalty ever collected from an aerospace concern -- for failing to make a mandatory design change to its MD-80 twin-jet.  The FAA had ordered the St. Louis company in December 1985 to take action on an area around the anti-collision warning light on its DC-9 aircraft, the MD-80's predecessor, after identifying cases of fatigue-induced cracking there.  The agency's directive required either that the area be hardened or that airlines make repetitive inspections after 30,000 landings.  At the same time, the FAA required that particular part of the fuselage -- known as the doubler -- to be hardened on all MD-80s in production.  But, the FAA said, McDonnell Douglas failed to make the modification on 171 MD-80s -- 120 of which were delivered before the deficiency was discovered.  The hardening process, according to the FAA, "increases the structure's resistance to fatigue cracking, thus preventing a potential unsafe condition of structural failure and depressurization in flight."  An FAA spokesman said the agency originally wanted to levy a $200,000 fine against McDonnell Douglas.  But after learning that the subcontractor that supplies the component "did incorporate part of the design change," the FAA settled for $20,000 less.  McDonnell Douglas was quick to note Friday that the $180,000 fine represented "a compromise."  "We discovered the discrepancy, and we were the ones to report it to the FAA," a Douglas Aircraft spokesman said.  The FAA's enforcement action came as controversy continues over the McDonnell Douglas DC-10.  Wednesday, a Northwest Airlines DC-10 en route from Los Angeles to Minneapolis was forced to make an emergency landing in Denver after a blade ripped through the cowling of the middle engine and the tail cone broke off.  None of the 256 people on board was injured.  Last month, the middle engine exploded on another DC-10, triggering a crash in Sioux City, Iowa, that killed 111.  About a week later, another DC-10 crashed in Libya, killing 75.  All three incidents, officials said, appear unrelated.  Still, at least on Wall Street, there is growing sentiment that some design change will have to be made to the DC-10 and its successor craft, the MD-11.  A front-page story in this newspaper last month noted that other airliners have more built-in protections in case an engine explodes and spews metal that can cut key hydraulic control lines.  Phil Friedman, a Drexel Burnham Lambert analyst, said that MD-11 orders have slowed over the past month.  "The key thing may not be whether the FAA mandates a change, but whether the airlines demand it through their orders," he said.  McDonnell Douglas has acknowledged that it's contemplating some sort of design change to the DC-10.  Government and industry experts, moreover, have formed a panel to examine ways to better insulate the hydraulic lines on all wide-body jets.  ---  Judith Valente contributed to this article.  Civil rights.  What does the phrase mean anymore?  On Friday George Bush pulled William Lucas's nomination to be head of the Justice Department's civil-rights division.  Mr. Bush is putting him in charge of something at Justice called the office of liaison services, which doesn't require confirmation by Colonel Biden and the rest of the liberal plantation overseers on Capitol Hill.  Senate Majority Leader George Mitchell of Maine traveled to the White House to warn the President not to make a recess appointment of Mr. Lucas if he valued his relationship with Congress.  We imagine some arcane, conceivably even plausible, Beltway political calculation went into Mr. Bush's decision.  But we can't help but feel that a unique opportunity was lost.  If he had made a recess appointment of Bill Lucas, Mr. Bush would have been seen by everyone except the people in Washington's self-absorbed salons as a President willing to involve himself personally in a fight for a black man.  Instead, he passed.  We would guess that Bill Lucas and many other middle-class black achievers find the current state of "civil rights" disconcerting.  It is disconcerting in large part because a lot of the white people who do most of the arguing and policy making around this issue don't have a clear idea anymore of what they're trying to achieve.  As a case in point, there is the confused state of mind evident among that small political tribe known as "neoliberals."  Commenting on the Lucas nomination, the New Republic writes that criticism of reverse discrimination is "a familiar, and not unjustified, conservative complaint."  Then it accuses conservatives of hypocrisy for supporting Mr. Lucas, whom it accuses of being a liar and of "sneaking jewelry past customs."  Similarly, Washington Post columnist Mark Shields, sounding more like an adult, said conservatives' support of the nominee violated their long opposition to "affirmative action."  We'd like to help our neoliberal friends get clear in their minds what at least one source of conservative opinion thinks on this subject.  We oppose coerced affirmative action; we oppose quotas, numerical goals, timetables -- all the divisive schemes that Hubert Humphrey swore were not intended by the Civil Rights Act of 1964.  We certainly do oppose that kind of coercion; we do not and never have opposed affirmative action voluntarily practiced.  It is perfectly appropriate for a President, university deans and private employers to go out of their way to find black and other minority job candidates.  For one thing, in many cases, including Mr. Lucas's, the black experience in itself adds a unique qualification.  Even in less clear cases, though, we support voluntary affirmative action in the same spirit that we have always resolutely supported the proposition that the best way to achieve a goal seen as socially good is to let individuals decide how to achieve that goal.  Some of those decisions may be seen as imperfect or slow or insincere.  And many liberals now will argue that those decisions won't happen unless they're coerced.  Some conservatives, however, we among them, don't hold such a bleak, crabbed view of human nature.  Racial discrimination was a blot on American history, but once recognized the great majority of Americans were willing to stop practicing it.  And the people who run America's institutions -- corporations, colleges, law firms, medical schools, newspapers -- clearly have been willing to voluntarily make up for lost time with "affirmative" acts.  But voluntary acts were driven from the stage, and support for coercion became the new litmus test of civil-rights purity.  It has been a destructive strategy.  Real accomplishment is now suspect or diminished.  In Bill Lucas's case, his achievements were cheapened because Washington's civil-rights orthodoxy regards only veterans of the courtroom coercion wars as "expert" in these matters.  After what Washington did to the Lucas nomination, there is reason to be confused about "civil rights."  Maybe neoliberals oppose what Hubert Humphrey opposed, maybe they don't.  How can you tell?  Frankly, we're not at all sure what the Bush White House's idea of civil rights comes down to after ducking an honorable and winnable fight.  The Liberal Plantation Democrats seem to have little more on their minds than preserving a "way of life" for litigants.  We suppose this interminable, holier-than-thou pettiness has something to do with the original goals of the civil-rights movement.  But not much.  The next stage in the evolution of human civilization looks a little shaky.  Here on a scrubby, high-desert mesa an hour's drive north of Phoenix, architect Paolo Soleri set out 19 years ago to build an experimental city of the future -- the truly far-out future, not your wimpy life-in-the-year-2000 future.  He planned an "organic" city, self-contained and self-sufficient on 14 acres of concrete structures in cellular modules for living, food-growing, industrial work, culture and entertainment.  Mr. Soleri's architectural dreams, packed in dense prose and published by the Massachusetts Institute of Technology Press, had a powerful appeal a generation ago.  The Whitney Museum in New York had a Soleri exhibit.  In his sketches of desert and other beehive cities such as "Novanoah," which would float on the sea, and "Arcodiga," which would honeycomb the inert mass of a huge dam, idealists and futurists saw the harnessing of advanced technology to the cause of cosmic consciousness.  Arcosanti, a loose translation of the Italian term for "anti-materialism," was the first of the cities to get off the drawing board.  But the way things are going it probably will be the last.  "We sit here and stagnate and wonder whether we're an arcology or not," says 20-year-old Micol Seigel, a senior at Yale who is working here this summer.  At Arcosanti's peak, more than 200 people lived in this first of Mr. Soleri's arcologies -- a word he coined to express the harmonious blending of architecture and ecology.  Most left, disillusioned with the slow progress of city-building.  Today there are just 60 residents.  "If we were building, there would be more people," Ms. Seigel says.  But construction work, only 3% completed, stopped last May.  Over the years, $12 million was spent to produce a collection of concrete-and-steel cubes, domes, arches and bandshell-like apses.  The major economic activities now are architectural workshops that people pay to attend, the manufacture of bronze windbells designed by Mr. Soleri, and tourism.  All this brings in only $500,000 or so a year in revenues.  Officials of Mr. Soleri's Cosanti, a not-for-profit organization that sponsors the project, estimate that as originally envisioned it would cost $500 million to complete.  Mr. Soleri, who no longer talks about when it might be completed, has resigned himself to a scaled-down version that would cost about $26 million.  No investor or philanthropist has yet volunteered a large sum for the project.  Tourists, 50,000 a year, pay $4 each to visit the place.  They see an urban landscape that looks like a disjointed assortment of concrete-and-steel curves and cubes.  The background noise is the clanging of ubiquitous windbells and the buzz of the machinery that makes them.  The residents are a mix of youngsters and old-timers who remain more or less faithful to Mr. Soleri's vision.  "Coming from New York City, this is sort of an alien environment," says a wide-eyed Bob Ruggiero, making a stop on his way to the Grand Canyon.  Some visitors leave disappointed.  The Japanese, for example, become aware that they have already seen the future -- in Tokyo.  Arcosanti attracts many Japanese tourists, who are unhappy when they learn that the city was designed to house 5,000 people, more than 300 an acre.  "It reminds them too much of home," says William Otwell, an architect in nearby Prescott.  "People come off the interstate expecting to find utopia, and it's not here," says Kristy Snyder, a 21-year-old Arcosanti office worker.  She and others still hope that Mr. Soleri's ideas will help change the face of the world's cities.  "With this project, it doesn't matter how long it takes," she says.  "It's the concept that's important."  Mr. Soleri has hardly quit dreaming since he came to Arizona in the late 1940s to serve a fellowship under the late Frank Lloyd Wright.  He has become the most radical of Mr. Wright's disciples.  A hale 70-year-old, he pads around in shorts and sandals, preaching his gospel: that the American Dream of single-family homes and automobiles in every garage promises environmental disaster.  It distresses him that American-style consumerism has engaged the rest of the world.  Some of Arcosanti's youthful detractors say a lack of strong leadership and direction has slowed Arcosanti as much as a lack of money.  They say Mr. Soleri has increasingly distanced himself from it since the death of his wife in 1983.  He now spends most of his time working alone at his home in Scottsdale.  "It's so annoying," Mr. Soleri says of the criticism, dismissing it as part of "the arrogance of ignorance.  There is this sudden explosion of the wisdom of the babies.  They try to spew out sentences before they know anything, instead of being humble.  If you are 'wise' at 19 or 20, you will never really be wise."  Mr. Soleri calls Arcosanti an urban laboratory.  Such "arcologies," he says, will conserve space, time and energy while preserving the wilderness that conventional cities gobble up.  People will live, work and play in megastructures built to ward off heat in summer and preserve it in winter.  Cars won't be necessary.  Massive greenhouses will provide food and even heat.  If Arcosanti is such a lab, it is the no-frills kind.  Besides the windbell foundry and some craft shops, there are living quarters, a music center, amphitheater, library, swimming pool and a boxy four-story visitors center.  There's also a pair of huge arched vaults, designed to serve as a concrete gateway to the city, which overlooks a scenic ravine.  Mr. Soleri and his Cosanti associates hope to raise enough money to build living quarters for 500 people.  Then Arcosanti would be "self-supporting enough to demonstrate the validity of our concept," says Mel Roman, chairman of Cosanti.  Many of Arcosanti's workshoppers and employees now live in "Cubetown," an area of 20 stark, crudely furnished eight-foot-square concrete dwellings with circular windows, a Soleri signature.  Workers raise peaches, tomatoes, corn and other edibles in the surrounding fields.  Guinea fowl guard against grasshoppers, and "weeder geese" trim the lawns.  Skunks roam freely.  "When I first came here, I definitely thought I would be pouring concrete," says Roy Mars, a 26-year-old native of West Germany.  Instead, he tends the watermelon patch.  Ms. Seigel, the Yale student, toils in the foundry.  Like most others, she first came here as a workshop participant, paying $400 for the privilege of taking part and doing odd jobs.  Now she and other employees earn the minimum wage, paying back 15% as rent.  Others man the visitors center and bake cinnamon pumpkin bread in the bakery.  When the day's work is done, residents swim, or play Frisbee, or watch the sunset.  Arcosanti's neighbors in Cordes Junction, about two miles down a dirt road from here, never have fully grasped that something of transcendental significance was taking place here.  They see Arcosanti as a vestigial commune of the 1960s, or maybe a colony of nudists.  "I have no use for them at all," says a bearded local man who won't give his name.  "That's Hippieville."  Prudential Insurance Co. of America said it agreed to acquire Merrill Lynch & Co.'s residential real estate sales and relocation businesses for more than $300 million.  The purchase will make Prudential a more dominant player in the residential brokerage industry, which has been concentrating in the hands of a few financial services giants.  These companies offer home buyers related products such as mortgages, appraisals and homeowner's insurance.  Merrill Lynch, based in New York, said it will sell its 74% stake in Fine Homes International, a master limited partnership, to Prudential, based in Newark, N.J.  It will also sell its 100% equity interest in Fine Home's general partner.  Fine Homes operates Merrill Lynch Realty, Merrill Lynch Relocation Management and several related businesses.  In 1986, Merrill Lynch said it intended to sell off its real estate service units and concentrate on its core securities brokerage and investment-banking business.  About $140 million of the purchase price will go to holders of Fine Homes publicly traded preference units.  Under the agreement, Merrill Lynch will make a tender offer for all publicly traded Fine Homes units for a minimum of $18 each.  The price may be higher based on certain dispositions due to the unit holders when the transaction is completed.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Fine Homes units closed at $17.875, up $1.375.  "We want to be No. 1 in financial services and real estate is a substantial part of that," said Richard G. Merrill, executive vice of Prudential.  The acquisition will add 450 company-owned offices and more than 18,000 sales people to Prudential's ranks.  Prudential's related business, Prudential Real Estate Affiliates Inc., operates 347 franchised sales offices with 4,900 sales representatives.  Mr. Merrill says Prudential eventually may sell the newly acquired offices to franchisees, but in the meantime plans to rename the new entity.  "The most effective players are becoming even more effective than before," said Norman D. Flynn, president-elect of the National Association of Realtors in Washington.  "In our industry, for the last decade we've seen the large getting larger."  Other companies offering financial services and residential real estate brokerage include Sears Roebuck & Co., which owns more than 1,800 Coldwell Banker offices, and Metropolitan Life Insurance Co., which owns a world-wide franchise network of 7,200 Century 21 offices.  Prudential will acquire two other entities in the transaction: Moran Stahl & Boyer, a relocation consulting company, and Landvest, which markets luxury properties.  Merrill Lynch said it expects the sale to have no significant effect on earnings.  Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. said Seaman Furniture Co., which KKR bought in a $360 million leveraged buy-out in 1987, didn't pay its August interest bill and needs to restructure its debt.  In an opinion issued with Seaman's latest financial statements, the furniture retailer's auditor said Seaman may not survive.  The disclosure by KKR and Seaman Chairman Morton Seaman represents a black eye for KKR, the largest LBO firm, as it prepares to decide whether to make a bid for UAL Corp., parent of United Airlines, the nation's second-largest airline.  While the problems of Seaman are tiny compared with some of KKR's larger buy-outs such as the record $25 billion transaction for RJR Nabisco Inc., they will intensify the debate over whether the financial risks of LBOs are appropriate for U.S. airlines.  In a letter dated Aug. 11, Mr. Seaman notified holders of Seaman's 15% subordinated debentures, issued to holders of Seaman common stock in the buy-out Nov. 16, 1987, that Seaman has begun talks with its banks to restructure its debt.  KKR wants to offer holders of those bonds "some other type of security."  Seaman didn't make a $3.1 million interest payment in August.  In a report for the fiscal year ended April 30, Seaman's accountant Deloitte Haskins & Sells, said the company's inability to pay its debt "raises doubt about its ability to continue as a going concern."  The company was founded in 1933 by Mr. Seaman's father, Julius.  It went public in 1985.  The report lists revenue for the same year of $279.5 million, non-interest costs of $256.3 million, and profit from operations of $23.2 million -- not enough to cover $44.2 million in interest costs.  Seaman's net loss for the year was $23.1 million.  The bank debt totals $268 million, and the face amount of subordinated debt is $85 million.  The subordinated debt, whose interest can be paid in more debentures for the first five years, is trading at a market value of about $30 million -- a steep discount that KKR predicted will increase after news of the restructuring proposal becomes public.  Seaman is known in the New York area for a saturation television advertising campaign with the slogan, "See Seaman's First."  The campaign consumes just under 10% of the company's revenue.  In an interview, Mr. Seaman said that Seaman's basic low-price furniture retailing business has been "devastated" on Long Island, where many of its 30-plus stores are based.  He cited economic softness, a fall-off in housing starts, a cutback in certain aircraft production by Grumman Corp., a big Long Island employer, and higher electricity costs because of the decision to mothball Long Island's Shoreham nuclear power plant.  As a result, Seaman furniture sales, which grew by more than 20% annually between 1979 and 1987, have fallen short of the 5% growth projected by KKR and Seaman.  Instead, sales for stores open more than a year, known as same-store sales, have fallen, with the decline on Long Island amounting to 13%.  Before the buy-out, Mr. Seaman said, KKR believed inflation alone would boost same-store sales 5% to 10% annually.  A company spokesman added, "What we didn't bargain for was a decline in samestore sales."  In the buy-out, KKR invested $40 million from its $5.6 billion LBO fund to buy an 80% stake in Seaman; management put up $10 million for 20%.  KKR said the banks may get some of the equity in the debt renegotiation, but that KKR "is prepared to put more money into this transaction on a prudent basis," and hopes its equity stake will retain some value.  "We may have a little problem today, but five years from now we hope to have a happy ending," the KKR spokesman said.  Seaman is one of only a few KKR buy-outs to have severe problems.  American-Forest Products Co., a lumber distributor KKR acquired for $425 million in 1981, had to be restructured and eventually was liquidated.  But KKR refers to that as "a tax-oriented deal, a quasi-LBO," and didn't include it in a list of its 31 buy-outs last January in a study extolling the virtues of LBOs.  Another KKR deal that has gone awry is SCI Television Inc., which it owns 45% of in partnership with George Gillett Jr., who owns 55%.  SCI paid $1.2 billion for six TV stations from Storer Communications Inc., which itself was the object of a $2.5 billion KKR buy-out in 1985.  Although SCI says its debt must be restructured, KKR says it is still ahead of the game because its Storer investment returned 60% from the sale of other cable TV properties alone.  Texas Utilities Co. said it will resume construction, and the accrual of allowance for funds used during construction, on Unit 2 of the Comanche Peak nuclear power plant in September.  Construction at the problem-plagued facility, near Dallas, as well as the accruals were temporarily suspended in April 1988.  The electric utility-holding company said the accruals will total about $16 million a month.  Katy Industries Inc. said Societe des Sucreries et Distilleries d'Egypte filed a claim against a Katy unit for allegedly failing on a contract for sugar-mill processing equipment.  Societe seeks damages of more than $15 million from the unit, Fulton Iron Works Co., Katy said.  Fulton expects to file a counterclaim against Societe before Sept. 21.  Another British conglomerate, BTR PLC, has won the attention of a takeover investor, but observers doubt that BTR is as vulnerable as B.A.T Industries PLC.  BTR said Friday that New York-based Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., the largest leveraged buy-out firm, has obtained permission from federal antitrust regulators to buy as much as 15% of BTR and that it already owns about 0.1%.  The disclosure of KKR's first known investment in a British company comes as some analysts and others are saying many U.K. companies are about to be overrun by U.S.-style leveraged buy-outs.  That belief gained currency in the wake of a #13 billion ($21.05 billion) bid last month for B.A.T by a group led by Sir James Goldsmith, who wants to break up that tobacco-based conglomerate.  The latest news prompted a surge in BTR shares, which rose 35 pence (57 cents) to 454 pence ($7.35) on London's stock exchange Friday.  But the relatively small price change reflected assertions by both BTR and British analysts that the buy-out firm's interest doesn't appear hostile.  BTR's current market value is #7.72 billion.  KKR has been trying to avoid hostile moves since the $25 billion takeover brawl over RJR Nabisco Inc. several months ago.  During that battle, some of KKR's investors said they wouldn't participate in hostile bids.  As a result, KKR has been taking pains to remain friendly in situations such as B.A.T, even though it is clearly interested in some B.A.T assets.  KKR, which first sought the antitrust clearance a month ago, around the time of the B.A.T bid, may be trying to position itself if BTR becomes the target of a breakup bid.  In that case KKR could offer to serve as a white knight for all or part of BTR, which manufactures a variety of industrial and consumer products.  KKR also could use the stake as the basis of a relationship that would give it an early crack at buying BTR assets or selling businesses KKR currently controls to BTR. Another possibility is that KKR could help BTR convert its U.S. operations into a separately quoted affiliate.  BTR recently sold a minority stake in its Australian unit.  In a statement, KKR said it was "pleased with the receptivity of BTR to KKR being a shareholder in the company."  One person familiar with KKR said the announcement opens up lines of communication between the two.  In an interview, BTR's chief executive officer, John Cahill, said KKR partner Henry Kravis "said he is doing this for investment purposes and we have no reason to believe" otherwise.  "I don't think he is doing this as a part of a takeover."  Mr. Cahill said he couldn't imagine Mr. Kravis "being hostile in the U.K. and in a marketplace {about which} he knows very little."  Now, he said, "There is always the opportunity we could do something together.  There certainly now is a special relationship between us."  Analysts and shareholders say BTR's record has been far better than B.A.T's, reducing the chance of its becoming a target.  One shareholder estimates BTR's compound annual earnings growth at 39% for the past five years, with 30% dividend growth, well over the U.K. market averages.  BTR stock has traded at a price-earnings ratio of 14.1, compared with 11.7 for the British market and 13.8 to B.A.T even after the Goldsmith bid.  With roots in Britain's industrial heartland -- BTR once was called British Tire & Rubber -- the conglomerate is at the center of British manufacturing.  It owns such units as Angus Fluid Seals and Pretty Polly, a well-known British hosiery maker, as well as the sporting goods brands Dunlop and Slazenger.  Though it has 100,000 employees in 40 countries, most of its units are British.  KKR is said to have made the antitrust filing because of BTR's U.S. holdings, including Stewart-Warner Corp., a transportation-equipment unit, and U.S. Supply, a Midwestern construction-materials company.  Some U.K. institutional investors admire BTR. Charles Plowden, a fund manager at Baillie Gifford & Co. in Edinburgh, Scotland, calls it "a spectacular success story" and says that in terms of British industrial companies, "it is hard to think of any major company that could match" its recent performance.  Stewart Gilchrist, a fund manager at Scottish Amicable Investment Managers in Glasgow, which holds about 2% of BTR, said it "would be hard to persuade institutions that BTR is a company that deserves to be broken up or taken out in whatever form."  KKR made one earlier foray into the embryonic British leveraged buy-out market when it held talks with management of Gateway Corp., a U.K. grocery chain, after Gateway received a takeover bid from institutional investors.  But KKR decided not to pursue a bid.  It was also rumored to have held talks with Consolidated Gold Fields PLC, which fought off a bid by Minorco S.A. but succumbed to one from Hanson PLC.  Executives of other potential British targets breathed a sigh of relief at KKR's move.  "At least it's not me," said Colin Southgate, chairman and chief executive of Thorn EMI PLC.  The clean-air issue has become the politicians' pot of gold at the end of the rainbow.  Just last Thursday, eight Northeastern environmental officials announced their intention to impose new auto-emission controls.  One said blithely, "I would be very surprised to see any significant opposition."  When public officials start talking that way, maybe it's time for someone to start up the opposition.  Smog is the one clean-air issue that most people feel they know something about.  There is a sense that it's unhealthy, and maybe something should be done about it.  Maybe so, but like all the other issues in the current clean-air debate, the rarely asked questions about smog are: How bad is it?  And is smog so bad that we need to spend billions of dollars on it?  To answer these questions, the first thing you have to do is measure ozone, or at least try to.  Recent studies indicate high temperatures increase ozone concentrations.  But the EPA doesn't take the effect of unusually hot days into account when it measures compliance.  The summers of 1987 and 1988 were unusually hot, so many cities, which most of the time wouldn't have a compliance problem, came in above the federally mandated level of 0.12 parts per million.  Nonetheless the administration uses these anomalous readings to declare that 81 areas, populated by 100 million people, don't comply with federal ozone standards.  Consider how the feds actually measure compliance.  A city is said to be in "non-attainment" if the ozone level exceeds federal standards for any three, separate days over a three-year period.  And the city has to exceed the standard for only one hour during each of those days.  Furthermore, the EPA doesn't base compliance on the average of all the monitoring sites in a region.  If just a single site is above the standard, the whole region is deemed out of compliance.  But in fact, Los Angeles is in compliance 95% of the time; the rest of the non-attainment cities are in compliance 99.47% of the time.  There's no question that after a day spent idling on an LA freeway, it's possible to feel the effects of ozone.  But what exactly is its threat to life or health?  The bulk of the medical evidence suggests that the effects of ozone -- wheezing, coughing and tightening in the chest -- are short term and reversible.  These effects begin at ozone levels two or three times the federal standard, though a few studies detected slight effects at just above the standard.  People doing heavy exercise when ozone is two or three times the standard may experience a temporary loss of lung capacity from 7% to 15%.  Variations between individuals are not fully understood.  Several studies have indicated that the body adapts to ozone levels; after two days of exposure, the effects diminish.  But recent studies on rats have suggested that ozone can cause long-term damage to the lungs, at least to rat lungs.  The cost of compliance will be huge.  California has drawn up plans to bring the Los Angeles region into compliance at an estimated cost to state residents of at least $5 billion annually for the next five years.  It involves banning everything from lighter fluid to free parking downtown.  Federal EPA Director William Reilly says the sanctions in Mr. Bush's plan could include "the refusal to permit new sources of pollution, new construction, new development."  The Bush measure's total costs add $11 billion to $15 billion to whatever costs are imposed by California or the just-announced plan in the New England region.  As is so frequently the case with environmental issues, the draconian solutions to smog and their total cost seem out of proportion to what actually is known about the problem.  And as is also so frequently the case now, the people who say we have this terrible problem -- politicians, environmentalists, journalists, and officials whose jobs exist because of all this -- do so without the slightest attempt to make an intellectually credible case for the huge financial commitment they're asking people to make.  We are not averse to making commitments to real problems.  But over the past 15 years the historical sources of air pollution -- the auto industry and utilities -- have committed billions to clean-air technologies.  Those tremendous costs already have been passed along to and willingly paid by the public.  Now the environmentalists, led by the politicians, say we all have to spend billions and billions more.  A lot of taxpayers might prefer to see those billions spent on AIDS or cancer research, or even on restoring the nation's bridges.  The smog lobby ought to stand up and explain in detail what real risks justify these costs.  The Supreme Court of Canada awarded the country's richest gold mine to Corona Corp., ending an acrimonious eight-year legal battle between Corona and the mine's developer, LAC Minerals Ltd.  The court ruled that Toronto-based LAC must hand over the Page-Williams mine in northern Ontario and that Corona must pay LAC 154 million Canadian dollars (US$131.6 million) for past development costs.  With interest, the payment would amount to more than C$210 million.  Corona, also based in Toronto, said the payment is to come equally from it and from Teck Corp., Vancouver, British Columbia, which plans to operate the mine in an equal partnership with Corona.  The two companies also will split about C$80 million in profit from the mine that has been held in a trust account since 1986.  The ruling upholds the findings of the Ontario Supreme Court in 1986 and the Ontario Court of Appeals a year later, saying that LAC had "breached a duty of confidence" with Corona's predecessor company when it talked with LAC about a possible joint venture in 1981.  The high court said LAC used confidential information given to it by Corona's predecessor to acquire the property where the Page-Williams mine operates.  The Page-Williams mine, which last year produced 379,000 ounces of gold, should produce 490,000 ounces this year, said Peter Steen, Corona's president and chief executive officer.  He said Corona's half-share of the output would boost the company's production this year by 64% to an expected 625,000 ounces, advancing the company's transformation from a small exploration outfit in the early 1980s to one of Canada's top gold producers.  Mr. Steen said the companies plan to accelerate the exploration of little-known areas of the mine.  The reserves already discovered contain nearly seven million ounces of gold, he said.  Teck said its operations, without Page-Williams, are expected to produce about 150,000 ounces of gold this year.  LAC's chief financial officer, Rolly Francisco, said he was disappointed with the court's ruling but said LAC will abide by the decision and work closely with Corona and Teck to ensure an orderly handover of the mine.  LAC hasn't included earnings from the Page-Williams mine in its own accounts since 1986.  LAC's defeat in court could leave the company vulnerable to a takeover attempt, analysts said.  With the company currently holding cash of about C$250 million plus the payment due for the Page-Williams mine, "I think it becomes a real attractive takeover candidate if the share price dropped.  You would be able to finance much of the takeover cost with the company's own cash," said Julian Baldry, a senior mining analyst at Nesbitt Thomson Deacon Inc.  Before the court decision was announced, LAC shares closed Friday in New York Stock Exchange composite trading at $11.375 each, down 12.5 cents.  Mr. Baldry estimated the company could become vulnerable to takeover if its stock falls below C$10 ($8.54) a share.  In composite trading on the American Stock Exchange, Corona Class A shares closed at $7.375 each, down 50 cents.  Teck Class B shares closed at C$22.625, down C$1.375, on the Toronto Stock Exchange.  Hong Kong's June trade surplus with the U.S. surged 17% to 7.86 billion Hong Kong dollars (US$1.01 billion) from HK$6.69 billion, according to government statistics.  The colony's trade surplus during the month represented an 8% rise from May's HK$7.25 billion.  Meanwhile, figures show the June massacre in Beijing's Tiananmen Square didn't have any impact on China's trade with the colony.  Total exports to China grew 15% in June to HK$12.57 billion from HK$10.92 billion; imports expanded 32% to HK$17.26 billion from HK$13.03 billion.  Hong Kong's total exports to the U.S. climbed 23% to HK$12.57 billion from HK$10.20 billion a year earlier and rose 15% from May's HK$10.98 billion.  June imports from the U.S. rose 34% to HK$4.71 billion from HK$3.51 billion a year earlier, but rose 26% from HK$3.73 billion the previous month.  In Massachusetts, visiting Mercedes-Benz managers don't drive their German-made cars any more.  They sport Chevys and Fords, not out of patriotism but to thwart state tax collectors.  Last month, in a drive to collect $7.1 million in corporate income taxes -- which the state says Mercedes-Benz of North America Inc. owes -- officials seized a company car, a spiffy red 560 SEL sedan, from a Mercedes employee.  The auto later was auctioned for $50,000.  But within the commonwealth, the company has nothing left to be seized.  Mercedes-Benz, based in Montvale, N.J., has no offices in Massachusetts.  So the state may take aim at the company's rich New Jersey assets.  In May, when a Suffolk Superior Court judge in Boston ordered the luxury-car company to appear in court on the matter, no one from Mercedes showed up for the hearing.  "Showing up would have been acknowledging that the state has authority over us, which it doesn't," explains A.B. Shuman, a company spokesman.  But Betsy Houghteling, a spokeswoman for the Massachusetts Department of Revenue, says that by ignoring the summons, the company "has shot itself in the tire."  She adds that the department plans to file charges in New Jersey next month.  The dispute hinges on this question: Does Mercedes do business in Massachusetts?  The commonwealth says it does, because Mercedes has employees roaming the state in its name.  "If an employee takes people out three times a week for drinks, that's doing business," asserts Ms. Houghteling.  The $7.1 million is the tax bill on estimated profit received as a result of newcar sales in Massachusetts from 1982 through 1985.  Counters Mercedes: Because the cars were technically sold to the dealers at a dock in Baltimore, it doesn't owe Massachusetts a cent.  Further, its employees are assigned not just to Massachusetts but to all of northern New England.  But one other state takes the same view as Massachusetts.  Georgia is demanding -- though so far less aggressively than Massachusetts -- $2.5 million in corporate income taxes from Mercedes for business done from 1964 through 1983.  Says one Georgia official: "The law has been subject to some interpretation, but we're interpreting it this way."  Fighting to maintain capital ratios, the nation's beleaguered savings and loans reduced assets by $7.6 billion in June, while net withdrawals returned to a high level of $4.6 billion after tapering off in May, the Office of Thrift Supervision said.  It was the second biggest decline of assets, behind a $13.2 billion plunge in January, bringing total assets to $1.339 trillion.  The drop was prompted by the higher minimum capital requirements facing thrifts under President Bush's bailout plan.  By June it was clear the stricter requirements, which prevailed in the legislation signed by the president last week, had strong support in Congress.  "One way to meet the new requirement is to shrink assets so there is more capital per dollar of assets," said James Barth, chief economist of the OTS.  The OTS, a part of the Treasury Department, is the successor to the Federal Home Loan Bank Board.  The OTS said 34 large thrifts, most with little or no capital, together sold almost $8 billion of assets.  The industry currently has only enough capital to back about $600 billion in assets under the new capital requirements that will be phased in next year, Mr. Barth said.  "There's good reason to expect a lot of shrinkage, not just consolidation," he said.  Much of the asset decline came in mortgage holdings, which dropped a record $7.4 billion, including a $5.1 billion drop in holdings of mortgage-backed securities, also a record.  The deposit decline of $4.6 billion, without interest credited to accounts, was a slight improvement from this year's earlier pace, which hit a record $10.8 billion in January and exceeded $5 billion each month through April.  The outflow slowed to $2 billion in May, probably because customers were rebuilding accounts after paying taxes in April.  Thrifts are still being outpriced for deposits by money-market funds.  But Mr. Barth said, "Most of the net deposit outflow reflects the fact that a few large West Coast thrifts substituted borrowings," including loans from the Federal Home Loan Banks, for deposits.  With interest credited, total deposits increased by $3.8 billion to $959 billion.  The figure without interest gives some indication of whether customers are bringing more funds to thrifts or simply allowing interest to build.  Pinnacle West Capital Corp., facing a deadline of next Jan. 8 to repay $150 million of commercial paper, has been cut off temporarily by its bankers and had its access to public debt markets restricted, a senior officer said.  Henry B. Sargeant Jr., executive vice president and chief financial officer of Pinnacle West, testifying at an unusual Arizona Corporation Commission hearing, drew a bleak picture of the utility and thrift holding company's financial condition.  It included an apparently aborted effort at junk-bond financing.  The executive told regulators that the company has about $50 million available with which to repay the $150 million in maturing commercial paper and must raise a further $100 million by about Dec. 31.  "Our banks are very seriously concerned about our ability to repay the loan," he said.  Mr. Sargeant said that a syndicate led by BankAmerica Corp.'s Bank of America told the company not to draw further on a $300 million revolving line of credit for the time being because of "material adverse changes" in Pinnacle West's condition.  The company has borrowed about $150 million against that line of credit, Mr. Sargeant said.  The newly acknowledged prospective repayment problems add a further twist to the plight of Pinnacle West, whose MeraBank thrift unit is under Federal Home Loan Bank Board orders to increase its capital substantially.  Pinnacle West, which until a few years ago was Arizona Public Service Co., an electrical utility, has diversified with disastrous results into savings-and-loan operations, real estate development, uranium mining and venture-capital investments.  The parent company and its units, with about $15 billion in assets, are based in Phoenix.  Last month, the Arizona Corporation Commission, fearing that the parent company would tap its cash-rich utility for funds needed at MeraBank, limited the dividend that Arizona Public Service could pay Pinnacle West.  On Friday, at Pinnacle West's request, the commission considered whether to withdraw that order in return for assurances by the parent company that it would limit dividends from the utility to the current $52.7 million quarterly rate, the same rate set in the commission's order.  Late in Friday's hearing, commission Chairman Renz Jennings, along with Timothy W. Hogan, the commission's chief counsel, and lawyers for Pinnacle West and its utility began to negotiate publicly on possible terms for a voluntary stipulation by all sides.  Those negotiations are expected to continue today.  Mr. Sargeant's testimony was designed to convince the commission that limiting Arizona Public Service's dividend payment to the parent would have a chilling effect on banks and other sources of capital needed by Pinnacle West and apparently even more badly by MeraBank.  Details of Mr. Sargeant's testimony didn't become known until after the stock market closed Friday.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Pinnacle West common closed at $12.50 a share, up 12.5 cents, on volume of 246,500 shares.  He said he first heard of the commission's dividend restriction when he was visiting Salomon Brothers Inc. in New York to consider an offering of high-yield, high-risk securities.  When the news came out, Mr. Sargeant said he was told by the investment bankers that they would have a great deal more trouble raising money.  Mr. Sargeant apparently left New York without arrangements for financing.  Meanwhile, pressure is mounting because of MeraBank's troubles.  Mr. Sargeant said Friday that the thrift's negative tangible net worth has widened to more than $200 million from $192 million late last month and from about $180 million in mid-June, as the thrift continues to reappraise its loan portfolio and to boost its reserves for losses.  Tangible net worth, the difference between tangible assets and liabilities, doesn't include accounting valuations for so-called good will.  Since July 31, MeraBank has technically violated a federal regulatory order that it boost its tangible net worth at least to zero.  Mr. Sargeant said there have been negotiations with thrift regulators attempting to set an amount that Pinnacle West would inject into MeraBank before disposing of the wounded thrift.  The executive declined to disclose details of those talks, although his testimony suggested that the needed injection would be well above $100 million but less than $600 million.  With sufficient funds, thrift regulators apparently have indicated to Pinnacle West that they will release the company from an undertaking to support MeraBank.  "We think the solution to the problem is to get rid of MeraBank," Mr. Sargeant said.  He testified that Pinnacle West has asked lawyers to analyze the possibility of Pinnacle West continuing operations in proceedings under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  However, he said, "it's not high on our list of alternatives."  Under Chapter 11, a company continues to operate with protection from creditor lawsuits while it works out a plan to pay its debts.  Budget Director Richard Darman warned that the Federal Reserve's credit policies may be pushing the economy into recession and suggested the Fed needs to bring interest rates down further.  In an interview yesterday on NBC's "Meet the Press," Mr. Darman said he fears the Fed "may have been a little bit too tight" and said, "If we do have a recession, I think it will be because they erred on the side of caution."  Asked whether he was suggesting the central bank should bring down interest rates more than it already has, Mr. Darman replied: "That would be a fair conclusion."  Top Bush administration officials have privately criticized the Fed's credit policies in recent months, but they have carefully avoided doing so in public.  Some Bush administration officials believe such public chastisement is counterproductive because it encourages some Fed officials to assert their independence from the White House.  Mr. Darman's comments, however, made it clear that if the economy takes a downturn, the administration is prepared to publicly blame the Fed.  The Fed's anti-inflation campaign began a year and a half ago, and by this spring it had pushed short-term interest rates up by three percentage points.  During the past few months, the Fed has reversed course and cut the bellwether federal-funds interest rate -- the rate on overnight loans of reserves among fed member banks -- by three-quarters of a point.  For Mr. Darman, however, that's apparently not enough.  "There is no reason for us to have a recession," Mr. Darman said.  "It is not necessary if there is sensible management on the part of ourselves and the Fed. . . .  It's important not that merely Chairman {Alan} Greenspan but that other members of the board and the FOMC {Federal Open Market Committee} that make crucial decisions on this, that they be more attentive to the need to avoid tipping this economy into recession."  Mr. Darman also signaled that the administration may propose deep new cuts in the Medicare health program for the elderly in its fiscal 1991 budget.  He said the cuts would go beyond the administration's proposals of February, many of which were rejected by Congress.  "The president hasn't made decisions with respect to fiscal year 1991," Mr. Darman said, "but I think it will be necessary to recommend additional structural reforms in the entitlement programs . . . certainly Medicare."  He said the burden of the cuts would fall on health care providers such as doctors rather than on elderly beneficiaries.  Mr. Darman also suggested the administration may propose cuts in agriculture and veterans' programs.  But he said he doesn't favor cuts in the Social Security program.  McDonnell Douglas Corp. received $90.9 million in Navy contracts for advance purchase of material for aircraft for Spain.  FMC Corp. was awarded a $34.6 million Army contract for fighting vehicles.  LTV Aerospace & Defense Co., a unit of LTV Corp., received an $11.2 million Army contract for fire-direction equipment.  In an unusual pre-emptive strike, one law firm sued another in an effort to shift some of the blame for a disastrous $29 million private placement that is likely to generate a mass of shareholder lawsuits.  The tiny West Orange, N.J., law firm of Lampf, Lipkind, Prupis, Petigrow & LaBue sued the giant New York firm of Milbank, Tweed, Hadley and McCloy in U.S. District Court in Newark, N.J. Lampf Lipkind seeks a court judgment that Milbank and others -- rather than Lampf Lipkind -- are responsible for millions of dollars lost by investors.  Also named as defendants in the suit are Southeastern Insurance Group, which made the private placement, and the accounting firm of Deloitte, Haskins & Sells.  Southeastern is insolvent and was taken into receivership by the Florida Department of Insurance earlier this month.  Lampf Lipkind, two of whose partners were officers and major shareholders in Southeastern, filed the suit aiming to absolve itself before any investor lawsuits were filed against it.  Matthew Boylan, a Roseland, N.J., attorney who is representing Lampf Lipkind, said the pre-emptive suit was intended to "forestall" a racketeering claim against his client, which would "get instant press and damage the influence of my client."  Mr. Boylan added that the Southeastern offering memorandum was prepared by Milbank, and if it is deemed by a court to be defective, "it would be Milbank's fault."  A spokeswoman for Milbank said the firm wasn't aware of the suit and didn't have any comment.  On Thursday, a day after Lampf Lipkind filed its suit, a class-action suit was filed in federal court in Newark on behalf of creditors, shareholders and bondholders of Southeastern.  The suit alleges securities violations and wrongful conduct by Southeastern and certain of its officers and directors, along with Lampf Lipkind and Deloitte.  Steven S. Radin, a Newark attorney who filed the suit, said the suit may later be amended to allege racketeering by Lampf Lipkind.  He said, "We didn't see fit at this point to sue Milbank."  According to Lampf Lipkind's own suit, Southeastern issued stock and sold subordinated debentures in August 1986 to raise money.  The insurer raised $29 million from the private placement.  More than $4 million of that money came from four members of Lampf Lipkind, who were investors.  Milbank and Deloitte were retained in connection with the offering.  Lampf Lipkind said it "relied on the expertise of" Milbank and Deloitte and that it didn't provide any advice on the offering to Southeastern.  According to the private placement memorandum, William Lipkind was Southeastern's executive vice president, reinsurance, while Neil Prupis was Southeastern's executive vice president and general counsel.  Both are principals of Lampf Lipkind.  William O'Neil, an official with the Florida Department of Insurance, said he hadn't seen the lawsuits.  He said the agency "certainly" intends to talk to lawyers at Lampf Lipkind to determine the cause of Southeastern's insolvency.  A spokesman for Deloitte said the firm was unaware of the suits and had no comment.  James River Corp. said it approved in principle a $280 million plan to expand its pulp mill in Marathon, Ontario.  The expansion will increase the paper concern's softwood-pulp capacity at the mill to 1,000 tons a day from the current 500 tons.  The company, which has timber-cutting licenses on 1.6 million acres in northwestern Ontario, said the plan will increase its internal supply of premium-quality pulp and minimize the impact of swings in the cyclical pulp market.  Whenever rules are rewritten there are winners and losers.  And there are bound to be plenty of both now as 96 mostly free-world nations prepare the most ambitious recasting ever of the rules of international commerce: the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade.  For the U.S., which still is struggling with a $100 billion-a-year trade deficit, the GATT talks are particularly important.  The Bush administration is trying to ensure that world trade expands further -- and with it, the level of U.S. exports.  The negotiations begin in earnest next month in Geneva, and the U.S. already has an agenda in mind.  "The fish or cut bait stage is just about to start," says William Lane, senior trade specialist at Caterpillar Inc., which is hoping for agreements to slash foreign tariffs on construction equipment.  But the effort to open more markets, while benefiting many segments of the U.S. economy, will hurt others.  Says Carla Hills, the White House trade representative: "We're willing to put our protections on the table, as long as our partners are prepared to put theirs up also."  Specifically, the U.S. is particularly seeking more open trade in agriculture, services, telecommunications and other high-tech industries, as well as in capital goods.  Beyond that, it wants to broaden the agreement to encourage foreign investment and to expand protection for copyrights, patents and other forms of intellectual property.  After all, the U.S. is estimated each year to lose revenues of between $40 billion and $60 billion to intellectual piracy.  Until now the agreement has generally covered only trade in manufactures, although it nominally extends to agriculture.  To help get what it wants from the GATT, though, the U.S. and other industrialized nations will have to make some concessions themselves.  And the likely candidates for sacrifice are traditional industries with longstanding import protections, such as steel and textiles.  The Bush administration implicitly acknowledged its readiness to make the trade-off when it recently signaled its intention to end steel quotas no later than March 31, 1992.  But the U.S. will have to be willing to make further concessions.  As a South Korean negotiator remarked to a U.S. official recently: "You want to bring new areas into the GATT?  Then bring the old ones back to the GATT, too."  A meaningful agreement will be attained only with the backing of large, newly industrializing and developing countries, such as Brazil, India, South Korea and Mexico -- countries seeking a larger role in industries that advanced countries currently protect.  Indeed, the present GATT round is named after a developing country, Uruguay, where these talks first began in 1986.  The U.S., which has played a lead role in the GATT ever since it helped create the organization in 1947, has other items on its wish list: an improved mechanism for settling trade disputes, for instance, and agreements to cut back subsidies and protectionist local procurement policies.  "It's a quantum leap for the GATT," says Warren Lavorel, chief U.S. negotiator in Geneva.  For the good of all participating nations, the Uruguay round has to succeed, Mr. Lavorel says, quoting a colleague who quips that "we're doomed to success."  But while some less efficient parts of the U.S. steel and textile industry might be hurt by a greater opening up of world markets, there are huge potential benefits in other areas.  For one thing, U.S. consumers would benefit from lower prices for steel and textiles.  And many U.S. companies would be winners if the Uruguay round succeeds.  For example, the U.S. has the potential to expand exports of pharmaceuticals.  But all too often U.S. pharmaceutical companies find their expensive research and development work stolen by companies in other countries, depriving them of research and development costs that can total one-quarter of a drug company's revenue.  "For us patent protection is essential," says Harvey Bale, senior vice president, international, at the Pharmaceuticals Manufacturers Association.  Mr. Bale acknowledges that some hard bargaining lies ahead.  "A multilateral solution is preferable," he says, "but it isn't clear that a multilateral solution will be forthcoming if the Indians, the Brazilians and others won't agree."  U.S. officials had feared that large developing nations would seek to block attempts to include new areas in this round of talks.  But now such concerns seem unfounded.  Even India has made a proposal covering intellectual property.  ---  @ GATT's Rounds 1947 -- General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade signed by 23 countries in Geneva.  1947-1962 -- Periodic rounds of talks aimed at cutting specific tariffs.  1964-1967 -- Kennedy round.  Moved toward across-the-board tariff reductions on industrial products.  1973-1979 -- Tokyo round.  Subsidies and other non-tariff barriers discussed seriously for first time.  1986-1990 -- Uruguay round.  Launched to extend trade liberalization and to widen the treaty to include services, intellectual property and other areas.  Ninety-six countries are now members.  Porsche Cars North America said it will recall 1,936 of its model 944 cars for a possible suspension defect that could cause a driver to lose control of the car.  The recall through Porsche dealers involves only 1988 model cars.  Porsche said no accidents had been reported and that the defect was discovered during Porsche's own internal testing.  Louis T. Rosso, 55-year-old president and chief executive officer of this supplier of diagnostic and life-sciences laboratory instruments and related products, was named to the additional post of chairman, succeeding Henry Wendt, 56, who resigned after the merger last month of Beckman's former 84%-owner, SmithKline Beckman Corp., and Beecham Group PLC. Mr. Wendt is chairman of the newly formed SmithKline Beecham PLC, a pharmaceutical concern, and remains a Beckman director.  Kenneth N. Kermes, 54, group corporate development director of SmithKline Beecham, resigned as a Beckman director, reducing board membership to seven.  Congress can help damp the rise in health-care costs, bringing the U.S. closer to the desirable goal of affordable, high-quality health care for all who need it.  The solution lies in the uniform tax treatment of all qualified medical expenditures, whether paid for by insurers or paid out-of-pocket.  Reducing or eliminating tax deductibility could discourage coverage and would certainly be met by substantial political opposition.  In the current political climate, it would seem better to expand the tax-deductibility of medical outlays.  Currently, employer-provided health insurance is a tax-deductible business expense but is not taxable income to the employee.  This inconsistent treatment was designed to increase employer-provided health-insurance coverage, and in large measure it was responsible for much of the increase since World War II in the number of people insured.  But today it harms those efforts to keep medical costs under control that use higher deductibles and copayments to help reduce unneeded services.  Most employees and unions resist increased deductibles and copayments -- witness the "Baby Bell" strikes.  In addition, the self-employed and others who might be insured are discouraged from obtaining insurance in part because of the cost.  In after-tax dollars it is unaffordable or unacceptably high.  Individuals with supplemental Medicare insurance or a Section 125 "cafeteria" benefit plan -- in which employers offer choices of tax-free benefits -- are able to cover some out-of-pocket costs with pre-tax dollars.  But many people do not have access to these options  In the past, the disparity in tax treatment was smaller.  Medical expenses totaling more than 2.5% of an individual's taxable income were tax-deductible.  In recent years, however, that floor was raised to 7.5%, increasing the cost of health care for a significant number of individuals.  If uniform tax treatment were made law: -- Employees would be more likely to accept higher deductibles and higher copayments, especially if the plan were designed so that employees would receive no net reduction in total compensation.  -- Retirees also would be somewhat more willing to accept increases in deductibles and copayments.  In any event, the Financial Accounting Standards Board will soon require corporations to report on their balance sheets unfunded health-care benefits for their retirees.  This will undoubtedly stimulate some companies to increase the cost-sharing of their former employees.  For future retirees, prefunding could be possible.  -- Equity and fairness would be established between employers that have cafeteria-benefit plans and groups that don't.  All qualified out-of-pocket expenses would be tax deductible.  If "use it or lose it" provisions were also relaxed, there would be a significant incentive for individuals to conserve out-of-pocket payments covered by cafeteria plans, which could then be applied to other benefits or to other years.  These rollover provisions for unused benefits would encourage innovative approaches to insurance-plan design and administration.  Insurers could be made to focus on medical risks rather than on prepayment for elective services.  -- The net cost to the self-employed and individually insured would be reduced, increasing the number of people covered.  This would be even better if insurance at group rates were available to them as well.  -- HMOs and some other plans provide a specified package of health-care benefits for a fixed monthly premium.  Out-of-pocket payments usually aren't required, so there is currently an unfair marketing advantage for these plans not available to "service," "indemnity," or self-insured plans that have introduced cost-containment provisions requiring out-of-pocket after-tax payments.  -- The patient could then choose the type and scope of insurance coverage, and the type of care, provider and procedure based on quality and medical need and not on whether the service is insured, or what the tax consequences may be.  Currently, the patient has an incentive to opt for insured services because he can't apply the savings elsewhere.  -- Cost-containment provisions would then be more meaningful and appropriate to the patient, since he would have an immediate and personal stake in what medical care to use.  Decisions to conserve would create savings that would benefit the patient directly.  There would be an immediate loss of tax revenue if deductibility were expanded.  To make sure that this loss is manageable, the question of what is insurable and what is deductible would have to be defined carefully.  In addition, simulation and pilot studies should evaluate the impact on cost, quality and access.  The resulting savings should lead to more overall economic activity, more taxes paid, and less of a financial burden for uncompensated care.  (See related story: "By Favoring Big Insurance Deductibles" -- WSJ Aug. 14, 1989). ---  Dr. Schenken, a pathologist and director of the Nebraska Chamber of Commerce, was a Republican candidate for Congress in 1988.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @Procter & Gamble a$1.44 ... $1.08 (9) 33.33  @NWNL Cos. $1.27 ... $1.08 (4) 17.59  @ NEGATIVE  @Tech-Sym $ .22 ... $ .28 (3) 21.43  a-Excludes charge of 45 cents a share from restructuring costs.  Source: Zacks Investment Research  What's going on in the executive suites?  Bethlehem Steel Corp. now favors a national health-care plan.  Executives at American Airlines, Chrysler Corp. and Alcoa are calling for more government control over our health-care system.  Other members of the Business Roundtable are hinting at similar thoughts.  What these leaders of the free enterprise system are saying is: We can't control our company's health-care costs, so let's turn the entire system over to government.  They would be better advised to take a close look at their own behavior.  While government policies are responsible for many of our health-care ills, large employers are far from blameless.  By providing their employees with overly generous health-insurance coverage, many are fueling the fires of the medical inflation they complain about.  A major reason for rising health-care costs is that over-insured consumers in the medical marketplace are spending someone else's money.  Decisions on how much money to spend are made by doctors and patients.  The bill is sent to the employer or the employer's insurance carrier.  It's as though the employer gave each employee a credit card to use in the hospital equivalent of a shopping mall -- where providers of services are more than willing to help the employee find all sorts of interesting things to buy.  Insurance coverage for small medical bills is especially wasteful.  Usually, it will cost an insurer more than $50 to monitor effectively a $50 physician bill -- thereby doubling the cost of health insurance.  But failure to monitor encourages patients and doctors to make wasteful decisions without fear of third-party scrutiny.  Overly generous health insurance not only causes rising medical costs, but is usually a lousy buy for the purchaser -- whether a corporation or an individual.  In general, anyone who has a policy with a deductible of less than $1,000 is paying a very high price for the additional coverage.  In some cases, policyholders are paying more than $2 for a dollar's worth of coverage -- a waste of money, even if they are certain they are going to have future medical expenses covered by the policy.  Take a standard individual health-insurance policy sold to 40-year-old men.  After the policyholder has reached the deductible (which he chooses), he pays only 20% of medical expenses up to a maximum out-of-pocket expense of $1,000.  Beyond this threshold, the insurance company covers all expenses.  As the accompanying chart shows, on a high-deductible policy, the premium paid per dollar of insurance coverage is measured in fractions of a penny (see accompanying illustration -- WSJ Aug. 14, 1989).  But once the deductible goes below $1,000 the price of additional coverage begins to soar.  Policyholders who choose a $100 rather than a $250 deductible will pay $2.14 for each additional dollar of coverage -- $1.14 more than any possible insurance benefit]  A similar principle holds for group health insurance for large companies.  Employers often are paying considerably more in premiums than any value the policies could possibly have for their employees.  In many cases, employers would save money if they raised the deductible and simply gave the employees an amount of cash equal to the loss of coverage.  Given the wastefulness of health insurance with deductibles below $1,000, why is it so prevalent?  A major reason is federal tax policy.  If employees pay medical bills with their own money they are using aftertax dollars.  Employer-provided health insurance is purchased with pre-tax dollars.  As a result, liberal insurance coverage appears more attractive than higher wages:  -- For an employee in the 15% income-tax bracket with a 15.02% Social Security payroll tax, $1.43 in health insurance is an alternative to $1 in wages.  -- For an employee in the 28% bracket (also facing a 15.02% Social Security tax), $1.76 in health insurance is an alternative to $1 in wages.  Because of federal tax policy, it is in the self-interest of employers and employees to buy additional health insurance coverage -- purchases that would not be made if after-tax dollars were required.  What can be done?  Congress should act immediately to make it a matter of national policy to encourage people to choose $1,000-deductible health-insurance policies.  The tax deduction for employer-provided health insurance should be limited, so that people who choose to pay higher premiums for low-deductible coverage would pay with their own, after-tax money -- not with the taxpayer's money.  In addition, individuals who buy their own health insurance should also be able to deduct the premiums for $1,000-deductible policies on their income-tax returns.  At the same time, the government should create tax incentives for people to deposit as much as $500 a year in individual Medisave accounts.  Funds in these accounts would accumulate tax free and could be used to pay small medical bills.  Health-care spending will begin to be brought under control only when most buyers are spending their own money in the medical marketplace. (See related story: "By Expanding Tax-Deductibility" -- WSJ Aug. 14, 1989).  ---  Mr. Goodman is president of the National Center for Policy Analysis in Dallas.  This article is based on a forthcoming study co-authored by Gerald Musgrave.  Consumers are losing the battle to ban one of the rental-car businesses' most controversial add-ons: the collision damage waiver.  Over the past 16 months, several states have proposed laws drastically reducing the need for motorists to pay for such a waiver, which costs as much as $13 a day and is similar to insurance.  But some car-rental companies have talked many of those states into withdrawing these bills, which essentially ban the waiver.  And last week, in a move that may stall remaining efforts to wipe out the waiver, Alamo Rent A Car Corp. sued Illinois for passing such a bill.  The optional waiver is essentially an agreement that a car-rental company won't charge the driver for any car damage in many cases.  Consumer advocates and state attorneys general have long criticized the waiver for being too expensive; renters spent an estimated $500 million on the add-on in 1987, even though they caused only $260 million in damage to rented cars.  What's more, many drivers pay for the waiver without realizing their own automobile insurance policies may cover such damage.  "Pure and simple, it's a rip-off," says Steve Gardner, an assistant state attorney general in Texas.  "It has to go."  But smaller car-rental companies say they need the waiver to compete with the majors.  Large car-rental companies may be able to absorb damage costs, but smaller outfits say they can't. (Hertz Corp. and Budget Rent a Car Corp., in fact, support banning the waiver.)  "The penalty is particularly severe {for} the smaller companies," says Michael LePlaca, an attorney for the Car Rental Coalition in Washington.  "In some cases, their fleet is under 100 cars.  The loss of one vehicle is a big problem."  So far, the smaller companies are winning.  Last year, lawmakers in California, Hawaii, Florida and many other states proposed bills banning the waiver.  But after intense lobbying by some local car-rental concerns this year, Hawaii and Florida dropped their bills.  California passed a weaker bill, capping the waiver fee at $9 a day and mandating disclosure of what it covers.  In all, seven states have backed off passing any bills.  At least another dozen states have passed legislation requiring only that waiver terms be disclosed fully.  The only states effectively to ban the waivers are New York and Illinois.  Those states limited the amount car-rental companies can charge for automobile damage to $100 in New York and $200 in Illinois -- which eliminates most people's need to take the waiver.  But last week, Alamo sued Illinois, alleging the law deprives the company of its rights to recover damages to its cars.  And some states that are still considering bills will probably hold off now to see how the Illinois law fares in court, officials in those states say.  Alamo's suit, "will put the brakes on even more," says Art Weiss, an assistant attorney general in Kansas.  Still, consumer advocates aren't giving up.  In February, Rep. Lynn Martin (R., Ill.) proposed a bill in Congress to eliminate the waiver on cars rented less than 30 days.  That bill is still in committee.  But, says the representative's spokesman, "We're picking up some broad-based support."  The pilots union at Northwest Airlines reached a tentative agreement on a new contract that sets a lower wage scale for new hires but provides pilots with strong job protections.  The progress in the 2 1/2-year-old contract dispute and the fact that the union accepted a so-called B-scale for new hires marks a major victory for Alfred Checchi, head of an investor group that recently acquired Northwest's parent, NWA Inc.  The pilots were the only employee group still working under an expired contract.  Mr. Checchi wasn't available for comment.  The agreement is a setback for the Air Line Pilots Association, which is trying to eliminate two-tier wages from the industry.  Northwest was the only major carrier without a B-scale.  Officials at the union's national headquarters weren't available for comment.  Most airlines negotiated B-scales during the early years of deregulation when carriers had losses and faced increased competition.  The industry is profitable again now, and the union had made preventing a B-scale at Northwest the cornerstone of its campaign to eliminate two-tier wage structures at other carriers.  Under the Northwest agreement, new hires will be paid at the lower rate for their first five years of employment.  If ratified by the rank and file, the contract will be in effect until March 1, 1994.  The union apparently caved in on the B-scale issue to win significant job protections.  The contract requires Northwest to promote a minimum number of pilots to captain and first officer by March 1995 and prevents layoffs during that period.  Northwest is prevented from selling any major assets without renegotiating the contract.  Pilot jobs are also protected in the event of a change in control of the company.  A spokesman for the Northwest pilots said the agreement "contains the best job-protection language in the industry."  The pilots also will receive an immediate average 9.3% pay increase and 4% increases in 1990, 1991 and 1992.  A television doctor and a former aide to Sen. Lloyd Bentsen (D., Texas) will be the finalists in a runoff election early next month to fill the House seat vacated by former Speaker James Wright.  The Republican, pediatric allergist Bob Lanier, finished atop the eight-candidate field in the first round of balloting Saturday with 39% of the vote.  Democratic attorney Pete Geren finished second with 32%, with the remaining candidates finishing far behind.  A runoff is required because no candidate received more than 50% of the vote.  Although Dr. Lanier, a fixture on Fort Worth television, came in first, Mr. Geren received a formidable boost this weekend when Mr. Wright, who remains enormously popular in his home district, gave him a strong endorsement.  The district, drawn to ensure Mr. Wright's repeated reelection, is considered Democratic.  The vacancy was created when Mr. Wright resigned both the speakership and his House seat in the face of charges he violated House ethical rules.  The final round of balloting is something of a surrogate battle between Texas' two senators.  Dr. Lanier is the handpicked candidate of GOP Sen. Phil Gramm, while Mr. Geren has the strenuous backing of his former boss, Sen. Bentsen.  Five years ago, when CNA Insurance Cos. sold a liability policy to directors and officers of Home Savings & Loan Association, Burien, Wash., it was worried about the growing peril of thrift failures.  The big insurer specified in no uncertain terms that the policy didn't cover losses from suits brought by thrift regulators.  But a federal judge in Seattle didn't accept that clause at face value.  In April, the judge ruled that the provision illegally hindered the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp.'s ability to function as a receiver for the thrift, which had since failed.  "Private parties to an insurance contract may not frustrate the congressional purpose behind receivership by annulling FSLIC's federal powers," the judge ruled.  So, if the FSLIC wins a pending $5 million negligence suit against former directors and officers of Home Savings, the agency will be able to collect from CNA.  So it goes in the tumultuous business of directors' and officers' insurance.  Once a standard-type policy that fostered relatively narrow litigation, it now is a pivotal source of money in the maze of civil damage suits brought against company directors by shareholders, employees and the government.  As a result, lawsuits just to interpret the policies are burgeoning, pitting insurers against everyone from plaintiffs to the companies that buy the policies to the insured executives themselves.  This litigation, while concentrated now on the thrift industry, is by no means limited to it.  "There's been an explosion in the last two or three years, and it's growing dramatically," says Kenneth Wollner, a risk-management consultant for Wyatt Co. in Chicago.  "It's an industry unto itself."  The results can be unpredictable.  With little precedent to guide them in deciphering policies, judges often disagree on issues such as coverage of legal fees, whether a company -- as opposed to its officials -- can sometimes make a claim against a D&O policy, and whether an insurer can shield itself from certain government suits.  In April, for example, a federal judge in Texas upheld a regulatory-exclusion clause similar to the one tossed out by the court in Seattle.  "There really is not a consensus on these issues," says John Morrison, a defense attorney with Altheimer & Gray in Chicago.  Disputes over coverage have existed as long as the D&O policy has, about 50 years.  But as lawsuits against directors and officers mushroomed in the mid-1980s, so did the policy claims.  Disputes snowballed as carriers tightened their coverage.  And with millions of dollars at stake in judgments and out-of-court settlements, many of them are ending up in court.  "A lot of directors are waking up to find they're the subject of shareholder suits, and insurance companies aren't giving them coverage," says James Hubbell, a lawyer in Denver with Kelly, Haglund, Garnsey & Kahn.  Some legal specialists say directors don't pay enough attention to D&O coverage.  Worse, they say, is a lack of communication between a company's legal department, which doesn't see insurance as very interesting work, and its risk managers, who find it hard to talk to lawyers.  As a result, lawyers often don't thoroughly examine the D&O policies until after a lawsuit has been filed.  "It's like wills," Mr. Morrison says.  "You don't know how good it is until after the fact."  Once a suit against directors and officers is filed, it doesn't take long for D&O policy disputes to follow.  An early issue: Who pays the continuing cost of defending against the suit?  Most executives look to the carrier, sometimes only to find policy clauses giving the insurer the "option" to advance legal expenses.  And some carriers opt to pay only when liability is determined -- "many years and many millions of dollars later," as Mr. Wollner puts it.  "That has been the most litigated issue," says Dan A. Bailey, a lawyer with Arter & Hadden in Columbus, Ohio.  The courts are divided, but lawyers say a slight majority has endorsed a pay-as-you-go system.  Mr. Bailey says most carriers are now trying to confront the question up front, by specifying in the policy whether they're obligated to advance legal costs.  Another sticky problem is whether the company that buys a D&O policy should benefit from it.  Such policies cover only directors and officers; but since most shareholder suits name both the company and individuals as defendants, it's sometimes hard to separate their liability.  PepsiCo Inc. and Continental Casualty Cos. still are battling over how much the carrier should pay of a $22 million settlement PepsiCo and its directors reached in 1985 with a shareholder who sued them over allegedly false PepsiCo financial statements.  A federal court ruled in 1986 that Continental's D&O policy clearly covered only directors and officers, but it said Continental bore the burden of proving what portion of a settlement should be excluded from the coverage.  PepsiCo and Continental will go to trial on that question later this year unless an agreement is negotiated.  "That's one of the big issues on the horizon," Mr. Bailey says.  "There are scores of cases pending and even more situations where it's being discussed."  Also looming is the question of whether regulators, acting as receivers for failed institutions, can collect on D&O policies in damage suits they bring against former officers and directors.  At the root of this dispute are provisions in many policies excluding coverage of lawsuits brought by a company against its own officers and directors.  Some insurers resist claims from regulators by arguing that the regulators, as receivers, are standing in the company's shoes.  That argument apparently has limitations.  In January, a federal judge in Arkansas said it wouldn't preclude the FSLIC, as receiver for failed FirstSouth, from collecting on a D&O policy issued by American Casualty Co. of Reading, Pa.  "The stated purpose of the policy is to insure the officers and directors against loss from claims made for breach of duty," the judge ruled.  "This purpose would be entirely defeated or very severely restricted if suits brought by the FSLIC were not covered."  Carriers also have had mixed success explicitly precluding coverage of regulatory actions.  The Seattle judge, for example, said such a clause violates federal policy.  The judge in the FirstSouth case found such a provision too vague.  But in Lubbock, Texas, last April, a U.S. district judge said the clause barred a claim by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp., acting as receiver for Seminole State National Bank.  He found "unpersuasive" rulings by other courts saying such provisions violate public policy.  Fresh disputes, meanwhile, are cropping up.  In Florida, a federal judge held that International Insurance Co. must reimburse directors of Southwest Florida Banks Inc. for some $1.4 million they had to return to the company.  The sum was a portion of the money the directors had received under a "golden parachute" agreement.  They returned it to settle a shareholder suit against the directors that had challenged the plan as a waste of corporate assets.  International contended that the repayments weren't "losses" covered by the D&O policy, but the judge disagreed.  In June, the U.S. Circuit Court in Atlanta upheld his ruling.  Lawyers say the case may prompt carriers to exclude such coverage.  Golden parachutes often are used to discourage takeovers, and that attracts shareholder suits.  "I think it's something carriers might respond to," says Mr. Morrison.  ---  @ Directors on the Defensive  @ Sources of lawsuits filed against company directors and officers, 1979-87:  @ (In percent)  @ Shareholders 46.9%  @ Employees 21.5  @ Customers 19.6  @ Other 5.8  @ Competitors 3.8  @ Government 2.4  @ Lawsuits against officers and directors per 100 companies*:  @ 1988 88  @ 1986 75  @ 1984 67  @ 1982 60  @ 1980 58  @ 1978 52  @ *Note: Companies with assets over $1 billion  @ Source: Wyatt Corp. survey of 1,708 corporations  Gladys and Robert Means had to answer a question that confronts many family-business owners: What would happen if they turned the shop over to Junior?  Their West Chester, Pa., company, Claren Inc., was posting losses.  The management was unsettled, partly because the couple was divorced.  Amid toughening competition, the family operation, then only two stores selling personal computers and peripherals, had no long-term plan for survival.  At stake was a family investment of $600,000.  That was in 1987.  Junior -- 20-year-old Robert "Sam" Means Jr. -- got the top job.  His mother recalls admonishing herself, "I'm going to do what he wants me to do."  Ceding control to the younger generation, always a delicate process, is made all the more complicated when a company is troubled.  At the very time that tough decisions are needed to revive the company, family members are also trying to define their new roles in the business.  Whether a newly installed son or daughter can face those tough decisions, even at the risk of disrupting family ties, often determines whether the business will survive.  Sometimes, says Ronald Drucker, a small-business consultant for Laventhol & Horwath, "Everyone is busy working the oars, but no one wants to look at the compass."  He says only a tiny percentage of family businesses negotiate the transition from the founding generation to the next, though the odds generally improve if outside managers are recruited.  Claren illustrates emphatically both the promise and the turmoil in this situation.  Turning the business over to a family member barely out of his teens was a tremendous risk.  Though it's too early to tell whether an initial sharp turnaround will become a lasting success, so far the gamble is paying off.  Sam Means, now 22, has shown all the brashness of youth.  Sweeping into his new position as general manager of the company, he cut up his parents' company credit cards and even fired his older sister, Elizabeth, who was general manager of the warehouse.  He has transformed the two-store operation into a franchise chain with 102 outlets in 25 states.  Sales soared more than sixfold to $25.5 million last year from $4 million in 1986, and the company projects chainwide revenue of $75 million this year.  Claren had pretax profit of $1.2 million in 1988, after breaking even in 1986.  In June, the accounting firm Arthur Young & Co., having reviewed Claren's books and operations, chose it as one of the best young companies in the Philadelphia area.  Sam Means, who will collect a salary and bonus totaling about $700,000 this year, figures he'll be a millionaire by November.  "I live and breathe the business," he says.  "I'm not here to be second best."  Claren, formerly called Pennsylvania Computers, was started seven years ago in the Means home, just two months before Robert and Gladys were divorced.  Initially, the elder Mr. Means sold computer disks as a sideline; he and Gladys continued to work full time as academic psychologists.  In 1983, the business grew into a computer store in West Chester; four years later, it opened a second store, in Princeton, N.J.  The company remained a casual, marginally profitable affair where the owners hired family and friends.  But with the modest growth, things started to go awry.  Costs were ballooning out of proportion to sales.  Competing chains, such as ComputerLand and Businessland Inc., were growing ever bigger.  Family members say the lines of authority began to waver.  Robert and Gladys, who often failed to coordinate their decisions, disagreed over when to draw on company funds for personal use.  Robert and Elizabeth disagreed over how to run the warehouse.  Several times, Robert threatened to pull out of the company.  "I let the family play a part of the business," Robert says.  "That breeds a lot of problems."  The biggest problem: The West Chester store posted a loss of $150,000 for the first half of 1987.  The company, though never highly profitable, had never suffered such a setback.  But Sam was producing results.  As a teen-ager, he had helped out in the stockroom and on the sales floor.  After dropping out of Boston University in 1987, he returned to the business to run the Princeton store.  It had a $16,000 profit in the same six months as the West Chester store's big loss.  Family members say Sam succeeded by making his store more organized than the West Chester outlet, where inventories weren't taken regularly and accounts weren't kept current.  The disparity in the stores' performance prompted the owners to make a change.  Although Robert and Gladys Means had some qualms about the inexperience of their son, they had confidence in his competitiveness and organizational skills.  Besides, they decided they didn't really want to turn to an outsider.  So early last year, they named Sam general manager of the company and gave him a one-third equity interest.  The younger Mr. Means says he felt a heavy, even fearful, obligation to salvage his parents' business.  But he also saw it as a way to build his retailing empire.  He sought and was given final authority on business decisions.  "Someone has to be the boss," he says.  "You don't have debates or you'll move too slow."  At a family meeting soon after Sam took over, Elizabeth, then 24, was "fired slash quit," she says.  Sam says it was difficult to fire his sister, but he adds, "You have to decide what you want to do and do it.  You can't get emotionally involved."  Sam proceeded to cut costs with something less than a light touch.  There were rapid firings of workers -- including family friends -- who, he says, "knew about computers but weren't into making money."  The work force shrank to 15 from 30.  Where Robert Means concedes that he couldn't separate personal loyalties from business needs, his son didn't hesitate.  "Sam is enough of a jerk" to put the company before friends and family, the father says.  Only reluctantly did the son buy a new desktop computer for his marketing staff.  Claren went through the scorching summer of 1988 without office air conditioning; it was finally installed this summer.  As cash flow improved, his mother suggested a pay raise for employees.  Sam's response: "This is not a charity, Mom."  The father observes, "Sam is a little too tough."  Hard work, Sam says, "is where you're going to make it or break it."  He pushes himself hard, too, as do some buddies he has brought into the company.  His best friend, Patrick Rucker, also 22, has served as warehouse manager and now is sales manager.  On several occasions, Messrs.  Means and Rucker have driven trucks in the middle of the night to pick up a delivery in New York instead of waiting the next day for the shipment.  Recognizing the need for a more professional atmosphere and image, Sam also hired two of his father's more experienced friends to run the operations and accounting control departments.  Perhaps most important, Sam Means rolled out the franchise strategy with a vengeance.  With franchisees providing most of the funds for expansion, he sees it as the route to fast growth, that will let Claren compete against the big chains.  And he is counting on the franchise operators, with their personal stakes in individual stores, to turn a better profit for both the store and Claren.  The parent company acts as a middleman that, because of its volume, can buy IBM-compatible machines at a discount.  Then Claren sells the merchandise, at a 6% markup, to its franchises.  Where the company used to wait for business to fall into its lap, Sam Means has planned a broad advertising campaign, which he says will be ready to hit local and national business publications and local radio outlets by December.  By now, the rest of the family is uniting behind their tyro tycoon.  Elizabeth has been rehired as a marketing manager, where Sam thinks her strengths lie; Gladys runs the Princeton store, and Robert serves as a consultant.  Sam's stepmother heads the accounts-payable department, and his 18-year-old sister, Lee Ann, works part time in sales.  He hopes his nine-year-old sister, Claire, and infant half-sister, Lauren, will eventually occupy positions in the business.  But the company, at its present rate of growth, must face new challenges that will test its willingness to keep the business all in the family.  The elder Mr. Means suggests that the company may need more professional management as it grows beyond what Sam may be able to handle.  The son?  He doesn't see a problem, though he acknowledges he must learn to hand some responsibility to others.  For now, he says of the family business, "It's not growing fast enough for me."  I've been a flight attendant for nearly 20 years and am proud of my profession.  The hearts of the world stopped for a while on July 19, awaiting information on the crash of our Flight 232.  My own heart bled on Friday when I learned of the crash-related death of a fellow flight attendant.  One hundred eleven people lost their lives that day and many more were seriously injured, but a lot of people survived as a direct result of the excellent training our pilots and flight attendants receive.  Much attention was given to the cockpit crew, and rightly so.  But precious little was said of the flight attendants who minutes before the crash were busy putting their training to use preparing the cabin for the landing.  The press rarely includes flight attendants in their coverage of mishaps.  We are part of the crew; we're there to serve passengers, but we're also there for passengers' safety.  We've worked hard to be accepted as safety professionals and by your exclusion you have failed in letting the public know how important our job is.  Trust me, if it weren't mandated by the Federal Aviation Administration that we be on board in sufficient numbers, the airlines soon would be rid of us, as we are many and costly.  Joann Shotzberger-Sichi  Mebane, N.C.  Xoma Corp. said it reached an agreement to acquire International Genetic Engineering Inc. in an exchange of stock.  The two biotechnology concerns said the agreement called for an exchange of 0.278 Xoma shares for each International Genetic share outstanding, within a price range of $16 to $22 for each Xoma share.  If the average price of Xoma's stock for the 15 days before the close of the transaction falls below or above the range, the ratio would be adjusted, Xoma said.  International Genetic, based in Santa Monica, Calif., has 7.9 million shares outstanding, indicating that Xoma would issue 2.2 million shares if the proposed exchange ratio is used.  Xoma closed Friday at $19.25 a share, down 12.5 cents in national over-the-counter trading.  Based on that price and the proposed ratio, the transaction would have a value of about $42.3 million.  Xoma develops biotechnology therapies for immune-related disorders and for infections.  For the first half, it reported a net loss of $7.5 million on revenue of $2.5 million, compared with a year-earlier net loss of $7.1 million on revenue of $2.5 million.  International Genetic develops treatments for cancer and acquired immune deficiency syndrome, among other things.  Last year, it had a loss of $663,000 on revenue of $5.6 million.  Its stock closed Friday at $5, up 37.5 cents a share, in national over-the-counter trading.  Rep. Joseph McDade (R., Pa.), who is under criminal investigation for receiving apparently illegal campaign contributions from a defense contractor, has repaid nearly $20,000 to the now-bankrupt firm.  Rep. McDade, the ranking Republican on the House Defense Appropriations subcommittee, authorized the payments to trustees of the minority firm, United Chem-Con Corp., in the past few weeks, according to Abbey Lowell, his lawyer.  Most of the payment was to reimburse the company's trustees for improper campaign gifts United Chem-Con made through employees and others.  Mr. Lowell said the veteran Pennsylvania lawmaker continues to deny any wrongdoing in his dealings with United Chem-Con.  In one letter to the trustees, Mr. Lowell explained that the repayments were made to avoid "even the appearance of impropriety."  Prosecutors and a Philadelphia grand jury are investigating whether Rep. McDade violated federal election or bribery laws in his dealings with United Chem-Con and other defense contractors.  The lawmaker accepted more than $45,000 in campaign gifts and speaking fees from officials of United Chem-Con and others affiliated with the company while he was helping the firm obtain $54 million in Navy equipment contracts.  In the past, Rep. McDade and his spokesmen flatly maintained that no laws were broken.  Now, his lawyer concedes that the congressman inadvertently may have received improper or illegal benefits from United Chem-Con, but he contends prosecution isn't warranted because Mr. McDade didn't act improperly.  The disclosures also seem designed to counter any possible investigation of Rep. McDade by the House Ethics Committee.  House Republican Whip Newt Gingrich, for example, has called the allegations "very, very troubling," predicting the ethics panel will pursue them aggressively.  Mr. Lowell said his client accepted the campaign money without knowing that United Chem-Con had reimbursed company officials and associates who contributed to Rep. McDade.  It is illegal for a corporation to donate to federal campaigns.  "The lack of compliance was not his," Mr. Lowell asserted.  Rep. McDade authorized his campaign committee and the House sergeant-at-arms to pay the nearly $20,000 to the bankruptcy trustees, Phoenix Management Services Inc., Chadds Ford, Pa.  In one letter accompanying the payments, Mr. Lowell acknowledged for the first time that the lawmaker had received "questionable campaign contributions" amounting to about $18,000 from United Chem-Con.  A second Lowell letter indicated that Rep. McDade also accepted "certain items of value" from the company that "might implicate certain federal laws."  This appeared to be a reference to transportation and other gifts that Rep. McDade might not have listed in public financial disclosure reports.  Talbot Briddell, Phoenix president, suggested that Rep. McDade will be asked to make additional payments to resolve other possible claims.  The statement confirmed that discussions were under way with Mr. McDade's lawyers, but Mr. Briddell wouldn't elaborate.  Mr. McDade, whose ties to United Chem-Con were disclosed last December in The Wall Street Journal, successfully pressed the Navy to set aside lucrative work for the company, helped to arrange multimillion-dollar appropriations that went to United Chem-Con and even pushed through legislation to keep the Lancaster, Pa., company eligible for preferential treatment as a minority-group-owned contractor.  The firm has been in bankruptcy proceedings in Reading, Pa., since 1987.  A number of company officials, including its president, James Christian, pleaded guilty to participating in a scheme to defraud the Navy by failing to deliver on its contracts and using Navy money for limousines, private jets and jewelry.  Mr. Christian and the others are cooperating in the investigation, which includes the company's dealings with James Guerin, a Lancaster businessman who owned 20% of the concern.  Tridex Corp., a maker of specialized electronic products, said it signed a definitive agreement to sell the assets of its Cambridge Products Corp. subsidiary.  Tridex said it will use proceeds to repay debt outstanding to Heller Financial Inc., redeem from Heller cumulative preferred shares, and buy back most of the stock purchase warrants issued to Heller under the loan agreement.  Tridex said the Cambridge connector business would be sold for more than $12.5 million, resulting in "a substantial profit."  Tridex also said net income for its first quarter, ended July 1, fell to $123,000, or five cents a share, from $227,000, or 12 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales slipped to $6.2 million from $6.4 million, mainly because of a slowdown in orders for lottery printers.  The company said it expects that market to "resume its growth."  Organogenesis Inc. reported a second-quarter loss of $997,231, compared with a loss of $682,038 a year earlier, reflecting higher marketing and operating expenses.  Revenue rose to $887,497 from $646,232.  "The increased losses incurred during this quarter are directly attributable to our planned transition from a research and development concern to an operating company," said Herbert M. Stein, chief executive officer.  Organogenesis, a biotechnology company, produces human tissue and organ equivalents for use in research testing as well as to replace damaged or diseased human body parts.  The company has signed two major collaborative and supply agreements and said it has another agreement pending.  Organogenesis, which recently leased a new facility in Canton, Mass., said it expects to begin shipping its first product, Testskin, in four to five weeks.  In the first six months, the company had a loss of $1.7 million, compared with a loss of $1.2 million a year earlier.  Revenue rose to $1,772,506 from $1,406,512.  A former employee of First National Bank of Chicago pleaded guilty to mail and wire fraud in connection with a trading scheme that used confidential information on stock deals involving the bank's clients.  The defendant, William Bronec Jr., profited by nearly $10,000 under the scheme, according to his plea agreement.  He could receive a jail sentence of as long as five years and a fine of as much as $250,000.  Mr. Bronec agreed to testify against another former bank employee, Danny Omar Cherif.  Prosecutors allege that Mr. Cherif illegally entered the bank, using a key card he kept after being fired by the bank in 1987, and stole information on stock-related deals that he and Mr. Bronec used to make trades.  Mr. Cherif's attorney couldn't be reached to comment.  CareerCom Corp. said it signed a letter of intent to be acquired for $11 a share, or about $121 million, by a group led by the Chicago venture capital firm of Golder, Thoma & Cressey.  Golder Thoma, which has organized Golder, Thoma, Cressey Fund III specifically for the CareerCom transaction, wouldn't comment on any aspect of its offer.  In a news release, Golder said it has commitments for a portion of the financing needed to complete the transaction and indicated it is confident that it will obtain the remainder.  First Century Partners, an affiliate of Primerica Corp.'s Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. unit, is helping Golder arrange financing.  It wasn't clear whether former or current CareerCom officials have an equity arrangement in the transaction, and neither the company, nor its adviser, Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., would comment.  CareerCom, an operator of career-training centers, said it has had a number of buy-out offers recently, some which remain on the table.  For example, in June the company said it received an acquisition offer of $10.50 a share.  The bidder wasn't identified at the time, but CareerCom said it wasn't the Golder group.  Terms of the other bids haven't been publicly announced.  CareerCom also agreed to pay a $500,000 fee to Golder if CareerCom backs out of the transaction once all financing has been arranged.  The news release said the acquisition is conditioned on approval of CareerCom's board, "satisfactory employment arrangements with certain individuals," who weren't named, and certain regulatory conditions.  Conditions of the letter of intent expire Sept. 10.  Separately, CareerCom said net income dropped in the fiscal third quarter from a year earlier.  It cited a $1.5 million one-time charge stemming from the cancellation of an employment contract.  In the third quarter ended June 30, net income was $300,518, or three cents a share, compared with $2.7 million, or 22 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue was flat at about $36 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, CareerCom closed at $10 a share, up 75 cents.  Inflation has clearly ebbed from its fierce pace at the start of this year, the latest government price statistics show, but the future of the economy remains in question.  Producer prices fell in July for the second month in a row, the Labor Department reported.  The 0.4% decline was the largest in three years.  Tumbling gasoline prices were primarily responsible, although prices slipped across a spectrum of wholesale goods, from cars to children's clothes.  Even excluding energy and food prices, which often swing widely from month to month, inflation at the wholesale level declined 0.2%.  Economists said the slowing economy was easing demand and consequently reducing pressure on prices.  But a Commerce Department report suggested that consumer demand at least may still have some vim.  Retail sales grew 0.9% in July, to $143.73 billion, the department reported, after declining a revised 0.1% in June.  The June decline was originally calculated at 0.4%.  The department also made a huge upward revision to its May retail sales figures, earlier reported as a 0.1% decline; after collecting additional data from retailers, the department said sales during the month actually increased 0.8%.  While the price figures are the latest -- and by far the strongest -- evidence that inflation is easing, the sales report choked talk that the economy has slowed to the brink of a recession.  "Economically the country appears to be in the best of both worlds, facing neither significant inflation nor recession in the near term," said Dirk Van Dongen, president of the National Association of Wholesaler-Distributors.  But Robert Dederick, chief economist at Northern Trust Co. in Chicago, said: "This is suggesting that maybe we are having a miracle, but I say, no, not really."  The financial markets seemed dubious as well.  After jumping at the first news of the producer price report, the Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 28.64 points, partly in response to the retail sales revisions, analysts said.  Bond prices dropped sharply as well.  Because of the strong retail sales numbers, coupled with recent reports showing the economy is still generating a large number of new jobs, a number of analysts believe the Federal Reserve Board won't act to bring down interest rates any further for a while.  A few months ago the Fed, confronted with evidence that the economy was slowing sharply, began nudging interest rates down after steadily pushing them up for a year.  The Fed had been trying to wring inflation out of the economy by making borrowing more expensive.  Fed policy makers are due to meet next week to chart monetary and credit policy for the following several weeks.  But Mr. Dederick said, "My feeling is the producer price index gives the Fed the opportunity to ease when they think the moment is appropriate, but the retail sales report says now is not the time."  David Berson, chief economist at the Federal National Mortgage Association, added: "I think the combination of moderate growth with inflation coming down a bit means the Fed is probably very happy now with the way things are going and probably sees no overriding reasons to change policy now."  Despite two months of falling prices, wholesale inflation is still running at a 5.7% annual rate in 1989, well above the 4% rise for 1988.  Steep increases in world oil prices this winter boosted the producer price index for finished goods at an alarming rate earlier this year, triggering fears that the country was headed for an inflationary spiral.  But oil prices have since plummeted, yanking overall price levels back down.  In July the prices wholesalers and distributors paid for energy products plunged 3.0%.  This, however, masked a 1.5% increase in the price of natural gas, which followed a 2.0% drop the month before.  A 1.9% drop in car prices also pulled producer prices down, as auto companies added sales incentives and began year-end discounts early to rid their lots of excess stock, government and private analysts said.  "August prices are even better than July so there's likely to be another decline in August," said Peter Pekkala, domestic economist for Ford Motor Co.  But he warned that the company will raise prices in the fall, when new models come out.  The auto incentives seemed to be attracting customers after several poor months.  According to the retail sales report, automotive dealers posted a 2.7% gain in sales in July following a 1.0% decline in June.  Sales at building-supply and hardware stores advanced 0.6% in July after slipping 0.2% in June.  But furniture sales slipped 0.3% after climbing 1.3% in June.  Overall sales of durable goods -- such items as cars, furniture and household appliances, expected to last three years or more -- showed a strong 1.7% gain in July, after several months of weakness.  Sales of nondurable goods grew 0.4% for the second month in a row.  In additional reassuring news on inflation, the prices of intermediate goods -- materials with some processing -- declined for the second consecutive month in July, suggesting that finished goods prices will continue to be held down in the future.  Intermediate goods prices dropped 0.2% last month.  And crude goods prices edged up only 0.2% after a 2.0% decline in June.  Figures in both reports are adjusted for seasonal changes.  Here are the Labor Department's producer price indexes (1982=100) for July, before seasonal adjustment, and the percentage changes from July 1988:  @ Finished goods .......................... 114.0 5.0%  @ Minus food & energy ................... 121.9 4.1%  @ Intermediate goods ...................... 112.6 4.1%  @ Crude goods ............................. 103.7 6.6%  Gordon N. Oakes Jr. started out working on his family's chicken farm.  That may seem like improbable preparation for an insurance executive, but selling is selling to Mr. Oakes, whether the product is poultry or policies.  And selling is what Monarch Capital Corp., where the tall 48-year-old serves as chairman and chief executive officer, needs to do more of.  The Springfield, Mass., insurer has watched sales of its variable-life policies, which combine insurance protection and mutual-fund investing, plummet in the past 18 months and its stock price cut in half as a result.  Second-quarter results, released last week, show that pretax insurance profit fell 29% in the first six months and earnings for the year are expected to be half of what Monarch posted two years ago.  Adding to those pressures, the company's need to revive variable-life sales will become even more critical if Monarch decides to shed its disability income insurance business.  Last month it hired an investment banker to help it consider various options for this division, including boosting its growth or selling it.  The disability business generated the bulk of the company's pretax profit in 1988.  About 10 years ago, Monarch bet big on variable-life insurance while the rest of the industry focused on universal-life products.  When Mr. Oakes joined Monarch as president and chief executive in the mid-1980s, he continued the process started by the previous chairman and led the company's transformation into a specialized financial-services concern.  Monarch jettisoned its traditional life and health insurance operations and moved into investment management, venture capital, data processing and real estate.  Today, it is the leader in the variable-life field.  Initially, it seemed as if Monarch had made the right choices.  Sales of its variable-life policies skyrocketed from $83 million in 1983 to $1.56 billion in 1987.  Market share for traditional whole life, term and universal-life policies dwindled.  But the bubble burst in 1988: Sales fell a whopping 87% to $204.6 million, and that trend has continued in the first six months of this year.  After the stock-market crash, shell-shocked investors no longer wanted their premium dollars invested in equities.  The crash also coincided with fears that Congress would no longer allow a life policy's investment earnings to grow untaxed until a holder cashes in his policy.  This tax-deferred advantage was preserved, but sales had already soured by then.  Mr. Oakes believes the move into variable-life was the right decision then, and sticking with that plan is the right decision now.  He thinks the time is right for a variable-life comeback because of the stock-market rebound and the decline in interest rates.  Besides, he believes "consumers want more of the control over their financial assets" that policies like variable-life provide.  With a variable-life policy, the holder, not the insurer, makes the investment decisions and bears the risk for the performance of the invested funds.  Mr. Oakes's immediate goal is to reposition Monarch's variable-life products by tailoring these policies to consumer needs such as retirement, estate planning or college savings.  He also thinks Monarch has to do a better job of explaining how these products work and the degree of control investors have over their savings in comparison with other insurance plans.  It also has to expand its distribution system and trim expenses.  "We have to do a better overall marketing job," he says, admitting that Monarch faces an uphill fight.  "That's one of our weaknesses."  After the crash, Mr. Oakes and Monarch's board had long discussions about the future of variable-life insurance.  He's "a pro-active board chairman," who's sensitive to the ideas and opinions of directors and staff members, says Anne Wexler, a Monarch director and chairman of Wexler, Reynolds, Fuller, Harrison & Schule Inc., a Washington lobbying firm.  And the company is acting on those ideas.  Rather than just mailing new literature to the broker network that sells its variable-life policies, Monarch now meets face-to-face with account executives to explain changes in the policies and keep them up to date on tax laws.  It redesigned its prospectuses and monthly statements to make them easier for buyers to understand.  To attract consumers still wary of the stock market, Monarch introduced a fixed-rate fund option for its policies.  To boost sales, Monarch has expanded its dealer network.  Now more than 400 securities brokerage firms sell Monarch's variable-life policies.  Originally, Merrill Lynch & Co., Oppenheimer & Co. and Fidelity Investments sold the policies.  This year, an in-house sales force also will hit the streets and Monarch will provide the variable-life policies for other insurers to sell under their names.  Monarch has reduced its variable-life back-office staff by 500, or 30%, from its 1987 peak, and there will be more cuts later this year.  The company had built up the staff to handle about $2 billion of variable-life sales annually, but with sales sagging, such servicing capacity was a big expense.  Meanwhile, the company uses expensive overnight mail sparingly and does more of its printing with a desktop publishing system, rather than using a typesetter.  The back-office pruning and other cost-cutting measures have saved Monarch $25 million in the past 18 months.  Mr. Oakes has bitten the bullet before.  In mid-1987, Monarch purchased the investment-management units of BankAmerica Corp., hoping to bolster its earnings with a steady stream of management fees.  But that earnings power won't be seen on the bottom line until the late 1990s because the company is writing off its $17.5 million investment in big chunks right now.  Other executives might shy away from such a practice, but Mr. Oakes says he would never reconsider a sound business decision because of its impact on the company's stock price.  "We're just running the business," he says.  Drenched with sweat, his heart pounding, Mario crouched behind a bush in Hungary and looked out at Austria and freedom.  He was still about 30 yards away from the empty fenceposts that mark the border.  Rusting coils of barbed wire were piled up beside them, confirming what the 20-year-old East German carpenter had heard months earlier on West German television: The Hungarians had torn down their piece of the Iron Curtain.  Mario had gone to Hungary a week ago from Dresden under the guise of a vacation.  Now, alone, scared and contemplating the two years minimum he would serve in prison if caught, Mario marshaled his courage and began to run.  He stumbled on the uneven ground -- he couldn't seem to run fast enough -- but he heard only the sound of his own breathing: no shouts from border guards, no gunshots, no sirens.  He came to a village, saw Austrian license plates on the cars, and knew he was free.  He has since been taken to a refugee camp in the West German town of Giessen, where he told his story.  Within a few days, he will leave the camp, a newly minted West German citizen.  East Germany is hemorrhaging people this summer.  Like Mario, many of them are young and frustrated by widespread deprivation and rigid state controls.  Once they leave, they routinely reproach their Communist leaders for clinging to Stalinist policies even as the Soviet Union and other East Bloc nations undertake reforms.  More than 55,000 East Germans have fled to West Germany this year, and the number is expected to reach 100,000 before the year is out, or more than double the exodus of last year.  Many of those who are leaving have permission, as the East German government has relaxed its visa policies, issuing 46,000 already this year, or more than it issued all of last year.  But even the liberalized procedures can't keep pace with the number of people anxious to leave.  For most applicants, getting permission to emigrate is as chancy as hitting the lottery.  Dozens have been flooding into Hungary each day since that East Bloc nation took down its Iron Curtain in May.  About 300 more have taken the desperate step of holing up in West German consulates in Prague and Budapest or West Germany's mission in East Berlin.  (On Thursday, East Germany pledged that those who have gone underground in Hungary or are seeking asylum at West German diplomatic missions can return home and seek to emigrate without fear, Hungarian officials said.  So far, no one has accepted such offers.)  Should the growing exodus continue, as West German authorities expect, East Germany faces a work-force crisis, as its 20 million population is drained of its younger workers.  For Erich Honecker, East Germany's 76-year-old party chief, "it should become clear that he has an internal crisis on his hands and only he can solve it by giving people hope for the future," says Peter Danylow, a specialist on that country at the German Society for Foreign Affairs in Bonn.  "The ideological idealism in East Germany has sunk to zero," he says.  The dispute between East and West intensified Thursday as the East German Communist Party newspaper, Neues Deutschland, warned that West Germany was "provoking East Germany to take a tougher stance" on the refugee issue.  At the same time, East Germany denied Western reports that it was halting travel to Hungary.  Tensions between Bonn and East Berlin are now at their highest level since 1961 just before East Germany erected the Berlin Wall to halt emigration to the West, says Mr. Danylow.  "It doesn't have the showdown character of the Wall era, but it is badly upsetting the balance of cooperation and conflict that is peculiar to German-German relations," he says.  The East German government has accused Bonn of meddling in its internal affairs by not evicting the East Germans from West German missions.  The West German government, whose constitution obliges Bonn to welcome East Germans with open arms, has responded sharply that the blame for the flood of refugees lies in East Berlin's refusal to accommodate a growing desire for reforms.  The Bonn government did close the doors of its East Berlin mission last week, asserting that the 130 people inside had exhausted capacity.  It also said that, today, it will close its Budapest embassy to the public "for the time being."  West German officials then urged East Germans to pursue legal exit routes.  "There is very little else Bonn can do," says Eduard Lintner, the speaker on German affairs for the ruling conservative majority in the West German parliament.  "It is an East German problem.  Only East Berlin can create better conditions to prevent the acts of desperation by its people.  We urge them to adopt the kinds of reforms shown by the Soviet Union, Hungary and Poland.  But their leadership remains stubborn."  For three decades, East Germans have been making hair-raising escapes from their country.  They have burrowed under the Berlin Wall or soared over it in balloons.  Most sought to swim rivers or vault fences.  Thousands have made it through, but dozens have been killed by border guards or exploding mines, and countless others have been caught and imprisoned.  East Berlin withdrew its standing order to shoot on sight under pressure from Bonn, but it wasn't until the Hungarians dismantled their border fence as part of their own reforms that East Germans unwilling to wait for a visa got a better chance to flee.  Now the East German government has mounted a disinformation campaign against the Hungary-Austria escape route.  "We were still scared after we entered Austria," says Michela, a petite 21-year-old textile worker from Dresden who arrived in Austria via Hungary a week ago.  "We were told that the Austrians would return us to East Germany."  Nonetheless, "more will come, if they still can," says Ingo, a 24-year-old machinist from Erfurt who is in Giessen after escaping through Hungary.  Ingo, Mario and other refugees wouldn't give their last names, saying they feared retribution against relatives still living in East Germany.  "Most of the people our age have had a snootfull and feel that they are wasting their lives," Ingo says.  "There's not much to do but work, and with no chance of ever doing anything else than the job you're doing.  Even on the job, the machines are always breaking down because there aren't any spare parts.  "You can't buy anything, no matter how much money you have.  Imagine, you can't even find work clothes in a worker's state," he says.  Prospects for advancement are dim "unless you sign up for the army for three years and are a member of the Free German Youth," a party organization, Ingo says.  His friend, Frank, tells of problems getting parts for his lathe at work or enough wood to build a tool shed.  Michela from Dresden says basic foodstuffs and clothing are scarce.  "Just trying to find an orange or a pair of jeans is impossible," she says.  She adds that her neighbors in East Germany still count on Christmas packages from relatives in the West for, not toys, but coffee and bed sheets.  Then there is the omnipresent East German state security agency, the Ministerium fuer Staatssicherheit.  "The 'Stasi' are everywhere," says Ingo.  "Most of their 'ears' are people who committed minor crimes but got off with a promise to listen around in the discos and the factories to what you're saying."  He recalls how a fellow worker sauntered over recently to ask why Ingo was going to Hungary for vacation. " 'Come on,' he tells me, 'just between us, you're going to hop to the West, aren't you?' I kept my mouth shut."  On the other hand, many of the East German refugees recount tales of the help they received from Hungarians.  Joerg, a 32-year-old machinist from Potsdam, says he drove his Polish-built car to Hungary but got hopelessly lost in a border town.  A villager looked at his East German license plates and asked where he was going.  "I took a chance and told him I wanted to get to the border, and he said he'd take me there in the morning," Joerg says.  After a night of drinking wine, they drove to the border, where Joerg handed him the keys to his car and struck off into the woods. (East German refugees say they saw dozens of cars with East German license plates abandoned near the Hungarian border.)  After doubling back a few times to avoid watchtowers, Joerg got lost again.  But a Hungarian forester pointed him in the right direction.  He then picked his way through the forest for about an hour until he saw a woman bicycling down a country lane.  "She smiled and said 'welcome to Austria' when I asked her where I was.  She knew exactly where I came from," Joerg says.  Enough get through to make it hard for the center at Giessen to keep up.  Roughly 90% of the refugees, all of whom receive citizenship automatically, come to Giessen first for passports and orientation, says Peter Hartmann, the center's harried deputy director.  He chain-smokes cigars and describes how the throng rose from 1,300 a month in early 1988 to 3,400 last January, to 5,000 a month in April, to more than 8,000 in May and nearly 10,000 in July.  "From the numbers and what the people are saying, all signs are that East Germany has become a social pressure cooker," he says.  "Before, we dealt with only small groups.  Now we're at a hundred or more a day."  The 2,000-bed facility is putting the overflow up in hotels and sports halls.  More than half of the East Germans entering West Germany are between 20 and 40 years old, and about half are in blue-collar occupations.  Last year, nearly half were industrial workers with varying skill levels.  About 10% were highly trained engineers and technicians, and 10% more were civil servants.  Doris Cornelsen, an analyst at the German Institute for Economic Research in West Berlin, says East Germany already has problems maintaining a steady work force as its population ages.  East Berlin has imported 100,000 workers from Third World communist states, including 43,000 from Vietnam and 14,000 from Mozambique.  "If they continue to lose their own workers at 100,000 a year, especially from the young generation, they are certain to be faced with a big problem," Ms. Cornelsen says.  Most refugees remain at Giessen only a few days.  They are then eligible for unemployment insurance until they can find work.  Once past the initial adjustments, East German refugees have tended to become quickly integrated into West German society, says Uwe Berlinghoff of the Hesse state social ministry.  In their favor are a common language and familiar job training procedures.  But there is some initial culture shock, beginning when the refugees step off the train.  West German salesmen, sensing an opportunity, have descended on Giessen, hawking everything from life and medical insurance to new furniture.  "We try to ease the culture shock as much as we can," says Mr. Hartmann.  "The two Germanys have grown so far apart in social and economic development that this is a first step into a new world for them."  GATX Corp. said its board authorized the redemption of the $75.9 million outstanding amount of its 11 1/2% subordinated notes due June 30, 1996.  The company said the redemption price is 104.6% of the principal amount.  Chicago-based Gatx provides railcar leasing, maintenance and management; capital goods leasing, financial services, and real estate; bulk liquid terminal storage and pipelines and shipping.  Acme Electric Corp. said it will report net income for the year ended June 30 of $3.9 million, or 85 cents a share, including extraordinary income of 10 cents a share from an accounting change.  In fiscal 1988, the supplier of power conversion equipment for electronic and electrical systems earned $759,000, or 17 cents a share, all from operations.  Sales in fiscal 1989 rose to $90.9 million from $82.3 million, the company said.  A Nokia Corp. unit said a U.S. administrative law judge made a mixed recommendation in Nokia's patent dispute with Motorola Inc. over cellular mobile telephones.  While the administrative official for the International Trade Commission supported Nokia in terms of patent design, the official recommended to the ITC against Nokia on two other patent issues, power controls and keypad, Nokia's U.S. unit said.  The unit, Nokia Inc., is based in Basking Ridge, N.J.  The commission is scheduled to make an initial determination by the end of the month and a final determination on the dispute by next April, Nokia said.  "The commission will also consider four more claims -- brought by Motorola against Nokia and its affiliates -- that weren't part of Judge John J. Mathias's ruling, Motorola said."  In April, Motorola, a Schaumburg, Ill., electronic equipment maker, filed patent infringement complaints with the ITC and in federal court in Chicago to block the import of certain cellular radio telephones made primarily in South Korea.  Motorola sought unspecified monetary damages and a permanent injunction against Nokia, a Helsinki, Finland, telecommunciations company, and Tandy Corp., Fort Worth, Texas, among others.  Nokia and Tandy have a joint venture in South Korea in which they make cellular telephones to be sold under separate brand names in the U.S.  A Tandy spokesman said the effects of the official's decision won't be felt until Aug. 29, when the ITC is expected to decide how large a bond the two companies must post pending a final ITC decision if the venture wants to continue selling the imported telephones.  The bond would be forfeited if Nokia loses the case.  The spokesman would not disclose how many cellular telephones are sold by Tandy but said the company intends to stay in the market.  The court is expected to hear arguments in the case in November, and the ITC probably will make its final determination after the court decision, a Nokia official said.  Motorola said Judge Mathias had ruled for the company in recommending to the ITC that the company be granted temporary relief.  He didn't specify the form of relief, according to the company, which is seeking orders that would permanently ban the import and sale of infringing cellular mobile telephones.  Turnover on the Zurich Stock Exchange in July was up 3.2% to 62.64 billion Swiss francs ($38.2 billion) from 60.701 billion francs in June, the Economics Department of the Canton of Zurich said.  Turnover in July was up 31.6%, however, compared with 47.6 billion francs in the same month a year ago, the department said.  Stock market analysts said the increase in July's turnover compared with June's was notable because July and August are usually the slowest months of the year on the stock exchange.  They attributed the increase to the market's bullish trend, which began in early June, but picked up steam in July, as foreign investors began to show renewed confidence in Swiss equities.  For the first seven months of the year, turnover totaled 383.43 billion francs, an increase of 14.2% from a year earlier.  AMR Corp. amended its share purchase rights plan to entitle stockholders, other than a person or group acquiring 10% or more of its outstanding common shares, to buy additional shares of AMR common at half price under certain circumstances.  The change is designed to help ward off any hostile takeover effort.  In addition, after a 10% stake has been acquired, but prior to the acquisition of a 50% interest, the company can exchange share purchase rights for new common shares or the preferred stock equivalent.  AMR is the parent of American Airlines.  The four largest Cadillac dealers in the Washington, D.C., area have sued General Motors Corp. for $200 million in damages because the auto maker installed two new Cadillac dealerships in their market.  The dealers alleged that GM hurt their businesses by adding the two outlets in the face of weakening demand for Cadillacs in Washington.  An attorney for the four dealers said three of them are already unprofitable and at least one may end up closing.  Capitol Cadillac Co. in Greenbelt, Md., Jim Coleman Cadillac Co. in Bethesda, Md., Lindsay Cadillac Co. in Alexandria, Va., and Moore Cadillac Co. in Vienna, Va., filed the lawsuit after the new dealerships in Gaithersburg, Md., and Waldorf, Md., opened earlier this year.  The case is awaiting a November trial in federal court in Baltimore.  "What we didn't need was more dealerships," said Daniel J. Piliero II, the attorney for the four dealers.  "What we needed was more acceptable products."  Officials of the Cadillac division of General Motors said the new dealerships were needed to keep pace with suburban growth in Washington.  "We felt we already had four good dealerships in that area," said Kyle Johnson, a Cadillac spokesman.  "But we needed a couple more dealers to serve the market."  But the four dealers, which had the only Cadillac dealerships in the Washington area, said there sales have been falling in recent years.  Mr. Piliero said the four dealers sold about 6,000 cars combined until three years ago.  By last year, their combined sales dropped to just 5,200 cars and may fall below 5,000 units this year.  Cadillac officials didn't have sales figures available for the Washington market.  One of the problems facing Cadillacs in Washington is the demographics of the market, Mr. Piliero said.  The average Cadillac buyer is in his mid-50s, according to GM.  But in Washington, 48.1% of the population is 25-44 years old.  The first Soviet-Israeli joint economic venture will manufacture medical diagnostic equipment in Kiev, the Tass news agency announced.  Relations between Israel and the Soviet Union have been growing warmer in recent months, but full diplomatic ties, broken off in 1967, haven't been restored.  Tass quoted Andrei Serdyuk, deputy health minister in the Ukraine, as saying the joint venture was formed by his ministry, the Israeli corporation Elscint and a Kiev former weapons plant that has switched to making consumer goods.  The enterprise will assemble foreign-made parts into ultrasonic equipment used to diagnose problems with internal organs and check the health of fetuses, Tass said.  Its products will be for both export and domestic use.  "Unfortunately, there is a shortage of such equipment in the U.S.S.R."  Mr. Serdyuk told Tass.  Separately, the Soviet weekly Arguments and Facts reported that the country's first free economic zones would be created near the Finnish border in the northwest and near Nakhodka in the Soviet Far East.  Ivan D. Ivanov, deputy chairman of the state Foreign Economic Commission, said the zones would go ahead as experiments even though legislation defining their status hasn't been worked out.  He said the zones would be autonomous entities with independent budgets.  A six-month confrontation between Capital Cities/ABC Inc. and a technicians union appears to be ending, in plenty of time for the fall season.  ABC said more than 2,000 out of about 2,150 employees belonging to the union have ratified a new four-year contract.  A few small work units rejected the contract, ABC said, but are expected to be persuaded to approve it soon.  A union press release said the union will schedule further negotiations "as soon as possible" for the units that rejected the offer.  The National Association of Broadcast Employees and Technicians represents mostly engineers, camera operators and tape editors at the network.  ABC applauded the new contract, which gives the network more flexibility in such areas as hiring temporary crews.  Two years ago, the union and NBC fought over work rules, which led to a 17-week strike.  Analysts described Interlake Corp.'s plan to restructure itself, announced Friday, as the company's attempt to thwart a possible takeover by Mark IV Industries Inc.  The restructuring -- which would leave the company highly leveraged -- calls for it to make a $45-per-share cash dividend to common shareholders; suspend further dividends on the common stock; create an employee stock ownership plan to buy $20 million of the company's stock, and borrow $550 million.  On news of the restructuring, the price of Interlake's common stock jumped $4.25 to $58 Friday in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Interlake's announcement followed by a little less than a month Mark IV's disclosure July 12 that it was seeking approval to buy as much as 14.9% of Interlake's stock.  A spokesman for Mark IV, which is based in West Amherst, N.Y., couldn't be reached for comment.  L. Crandall Hays, an analyst with Robert W. Baird, described Interlake's move as a "typical ploy" for getting rid of an unwanted suitor.  "They are making themselves unattractive to an acquirer," mostly by jacking up their debt load, he said.  The company's ratio of debt to total capitalization would leap to 70% from 29% if the restructuring goes through, according to Phua K. Young, an analyst with Shearson Lehman Hutton.  Mr. Phua estimated Interlake's market value at $60 to $65 a share, but said the company might be worth as much as $70 a share to a potential financial buyer, such as Mark IV.  He valued the restructuring package at about $61 to $63 a share -- equaling the sum of the $45-a-share dividend plus an estimated post-restructuring market value for the stock of $16 to $18 a share.  Interlake said the plan, among other things, is intended to provide an immediate benefit to shareholders, increase employee ownership of stock and accelerate earnings growth.  However, Mr. Hays questioned the strength of earnings growth because interest payments on an additional $550 million in debt would "take a big bite" out of profits.  As part of the restructuring, Interlake also said it intends to focus on its core businesses, including powder metals, aerospace components, and storage and handling products.  It plans to divest itself of unrelated lines, but it didn't specify what they are.  Speculating on the basis of the company's news release, Mr. Phua said it looks as though the company may sell its Arwood castings business in Rockleigh, N.J.  Officers and directors owned 3.9% of Interlake's 10.1 million shares outstanding, according to its latest proxy dated March 23.  ABB Asea Brown Boveri AG, the Swedish-Swiss electrical-machinery and engineering group, said it submitted a proposal to Spanish authorities to take over and restructure the ailing CCC Group, Spain's largest electrical-manufacturing concern.  Under the takeover plan, ABB would pay a nominal price for the company's shares, currently held by the Monte Carlo-based Anglo-Italian company Arbobyl Ltd., plus $40 million for CCC's assets, said ABB spokesman Heinz Haussmann in Zurich.  In addition, ABB has promised to invest $45 million over five years in the three companies that make up the CCC Group -- Cenemesa, Conelec and Cademesa.  In Madrid, Jose Montes, managing director of ABB's operations in Spain, said the restructuring would slash CCC's work force almost in half, to around 2,700 employees from 5,200.  Because of that, he said, the proposal needs the approval of Spain's central and regional governments, as well as labor unions.  Last year, CCC reported losses of 30 billion pesetas ($252 billion) and revenue of just 18 billion pesetas, Mr. Montes said.  The CCC Group was formed in the early 1980s from the merger of companies previously owned by Westinghouse Electric Corp. and General Electric Co. of the U.S. and Switzerland's BBC Brown Boveri AG. Brown Boveri subsequently merged with Asea AB of Sweden to form ABB.  Grand Metropolitan PLC of Britain agreed to take part in Harlin Holdings Pty.'s friendly 5.4 billion Australian-dollar (US$4.13 billion) takeover of Australian conglomerate Elders IXL Ltd.  Grand Met said it would invest A$50 million ($38.2 million) in Harlin, a closely held company controlled by Elders executives, to help finance the A$3-a-share bid.  Separately, Grand Met's Pillsbury Co. said it sold its Van de Kamp's Frozen Seafoods unit to Chicago-based Whitman Corp. for $140 million.  The decision to join Harlin's bid for Elders is in line with Grand Met's position as a major marketer of Elders's Foster's Lager in Britain and the U.S.  A Grand Met spokesman said the investment would give the company a "nominal" stake in Harlin, though he wasn't able to provide an exact figure.  Harlin currently owns about 18% of Elders.  Three big electronics and telecommunications equipment makers agreed on a common design for fiber-optic transmitter-receivers, clearing the way for a rapid expansion of the technology's use.  "We see this as the path to ubiquitous use of fiber in the office," said William H. Hackett Jr., a marketing manager for lightwave components at American Telephone & Telegraph Co.'s Solid State Technology Center in Breinigsville, Pa.  "This is a major step toward making (fiber-optic transceivers) a commodity," as opposed to low-volume, highly specialized gear, he said.  The three companies -- New York-based AT&T, Hewlett-Packard Co. of Palo Alto, Calif. and Siemens AG of West Germany -- agreed on standard electrical and optical specifications for transceivers, as well as common package dimensions and plugs.  The design covered in the agreement complies with the Fiber Distributed Data Interface standards under development by the American National Standards Institute.  Canadian primary steel production totaled 305,149 metric tons in the week ended Aug. 5, up 6% from 287,931 tons the previous week and up 45.5% from 209,771 tons a year earlier, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  For the year to date, production totaled 9,516,566 tons, up 6.3% from 8,952,344 tons a year earlier.  A metric ton equals 2,205 pounds.  Singapore's investment in Malaysia is growing rapidly, Malaysian Trade and Industry Minister Rafidah Aziz said.  In the first half of this year alone, investment of $256 million (U.S.) had been approved, making Singapore the third largest foreign investor after Japan, with $520 million, and Taiwan, with $364 million, she said.  Two-way trade between the immediate neighbors climbed to $6.23 billion last year from $4 billion in 1987, she said.  She spoke at a seminar on investment opportunities in Malaysia.  Canadian housing starts rose 0.5% in July to a seasonally adjusted annual rate of 207,000 from a June rate of 206,000, Canada Mortgage and Housing Corp., a government agency, said.  William Lucas, President Bush's unsuccessful nominee to head civil-rights enforcement at the Justice Department, was named to another department post that doesn't require Senate confirmation.  Mr. Lucas was named by Attorney General Dick Thornburgh to head a low-profile Justice Department office that coordinates relations with state and local groups and civil rights organizations.  Mr. Lucas, a black politician, left the Democratic party to join the GOP and was defeated in his 1986 campaign for the Michigan governorship.  The Senate Judiciary Committee, on a 7-7 vote, last month effectively killed Mr. Lucas's nomination to head the department's civil rights division.  A majority was needed to send the nomination to the full Senate.  Democratic members of the committee criticized President Bush and Mr. Thornburgh for nominating Mr. Lucas, who has little experience as a lawyer and none as a civil rights litigator.  The appointment to the Justice Department liaison job ends consideration within the Bush administration of appointing Mr. Lucas to the civil rights post on an interim basis while Congress is on its summer recess.  Unilever Group, the Anglo-Dutch food and consumer-products group, said pretax profit rose 19% in the second quarter to #445 million ($708 million) from #375 million a year earlier.  The results, which surpassed market expectations of around #415 million in earnings, were enhanced by proceeds of #27 million from the sale of an office building in Sweden.  Excluding this item, pretax profit rose 11%, the company said.  Profit after tax and minorities but before extraordinary items, the equivalent of net income, rose 23% to #259 million from #209 million.  Group sales rose 13% to #4.83 billion from #4.28 billion a year earlier.  Partners of Deloitte, Haskins & Sells and Touche Ross & Co., in separate meetings in Dallas, approved the proposed U.S. merger of the two firms.  The combined firm, Deloitte & Touche, would have U.S. revenue this year of close to $2 billion.  The other international affiliates of the two firms will vote on the merger before year's end.  World-wide, the new firm would be known as Deloitte Ross Tohmatsu International and would have revenue of more than $4 billion in 1989, the two firms said.  If all mergers now being discussed among Big Eight accounting firms are accomplished, Deloitte & Touche would be the fourth biggest U.S. and world-wide accounting firm, based on revenue.  J. Michael Cook, Deloitte's chairman and chief executive officer, will be chairman and chief executive of the combined firm.  Edward Kangas, managing partner and chief executive of Touche, will be U.S. managing partner of the merged firm and head of its international organization.  The combined firm will have 20,000 employees in the U.S. and 65,000 world-wide.  Deloitte has 111 U.S. offices and 850 U.S. partners.  Touche has 85 U.S. offices and 840 U.S. partners.  Messrs.  Cook and Kangas have said about 75 offices of the firms will be combined.  Trans World Airlines caught other airlines off guard yesterday as it made an aggressive two-week offer to cut its lowest fares by as much as $160 in the weak fall-travel season.  The offer, which starts today and runs until Sept. 1, covers domestic flights from Sept. 9 to Dec. 15, and international flights from Oct. 1 to May 21.  It enables passengers to make one change in their traveling schedules without penalty, a benefit enabling them to book the low fares before their itineraries are set, a spokesman said.  If fares are cut after tickets are purchased, TWA will refund the difference.  A sample round-trip fare for the Chicago-San Francisco route on Tuesday and Wednesday is $198 -- $125 less than the airline's lowest discount fare.  On international flights from New York, tickets are available for $100 off the previous round-trip fares.  It couldn't be determined whether other airlines will follow suit.  A Delta Air Lines spokesman said TWA "did a good job" of catching its rivals flatfooted by announcing the cuts on the weekend.  He said Delta is "looking at" TWA's move, but hadn't decided whether to match it.  Representatives of Pan Am Corp. and USAir Group Inc. said the carriers were studying TWA's action, but hadn't decided whether to respond.  Other airlines couldn't be reached for comment.  The most striking aspect of the Bush administration's handling of the latest hostage crisis is what hasn't happened: There have been no leaked stories about fights among top advisers, no discrepancies between the public statements of top officials, and no obvious free-lance policy-making by presidential aides.  All have been standard elements of crisis-management operations in Washington in recent years.  But they haven't been seen during the first test of President Bush's crisis-management team -- mostly because the team is a small, collegial and secretive group of old hands who have traveled down this road before.  That isn't to say the administration's handling of the crisis has been all smooth.  The president and his aides initially created more of a crisis atmosphere than they intended, raising the danger they would be held captive by hostage-takers in the Middle East just as the Reagan and Carter administrations were.  They then helped move so quickly from confrontation with the Lebanese Shiites holding American hostages to a game of diplomatic cat-and-mouse over a possible hostage release that they probably have lost any chance to make the murderers of Marine Lt. Col. William Higgins pay for their crime.  But overall, the Bush team's performance has been characterized by "collegialism, professionalism and problem-solving," says Kenneth Duberstein, chief of staff under President Reagan.  The team's most important operating feature has been the unusually extensive involvement of Mr. Bush himself in details of crisis management; he has shown that in a pinch he is more of a micromanager in the tradition of Jimmy Carter than a delegator like Ronald Reagan.  And the most intriguing aspect of the crisis-management effort may be the emergence of two deputies, Deputy Secretary of State Lawrence Eagleburger and Deputy National Security Adviser Robert Gates, as important cogs in the administration's national-security machinery.  The Bush crisis team consists of Secretary of State James Baker, Defense Secretary Dick Cheney, National Security Adviser Brent Scowcroft, Director of Central Intelligence William Webster, Joint Chiefs of Staff Chairman Adm. William Crowe, White House Chief of Staff John Sununu, Mr. Gates and Mr. Eagleburger.  Few others in the administration have been involved in the most important discussions of diplomatic and military planning.  Usually well-informed top aides have had to admit that they don't have first-hand knowledge of the most important administration deliberations.  It isn't surprising that the Bush team has turned out to be so harmonious; many of its members have worked side-by-side for years.  President Bush and Messrs.  Baker, Scowcroft and Cheney all served in the Ford administration; Messrs.  Scowcroft and Cheney were working together in the Ford White House during a similar crisis, when the U.S. sent Marines to rescue the crew of a U.S. merchant ship seized by Cambodian communist forces.  And the president, Mr. Baker and Adm. Crowe worked together through previous hostage crises in the Reagan years.  In the latest crisis, Mr. Bush set the tone from the outset.  He was traveling to Chicago when the terrorists announced they had hanged Col. Higgins.  Mr. Scowcroft, who normally travels with the president, and Mr. Baker were away on trips of their own.  Their back-ups, Messrs.  Gates and Eagleburger, consulted by phone.  When Mr. Gates informed the president in Chicago that Col. Higgins had been killed, Mr. Bush made two immediate decisions: to call Col. Higgins's wife and to return right away to Washington.  He demanded enormous amounts of information and began telephoning foreign leaders he had come to know in scores of overseas visits as vice president.  Aides say he initially was given summaries of intelligence reports on the hostages -- particularly concerning the status of Joseph Cicippio, the other hostage threatened with death -- but then began demanding to see the raw cables on which the summaries were based.  The president and his national-secuity aides held regular meetings.  To damp the crisis atmosphere aides realized they were creating, Mr. Bush held the sessions in the Cabinet Room, on the main floor of the White House overlooking the Rose Garden, rather than in the Situation Room, an austere and secretive room in the White House basement.  The crisis meetings have ended now that the hostage situation has slipped back into a cycle of diplomatic probing.  But the prominent roles played by Messrs.  Eagleburger and Gates have continued, administration aides say.  In particular, Mr. Gates, a longtime intelligence officer, is emerging as a close confidant and "alter ego" of his boss, National Security Adviser Scowcroft, says one White House official.  As if to underscore the point, Mr. Gates has just been promoted: He now has the title of assistant to the president, the top rank awarded to White House staffers.  Chrysler Corp. said it is recalling about 500,000 model-year 1981, 1982 and 1983 cars because of a defect that could cause a loss of steering control.  The recall involves cars operated in 20 states where salt is used on roads, plus the District of Columbia.  In a worst case, the company said, corrosion could cause the collapse of a suspension crossmember that controls the front wheels.  Chrysler said it was first alerted to the problem by reports from Canadian car owners.  The company said it knew of no accidents connected with the problem.  The recall is free of charge to car owners, who will be notified by mail.  A Chrysler spokesman said the problem stopped in 1984 when the auto maker switched to a more rust-resistant metal and put a drainage hole in the crossmember.  Included in the latest recall are the 1981, 1982 and 1983 Plymouth Reliant and Dodge Aries models, 1982 and 1983 Chrysler LeBaron and Dodge 400 models, and the 1983 Dodge 600 and Chrysler New Yorker and E-Class models.  Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., the embattled securities firm that has agreed to plead guilty to six felonies, reached settlements with 10 states as part of a nationwide plan to refurbish its image and extricate itself from a legal quagmire.  The voluntary plan, drafted recently by Drexel and the North American Securities Administrators Association, an organization of U.S. and Canadian securities commissioners, would allow Drexel to continue operating freely in the states despite its record as an admitted felon.  It also is likely to allow the states to avoid time-consuming and costly investigations into Drexel's activities when their treasuries are strapped for cash.  In April, Drexel agreed to pay $650 million and plead guilty to six felony counts related to a federal insider-trading investigation.  The plea agreement was made in conjunction with a broad settlement of securities-law violations with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Because the firm agreed that it committed felonies, securities commissioners in most states can automatically revoke Drexel's license to do business.  While some states, including New York and California, still are reviewing Drexel's status, 24 states have said either that they will settle with Drexel or that they favor the plan, people familiar with the negotiations between Drexel and the states said.  Drexel said it already has paid $975,000 in fines to 10 states and expects to pay $11.5 million as part of its goal to operate freely across the U.S. and set an industry standard for securities-law compliance.  Drexel also plans to contribute funds to establish a foundation that would promote securities regulations and ethics in the securities industry.  "It's very important that good things come out of this," said Saul S. Cohen, whose appointment as Drexel's general counsel in April was approved by the SEC as part of the firm's agreement to settle insider-trading charges.  Mr. Cohen, who is leading Drexel's effort to reach settlements with the states, said in an interview: "There's a realization that Drexel has to work hard to restore the confidence of the nation and the firm.  This is one of the ways you do it."  On Friday, for example, Drexel agreed to pay $100,000 to the Arkansas Securities Department even though the state said it hasn't any evidence the firm did anything wrong and despite the fact that Drexel hasn't had an office in the state for at least four years.  "The incentive here is to avoid us revoking or suspending their license," said Beverly Bassett, the state's securities commissioner.  "This will sort of hold that in abeyance even if the felony convictions don't relate to activities in Arkansas, because (Drexel is) registered in the state and we don't look kindly on licensees having felony convictions."  In addition, Drexel has paid fines and settled with Hawaii, Idaho, Kansas, Maryland, Mississippi, Oklahoma, South Carolina, Vermont and Wyoming.  "I'm very proud of" these settlements, Mr. Cohen said.  "It's a logical extension of the firm's settlement with the SEC, which was the most extensive and comprehensive in history."  As a result of its agreement with the SEC, Drexel had to make dozens of changes in its management structure and procedures to enforce compliance with federal and state securities laws.  "Everyone had the expectation when the government investigation (into Drexel's activities) ended, proper sanctions would be meted out," Mr. Cohen said.  "We're trying to see that states are full partners with regulators in effecting the overall sanctions and controls that were envisioned in the SEC consent agreement."  Drexel's settlement with the states stems from a disciplinary agreement drafted by Drexel and a North American Securities Administrators Association committee, led by Susan Bryant, the Oklahoma securities commissioner.  When the committee was formed this year, Ms. Bryant said it would determine what kind of action the states may take against Drexel and what the SEC pact covered.  Although the plan between Drexel and the states resembles the SEC settlement, Ms. Bryant has said action taken by the states probably will vary.  For example, New York and California, the states where Drexel is most active, probably will take a more aggressive stance against the firm than other states do.  Nevertheless, Mr. Cohen said that he expects the firm to work with New York and California regulators on a settlement and that a settlement with all 50 states "could be reached" within nine months.  "I can't pre-empt what states already have scheduled," he said, "but I'm hopeful we've made considerable progress putting some of our problems behind us."  According to a draft of the plan, Drexel's fines paid to the states have been based on the state's population and on the size of Drexel's business in the state compared with Drexel's total business before its sale of its retail brokerage operations.  Some lawyers said Drexel could set a standard for the securities industry in the way it is settling with the states.  Drexel's settlements so far "have some significant implications," said Harvey Pitt, a partner in Washington at the law firm of Fried, Frank, Harris, Shriver & Jacobson.  The settlements "will encourage other states to take a look at Drexel and see what they can obtain," he said.  "States may be encouraged to take action against firms in other situations in settlements with the federal government."  Avoiding Federal Court  In Plane-Crash Suits  CLAIMING THAT judges in federal courts are unsympathetic, the lawyers who filed the first suits over the crash of United Airlines Flight 232 in Sioux City, Iowa, are pressing their claims in state courts.  "There are a lot of attitudes in federal court, especially on the circuit courts {of appeal}, that aren't great for people," says Richard Schaden, a Denver attorney who filed suit in state court in St. Louis on behalf of the family of a Colorado man, one of 111 who died in the July 19 crash.  Why file in Missouri?  Mr. Schaden says he can keep the suit in that state's court because it's the home of one of the defendants, McDonnell Douglas Corp., which built the plane.  Had Mr. Schaden filed in Colorado, where none of the defendants is based, defense lawyers could have moved the case to federal court because the parties are from different states.  Philip Corboy, a plaintiff attorney in Chicago, used the same strategy in filing his first four lawsuits in state courts in Chicago, home of UAL Corp., parent of United.  Aside from their distrust of the judges, plaintiffs' lawyers generally don't like federal court because of the way related cases are consolidated in a single court, regardless of where the plaintiffs are based.  Such multi-district litigation is generally handled by a committee of lawyers, meaning individual lawyers can lose control of their own case -- and their fees.  For defense lawyers, federal courts are preferable precisely because the cases are consolidated.  Lawyers for McDonnell Douglas and co-defendant General Electric Co. said a single judge is better able to control a case, and pre-trial fact-finding can be done more efficiently with a group of plaintiffs rather than one by one.  Police Chiefs Speak Out  On Crime, Gun Control  POLICE CHIEFS most everywhere agree that courts are way too soft on criminals, the death penalty makes a lot of sense, and citizens should be allowed to bear arms.  So says a survey of the National Association of Chiefs of Police.  The results present a picture of how 2,549 commanding officers see the issues, at least as measured by some rather leading questions.  With a question that had certain words emphasized, the association got an overwhelming "yes" from 86% of the officers when it asked: "Do you feel that the system of criminal justice has broken down to the point where it is the inability to deal with criminals caught by the police (prosecution and imprisonment) that is the major cause of crime in America?"  Regarding the death penalty, 94% of the respondents said capital punishment serves as a deterrent to certain types of crimes, and 95% said they favored a three-year limit on appeals after a death penalty has been assessed.  Currently, most executions are delayed for many years by multiple appeals.  Some 90% of the respondents said that banning shotguns and rifles wouldn't reduce the ability of criminals to get such weapons.  And 86% agreed that "for the sake of the defense of the U.S. . . .  citizens should be allowed to have their own rifles, shotguns and handguns for emergencies natural or man-made."  In a follow-up question, the association asked, "Do you think that the media that depicts violence especially over TV, while at the same time encourages the banning of firearms by law abiding citizens for sport or self-defense, is hypocritical?"  Almost 90% of the officers said "yes."  Tickets in Their Pockets  Are Blamed on Dockets  MUNICIPAL COURT officials in Houston got fed up with the scofflaws who were ignoring 462,000 city parking tickets, so they took the unusual step of issuing arrest warrants for the top 100 offenders.  Trouble is, 41 of the top 100 appear to be well-equipped to defend themselves: They list their occupation as "lawyer."  Municipal court director Donald Hollingsworth suggested that lawyers may draw more tickets because they park outside the county courthouse, an opinion backed by Jim Lavine, president of the Harris County Criminal Lawyers Association.  "A lot of it has to do with the incredibly increased dockets in the courts," Mr. Lavine says, tallying the parking spaces required for jurors, lawyers, witnesses, defendants and their families.  "We just flat ain't got room for them," he says.  Each of the top 100 offenders had accumulated 30 or more parking tickets over the past five years.  First on the list was -- you guessed it -- a lawyer, with a whopping 258 tickets.  Freedom From Religion  Is All the Inmate Asks  AN INMATE of the state prison in Grady, Ark., has filed suit claiming cruel and unusual punishment and violations of his First Amendment rights to freedom of religion.  His gripe?  The only television program shown during daily free time consists of videotapes of chapel services.  "Essentially, for five hours a day, five days a week -- and some for the rest of their lives -- they have to watch this chapel channel," says the inmate's lawyer, Chad Farris.  "I went to a Southern Baptist college, a Catholic law school, and I'm a Presbyterian now, but I can't imagine dealing with that kind of relentless programming."  There's a reprieve, at least for now: The prison warden has voluntarily suspended the program while the state considers its response to the suit, says Assistant Attorney General Leslie Powell.  Every time economists begin to conclude that a recession is near, new statistics are issued to indicate that the time hasn't arrived yet.  A few more mildly reassuring numbers are expected to be released this week.  On Wednesday, the Federal Reserve Board is likely to report that industrial production rose about 0.3% in July.  Output declined in both May and June, but "data on hours worked suggest a modest pickup in factory production in July," according to analysts at Morgan Stanley & Co., "and utilities output could well have turned up last month, after three consecutive monthly declines."  The small change in output probably will mean little or no change in the capacity utilization rate.  Also on Wednesday, the Commerce Department is expected to report another moderately cheerful statistic.  Housing starts dropped sharply early this year when interest rates climbed.  Since May, however, interest rates have softened and starts have moved modestly higher, a trend that analysts believe continued in July.  On Thursday, the Commerce Department probably will report that the trade deficit declined in June.  Morgan Stanley economists believe the deficit shrank to $9 billion from $10.2 billion in May.  "Exports should be well-maintained in June," they said, "while about two-thirds of the $1.7 billion bulge in May imports should be retraced, due in part to lower oil prices and volumes."  Today, the Commerce Department probably will report that business inventories rose less sharply in June than they did in May.  The smaller rise, said Michael K. Evans, a Washington-based consultant, "is due mainly to lower prices.  In addition, sluggish growth of consumption probably led some wholesalers to reduce the amount of inventory carried in stock."  The inventory numbers are cheering, mainly because of what they may mean for the future.  Obviously enough, every business slowdown involves inventory liquidation.  Some of the worst downturns have occurred when businessmen have waited too long to reduce stocks and then have cut them sharply and suddenly, increasing the effect of the slump.  This time, however, many companies have kept inventories so well in hand that they have seemed to be willing to risk lost sales, rather than be overstocked.  On Friday, the Labor Department probably will issue some more reassuring news on inflation.  The consumer price index, after climbing sharply earlier this year, rose only 0.2% in June, and the consensus view is that July saw a similar rise.  "Lower prices for clothing and energy led to very moderate consumer inflation" last month, according to economists at Manufacturers Hanover Securities Corp.  Relatively good economic news is, of course, bad news to analysts who are hoping for more aggressive moves by the Federal Reserve to cut interest rates and speed the growth of the money supply.  Fed-watchers generally expect monetary policy to remain steady for the immediate future.  ---  @ Closely Watched Reports  @ Statistics Released in the Week Ended Aug. 11  @ CHANGE  @ (from prior  @ TOTAL period)  @ Money Supply  @ M1 -- Week ended  @ July 31 (in billions) $776.0 +$0.1  @ M2 -- Week ended  @ July 31 (in billions) $3,129.9 +$11.2  @ M3 -- Week ended  @ July 31 (in billions) $4,009.0 +$7.3  @ Producer price index  @ July 114.0% -0.4%  @ Retail Sales  @ July (in billions) $143.73 +0.9%  @ Consumer Credit  @ June (in billions) $697.54 +$2.99  @ New Jobless Claims  @ Week ended July 29 330,000 -3.5%  @ Statistics to Be Released This Week  @ Business inventories (Mon.)  @ June  @ Auto sales (Tues.)  @ Early August  @ Housing starts (Wed.)  @ July  @ Industrial production (Wed.)  @ July  @ Capacity utilization (Wed.)  @ July  @ Money supply (Thurs.)  @ Trade deficit (Thurs.)  @ June  @ New jobless claims (Thurs.)  @ Consumer price index (Fri.)  @ July  Whitman Corp. said it agreed to buy Van de Kamp's Frozen Seafoods from Pillsbury Co., a unit of Grand Metropolitan PLC, for $140 million.  The company said the purchase of Van de Kamp's, whose annual sales exceed $100 million, is subject to Hart-Scott-Rodino Act clearance and is expected to be completed by mid-September.  Grand Met is a British food-and-drink concern.  Whitman is a consumer-goods and services concern.  In May, Pillsbury announced that it would sell Van de Kamp's along with its Bumble Bee seafood business because they didn't fit the company's core businesses and long-range strategy.  Tyson Foods Inc. said it completed its $1.29 billion acquisition of Holly Farms Corp., expanding its lead as the nation's No. 1 chicken producer.  Tyson, which previously acquired 97% of Holly Farms, a Memphis, Tenn., chicken producer, in a tender offer, said it will acquire the remaining 3% for $70 a share.  LAW FIRMS find that toxic-waste litigation creates conflicts of interest.  With corporations fighting insurers over who must pay to clean up toxic sites, law firms with both environmental practices and insurance practices are having to choose sides.  At least one firm, 160-lawyer Rivkin, Radler, Dunne & Bayh, has decided to make a clean break and to phase out its 10-lawyer environmental law practice to avoid conflicts with its many insurance clients.  The phase-out that began last March has already driven four Rivkin Radler environmental law partners out of the firm and into jobs elsewhere.  "We did elect not to represent corporations in Superfund matters because of real and potential conflicts," said Warren S. Radler of Rivkin Radler, based in Uniondale, N.Y.  Two lawyers close to the firm estimated that the Rivkin Radler's insurance clients account for more than 50% of the firm's annual gross revenue.  Lawyers say firms facing such conflicts generally seek to resolve them on a case-by-case basis.  But, says Laurie Burt of Bostonbased Foley, Hoag & Eliot, as conflicts mount, the issue becomes more serious.  "It is definitely a potential problem" for law firms with a substantial number of insurance clients, Ms. Burt says.  ---  A LAWYER was penalized for filing a frivolous suit under RICO.  Jack C. Vieley of Peoria, Ill., was slapped with a $64,434 sanction by federal Judge Richard Mills in Springfield, Ill., for filing a meritless complaint under the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organization law.  Mr. Vieley's RICO complaint alleged that the defendants, who were bank officials, had conspired to forge a letter directing his clients' land trustee to place a second mortgage on a bankrupt tire dealership and service center to secure a debt.  Judge Mills complained that Mr. Vieley's RICO theory was "wacky, sanctionably so" because it failed to allege "predicate acts" and a pattern of racketeering, both necessary to establish a RICO action.  Imposing so-called Rule 11 sanctions, Judge Mills ordered Mr. Vieley to pay the opposing side's attorney fees.  Mr. Vieley's attorney, W. Thomas Johnston of Peoria, didn't return phone calls.  This is not a case which presented issues in the gray area of the RICO statute," Judge Mills wrote.  ---  SAKS FIFTH AVENUE AGREED last week to reduce or eliminate fees for certain types of alterations of women's clothing, making the fee structure equal for both sexes.  The upscale retailer agreed to the new policy as part of its settlement of a sex discrimination suit in Los Angeles County Superior Court.  The class-action suit was filed last year by two California women who each had been charged $40 for dress alterations at about the same time their husbands had had a suit and a tuxedo altered for free.  Saks' policy change became effective Tuesday for the chain's 45 stores nationwide.  But the new fee structure is not retroactive, said a spokesman for Saks, a unit of B.A.T Industries PLC.  This means the plaintiffs were not reimbursed for the alteration charges that inspired the suit, nor were any members of the class action compensated in any way.  However, under the terms of the settlement, Saks will pay $24,081 for the plaintiff's attorney fees.  ---  MULTIRACIAL LAW FIRM affiliation is announced in Dallas.  Arter & Hadden, with 250 lawyers, last week announced the formation of an affiliation with two other Dallas firms, four-lawyer Hill Hicks Collins, an African-American firm, and two-lawyer Ronquillo & Castaneda, a Hispanic firm.  Their agreement provides that the firms will serve as co-counsel to selected clients.  In addition, the minority firms will share Arter & Hadden's library, conference facilities, support staff and offices in Washington, Cleveland and Columbus, Ohio.  Arter & Hadden gets more than public relations points out of the deal: Arter & Hadden partner Richard Dean says his firm's immigration law and labor law practices will be enhanced.  "{Marcos} Ronquillo is a national expert on immigration law, and Don Hicks's law firm does contract business with the Dallas school system," Mr. Dean says.  ---  ROBERT WALLACH leaves RICO forfeiture in hands of judge.  Mr. Wallach, convicted in federal court in New York last week for his role in the Wedtech Corp. influence-peddling scandal, remains free on bail pending his appeal.  As part of the bail arrangement, Mr. Wallach waived his right to have the jury determine his RICO forfeiture.  Instead, the RICO penalty will be decided by Judge Richard Owen, who presided over the trial.  Mr. Wallach faces a maximum forfeiture of $425,000 plus RICO penalties of $850,000.  The judge plans to announce the forfeiture and RICO penalties Oct. 16, at Mr. Wallach's sentencing.  Mr. Wallach, former personal legal adviser to former Attorney General Edwin Meese, faces a maximum of 45 years in jail.  In addition to the RICO conviction, he was found guilty of conspiring to defraud the U.S.  The convictions stem from payments Mr. Wallach received from Wedtech in return for promising to influence Mr. Meese and other federal officials on behalf of the company.  Mr. Wallach maintains that the fees were for consulting services.  Mr. Wallach's co-defendants, W. Franklyn Chinn and R. Kent London, who were each convicted of two RICO counts and other lesser charges, also waived their right to have the jury decide their RICO forfeitures.  Both face maximum forfeitures of about $1.2 million, plus penalties of more than $2 million.  Under the bail agreement, Mr. Chinn and Mr. London have one month to post additional assets as security, and Mr. London will have to repatriate all foreign property that he owns.  The bail agreement also places certain travel restrictions on the three men.  ---  DAVID ZORNOW, a former assistant U.S. attorney who helped prosecute Lt. Col. Oliver North and former Bronx Democratic Party boss Stanley Friedman, has joined the New York law firm of Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom as a partner.  Mr. Zornow will be a member of the firm's litigation practice.  He will concentrate on defending individuals and companies in white-collar crime cases.  It's getting tougher these days to please junk bond investors, who already have become pretty picky about what they'll put in their portfolios.  Just ask First Boston Corp.  On Friday, the investment banking firm pulled a $475 million junk bond offering for Ohio Mattress Co. after it became clear that investors were shunning the high-yield, high-risk bonds.  "There's a substantial degree of uncertainty in the market that is causing a number of people to stay away" from some junk bond offerings, said Robert Long, a First Boston managing director.  "The market has a narrow focus right now."  He said the firm will probably restructure the deal and offer the bonds "when market conditions" improve.  The withdrawal underscores how skittish junk bond investors have become in recent months.  Ever since the possibility of a recession became more real to many economists and investors, portfolio managers have sifted very skeptically through new junk bond offerings.  While there has been strong demand for some recent junk bond issues -- Sealed Air Corp.'s $170 million 12 5/8% senior subordinated note issue was oversubscribed -- others have been hard sells.  Junk bonds are often issued to finance costly restructurings or leveraged buy-outs, which makes them riskier than investment-grade bonds.  Investors worry that an economic downturn would make it difficult for highly leveraged companies to meet their debt obligations.  As a result, many junk bond portfolio managers have limited their buying to higher quality bonds of companies considered recession-resistant, such as those in the food and entertainment industries.  That's bad news for a company like Cleveland-based Ohio Mattress, which loses on two counts: Its bonds were considered to be in the lower tier on the quality scale, and the company's fortunes are partly tied to the recession-sensitive housing industry.  Moreover, some investors say they were uncertain about the tax consequences of buying Ohio Mattress's zero-coupon bonds, which made up $225 million of the three-installment issue.  Such bonds pay no interest but are issued at a deep discount.  Investor gains come from the difference between the discounted purchase price and the face value received at maturity.  Congress has considered eliminating or reducing the tax benefit associated with certain non-investment grade zero-coupon bonds and so-called piks, or payment-in-kind bonds that pay out more of the security instead of interest.  Other investors complained that the wording in the Ohio Mattress prospectus was complicated, which made it difficult to ascertain how much protection bondholders would receive in case of possible event risks, such as a merger or other events that could affect bond prices.  As the date of the offering approached, the expected yield on the new bonds rose from a starting point of about 13.5% to about 15%.  First Boston even restructured the offering and increased the amount of senior paper by $25 million and decreased the amount of subordinated paper by an equal amount.  But, "when you have a deal that's complicated or poorly structured, no matter what the rate is, you still have a poorly structured transaction, and that makes investors nervous," said Michael McNelley, a portfolio manager at Caywood-Christian Capital Management in San Diego.  He said Caywood-Christian passed on the bonds primarily because of doubts about possible event risk.  "This company has been recapitalized, re-leveraged, restructured, re-everything," he said.  "It wasn't clear if there were covenants to protect against further changes."  This wasn't the first time First Boston, a unit of CS First Boston Inc., had to withdraw a large offering because of lackluster demand.  Last year, the firm pulled back a $1.15 billion offering of Federated Department Stores Inc. junk bonds.  They were later reoffered after the firm reduced the offering's size to $750 million and boosted yields to as high as 17.75%.  Some investors are wondering whether Ohio Mattress will be a repeat of that troubled transaction.  The nation's leading bedding manufacturer was taken private in a $980 million leveraged buy-out by a group led by Gibbons, Green, van Amerongen Limited Partnership, a New York concern specializing in management buy-outs.  First Boston had a $5 million investment in the buy-out, which was announced in March and completed last week.  The proceeds from the Ohio Mattress bond issue were to be used to prepay a $457.3 million bridge loan provided by First Boston that was used to acquire the company.  The bridge loan matures Oct. 23.  At the time of the acquisition, some analysts estimated that the Gibbons Green group paid 14 times Ohio Mattress's fiscal 1988 earnings of $70.2 million before taxes and interest charges.  Considering that some other leveraged buy-outs had been priced at seven to 10 times earnings before interest and taxes, some analysts said the group paid too much.  But Mr. Long at First Boston said investors should focus on the company's potential.  He said opportunities for Ohio Mattress, the market leader with more than 25% of domestic bedding sales, will improve markedly as the company expands domestically and internationally.  He noted that the company, whose brand names include Sealy and Stearns and Foster, recently became the leading bedding supplier to Sears, Roebuck & Co.  The company also could capitalize on its relationship with one of its major investors, Flex Group, the largest bedding maker in Europe.  ---  Friday's Market Activity  Prices of Treasury bonds ended lower after a roller-coaster session that saw prices on long-term bonds fluctuate in a range of almost three points.  The existing benchmark 30-year bonds ended 1 3/8 lower, or down $13.75 for each $1,000 face amount.  The issue's yield, which moves in the opposite direction from its price, was quoted late at 8.15%.  The price on the long-term bond was quoted at about 107 30/32.  The new 10-year notes were quoted in when-issued trading at about 99 14/32 to yield 8.065%.  Only the new 30-year long bond that was auctioned Thursday posted an increase.  But dealers said they were discounting that gain in when-issued trading because it was calculated against the auction average price of 99 27/32.  And the new bond finished the Thursday session at a price that was much higher than the auction average, they said.  Short-term rates moved higher.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was quoted at 7.93%, for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.182%.  Six-month bills were quoted at a discount rate of 7.66%, for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.056%.  The bond market started out on a strong note, with prices jumping by as much as 1 3/4 points in response to the unexpected sharp 0.4% decline in the July producer-price index.  That was the sharpest drop since July 1986 and followed a 0.1% decline in June.  The index measures inflation on the wholesale level.  The decline led to speculation that the Federal Reserve might ease credit conditions further.  "People initially jumped on the notion that the Fed would ease" after the data were released, said Robert T. McGee, a senior vice president at Tokai Bank Ltd.  But later in the morning, prices began to fall as investors sobered up after "the initial euphoria from the PPI data" and realized that the central bank wasn't likely to ease immediately after the data was released, said Mr. McGee.  The profit-taking accelerated after the Fed unexpectedly drained reserves from the banking system around midday, which reinforced the idea that a Fed easing isn't likely anytime soon.  Meanwhile, mortgage-backed securities held at lower levels after a sharp midday reversal erased early price gains.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for August delivery ended at about 97 17/32, down 7/32.  The issue's yield was about 9.483% to a 12-year average life assumption, placing it 1.42 percentage points above the new 10-year Treasury note.  In the new-issue market, a Goldman, Sachs & Co. group priced a $752 million issue of National Credit Card Trust 1989-5 participation certificates.  Municipal bonds ended as much as 5/8 point lower.  The movement in Triborough Bridge and Tunnel Authority's 7 1/8% bonds due 2019 showed the whipsaw action of prices.  The bonds, bid early at 98 1/4, jumped to 98 5/8 bid after the producer prices data, then tumbled to 97 3/4 around midday.  They were quoted late at about 97 5/8, 5/8 point lower on the day.  UAL Corp., parent of United Airlines, has received expressions of interest from other potential bidders in the wake of its $5.4 billion bid from Marvin Davis, according to an official familiar with the activity.  The source declined to identify the bidders but said they include groups that showed interest in NWA Inc., the St. Paul, Minn., parent of Northwest Airlines, before it was sold.  In addition to Mr. Davis, the losing NWA bidders included the New York leveraged buy-out firms Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. and Forstmann Little & Co., as well as Pan Am Corp.  The official said UAL would be unlikely to be interested in Pan Am.  One of the main options under discussion at UAL is a management-led buy-out that includes an ownership stake for employees, the official said.  He said, however, that UAL Chairman Stephen M. Wolf is undecided about whether to pursue that route.  Last week, the pilots union at United Airlines hinted it might be willing to participate in a management-led transaction.  The union previously talked of launching its own bid, but it was never apparent that the pilots could obtain financing by themselves.  Teaming up with Mr. Wolf may provide them with their best chance of influencing the course of events.  The UAL pilots were reported last week to be studying the value of any cost concessions they could make as part of an effort to gain an ownership stake in any bid for the airline.  In its last bid for the airline in 1987, the pilots offered savings with an advertised value of $350 million annually.  But any labor-sponsored bid would also have to include the machinists, UAL's largest union.  In recent public statements, the company has seemed to be signaling that the board won't necessarily just sell to the highest bidder.  Mr. Davis, a Los Angeles billionaire, sent Mr. Wolf a letter offering $240 a share for the airline about 10 days ago.  Wednesday night, the UAL board responded by saying it would explore all alternatives instead of rejecting the bid outright.  Mr. Wolf has stressed that UAL's growth is an important concern.  In a letter to employees sent Friday, Mr. Wolf said he is committed to ensuring that UAL sticks to those growth plans and indicated he won't accept a financial structure that could prevent United from taking delivery of $19 billion in new aircraft.  Mr. Wolf said United must maintain a financial structure "that will enable us to continue with our significant capital spending plan and build upon our growing competitive strength."  UAL has yet to establish a committee of the board to consider its options.  But the company intends to maintain "openness and receptivity" to any groups that make an offer, a person familiar with the situation said.  UAL is determined to avoid the barrage of lawsuits and public accusations that marked the NWA takeover battle, he said.  Apparently toward that end, UAL advisers met Thursday night at Newark airport with two Davis advisers who had flown in on Mr. Davis's private jet.  The meeting was described as cordial, but apparently produced no significant developments.  Spokesmen for UAL and Mr. Davis declined to comment.  Pilots union officials couldn't be reached for comment.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, UAL closed at $257 a share, up $5.875.  Hardly traded after the 1987 crash, the little known Major Market Index is back in favor with big professional stock traders.  But the resurgence of the index, which includes 17 of the 30 stocks on the Dow Jones Industrial Average, is hardly welcome on the floor of the New York Stock Exchange.  There, traders in the 30 Dow industrial stocks fear the index will bring a return of the wild pre-crash days of heavy computer-driven program trading.  "If you want to manipulate the market short-term and touch off program buying and selling, the easiest way to do it is with the Major Market Index," said one New York trader.  The Chicago Board of Trade's MMI is often used by program traders because it is cheaper to trade than the Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index.  Anyone who wants to buy the stocks underlying the S&P 500 has to buy a basket of 500 stocks; but the MMI has only 20 stocks.  Those 20 are among the biggest stocks in America and happen to be the day-to-day favorites of big program traders: stocks such as Merck, International Business Machines, Coca-Cola, Johnson & Johnson and Dow Chemical.  Program traders use computer-driven strategies to profit from small differences between stock index futures and the underlying stocks; they buy whichever is cheaper and sell the more expensive.  Because of the MMI's lower trading volume, the index can be controlled by powerful trading firms, traders say.  Consequently, prices of stocks in the index often swing abruptly.  The fear of the MMI by Big Board specialists who make markets in the 30 Dow industrial stocks is easy to understand.  Once a month, these Big Board market makers face an explosive hour of trading that forces millions of shares through specialists in an event known as the "double-witching hour."  This is the simultaneous expiration of Standard & Poor's 100-stock index options and MMI futures and options; in the final hour before the big Board closes, futures and options traders unwind trading strategies.  Typically, a blizzard of orders to buy or sell hits the specialists, who are often unable to match the other side of the trade.  The result is usually high pressure final-hour search for stock by exchange officials.  If the order can't be matched, specialists ultimately must buy or sell the securities, exposing themselves to substantial risk.  "At some time, this thing is going to explode in people's faces," says New York Stock Exchange specialist Brian Hunter of J & B Specialists.  "There is no question about it."  With program trading in MMI futures becoming more popular, specialists say the day is coming when they will be asked to match million-share trades in the one-hour time frame with no one immediately stepping up to supply the stock.  Although not impossible technically, it would undoubtedly require a huge financial risk for the floor dealers who would end up buying or selling much of the stock themselves, and bearing the risk over the weekend.  "My job is not to be a block positioner," says R. Peter Sullivan III, partner in the specialist firm Mercator Partners.  "I am not here to buy or sell 200,000 or 300,000 shares."  "If there is tremendous imbalance, why should I risk $8 million or $10 million?" says John Geary, partner in Ziebarth, Geary & Co. and the specialist in Merck stock.  Big brokerage firms have helped supply stock during the double-witching hour to ease huge imbalances of buy and sell orders.  But there is widespread fear among floor traders that the wrong confluence of events could keep institutions and brokers preoccupied with their portfolios and not trading on the floor.  At the root of the MMI problem, traders say, are unequal rules governing the amount of cash, or margin, needed to trade futures on indexes like the MMI vs. the margin on stocks.  An MMI futures trader can influence $1 million worth of the instrument's underlying stocks with $28,000.  Big Board specialist firms need more than ten times that amount -- $300,000 for every $1 million of stock -- according to exchange rules.  The unequal margin requirements give futures traders a huge advantage over individual investors who own blue-chips like Merck or Johnson & Johnson.  With their tremendous margin advantage, a group of futures traders can send individual Dow stocks jumping up or down in price.  The Securities and Exchange Commission is reviewing the double-witching hour, says Richard Ketchum, director of the SEC's division of market regulation.  Exchange officials say the SEC may move to force the expiration to Friday morning from Friday afternoon.  This would give Big Board specialists a whole day to meet huge buy or sell orders.  But floor traders say that it may take a "mini melt-up or melt-down" in several stocks to force a change in margin guidelines or expiration times.  A change to a morning expiration will undoubtedly cause problems in other markets.  It could greatly diminish volume in MMI options, which trade on the American Stock Exchange.  ---  Friday's Market Activity  Favorable economic reports weren't sufficient to sustain the stock market through waves of futures-related sell programs and profit-taking, and prices closed lower in heavy trading.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average rallied past its record closing high of 2722.42 twice in early trading, but ended the session with its sharpest loss since late June by dropping 28.64 to 2683.99.  Prices initially climbed in response to news of an unexpected 0.4% drop in the July producer price index and a 0.9% increase in July retail sales.  The reports boosted investor confidence about the potential for a "soft landing," or a moderate economic expansion with lower interest rates and mild inflation.  But disappointment that the Federal Reserve didn't push rates lower in response to the data caught up with stocks, as a sharp, abrupt slide in bond prices at midday sparked selling in the stock-index futures market.  At least three waves of program selling resulting from stock-index arbitrage -- buying index futures contracts and selling stocks to lock in profits -- battered the market through midafternoon, traders said.  The first erased its early gains, and the others thwarted its attempts at a rebound.  Profit-taking based on the Dow industrials' rally to near-record levels also helped depress prices, traders said.  "When bonds went down, our market said: 'Okay, I've had enough.  Let's take a rest and see what happens,'" said William Bee, a senior block trader at Prudential-Bache Securities.  New York Stock Exchange volume totaled 197,550,000 shares -- a repeat of the heavy volume the market has seen for the past several sessions.  The Dow Jones Transportation Average, which had soared a total of 13.6% over the previous four sessions, finally reached a plateau as the takeover-driven rally among airline stocks came to a halt.  The average fell 6.40 to 1413.23.  Delta Air Lines skidded 3 7/8 to 75 1/2; AMR, the parent of American Airlines, dropped 3 to 74 1/2; USAir Group lost 1 3/8 to 51 1/8, and Alaska Air Group retreated 1 1/8 to 29 1/8 on the Big Board.  Texas Air, owner of Eastern and Continental airlines, fell 5/8 to 16 7/8 in American Stock Exchange trading.  But UAL gained 5 7/8 to 257, capping a weeklong rally during which the stock soared more than 50%.  The latest advance came after the parent company of United Airlines held talks with investor Marvin Davis, who is offering $240 a share for the company.  The few advancers among the 30 stocks in the Dow industrials included Procter & Gamble, which gained 1 3/8 to 125, and Woolworth, which climbed 2 to 65 1/2.  Both stocks also were strong Thursday.  Philip Morris rallied initially on rumors that the company would announce a stock buy-back program, but ultimately went down 3 1/4 to 160 on NYSE-composite volume of 1.8 million shares.  The company declined to comment on the rumors.  Other poor performers among blue chips included McDonald's, which went down 1 1/2 to 28 5/8; Du Pont, down 2 3/8 to 116; Coca-Cola, down 1 7/8 to 64 7/8; Aluminum Co. of America, down 1 7/8 to 71 5/8; Westinghouse Electric, down 2 1/8 to 67 7/8, and Eastman Kodak, down 1 3/4 to 50.  Technology stocks were especially weak.  International Business Machines fell 2 to 115 1/2, Digital Equipment retreated 1 1/8 to 100 5/8, Compaq Computer lost 2 7/8 to 93 3/4, NCR slipped 3/4 to 62 1/4, Unisys dropped 1/2 to 21 3/4 and Tandem Computers slid 1 1/4 to 21 1/2 on the New York Stock Exchange, while Amdahl dropped 1/2 to 15 on the Amex.  K mart gained 1 1/8 to 40 5/8 on buying in advance of the company's second-quarter earnings report, due for release Monday.  Analysts expect the company to post net income of about 75 cents a share, down slightly from a year earlier.  Interlake surged 4 1/4 to 58.  The company's board approved a restructuring which calls for payment of a special dividend of $45 a share, creation of a $20 million employee stock ownership plan and borrowing of $550 million.  Xtra rose 2 5/8 to 33 1/8 as a block trade of 534,600 shares, or an 8.4% stake, sparked takeover speculation.  There were indications that Value Equity Associates I, a partnership which owns an 8% stake in the company and has said it may seek control, purchased part of the block, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Value Equity declined to comment.  Fine Homes International gained 1 3/8 to 17 7/8.  Prudential Insurance agreed to buy Merrill Lynch Realty and other real-estate operations from the partnership for more than $300 million.  Merrill Lynch, which owns a 74% stake in Fine Homes, will acquire the remaining units for $18 each as part of the transaction.  Merrill Lynch fell 1/4 to 35 7/8.  Careercom rose 3/4 to 10.  The company signed a letter of intent to be acquired for $11 a share by Golder, Thoma, Cressey Fund III.  The Amex Index dropped 1.60 to 380.64.  The average price per share fell six cents.  For the week, the index rose 1.2%.  B.A.T Industries fell 15/16 to 13 1/8 in composite trading of 1.4 million shares.  The decline followed an appeal from more than 200 members of the U.S. Congress to Secretary of State James Baker to "communicate our concern to the British government" about the takeover bid from a group headed by investor Sir James Goldsmith.  Jacobs Engineering gained 1 7/8 to 24 1/8.  The company withdrew a proposed offering of $35 million in convertible debt.  CITIZENS FEDERAL BANK, Miami, had a tangible capital ratio of 2.2% as of March 31, based on an amended regulatory filing.  A table in an earlier edition reported a ratio based on Citizens' initial filing.  (See: "The Thrift Rescue: S&L Bill Hits 672 Institutions With Low Tangible Capital" -- WSJ Aug. 7, 1989)  A huge cocoa transaction involving the Ivory Coast, the world's top producer, and two major commodity trading firms is causing market jitters.  So much so, in fact, that the London Futures and Options Exchange is raising original margin deposits, or good-faith money, to #1,000 ($1,600) a contract from #400 ($640) beginning Aug. 17.  A single contract contains 10 metric tons of cocoa.  A metric ton is equal to 1.1 short tons, or 2,204.6 pounds.  That action led to a sharp drop in cocoa prices in London on Friday, followed by a lesser decline in New York.  "We are taking preventative action against the possibility of a major price movement," a London exchange official says.  Both the exchange and its clearinghouse will continue to "consult with individual members to ensure an orderly market," the official says.  It might require additional margins from members with "significant positions," he says.  The two trading firms -- Phibro-Salomon of New York and Cie.  Financiere Sucres et Denrees, or Sucden, of Paris -- are controlling so much cocoa that they are virtually monopolizing the market, several London cocoa traders say.  They contend that the increase in margins was necessary.  The two firms could be in a position to corner or squeeze the London cocoa futures market, they say.  Both Phibro, a Salomon Inc. unit, and Sucden declined to comment on their positions and reasons for the deal.  The Ivory Coast announced that it intends to sell 500,000 metric tons of cocoa worth an estimated $665 million from the crop whose 1989-90 season will begin Oct. 1.  Sucden confirmed that it is purchasing 200,000 tons, while traders say Phibro is buying the remaining 300,000 tons.  Further details of an intricate plan to buy the cocoa at prices of 8,500 francs ($1,332) a ton or higher, are expected to be announced soon, dealers say.  Even after Friday's fall, London December cocoa futures prices at #925 ($1,467) a metric ton are 22% higher than their lows in May.  In London the December 1989 contract alone has an open position of 40,000 contracts, the exchange says, while the total open futures position until December 1990 is 119,393 contracts, equivalent to nearly half annual world output.  Open positions are contracts that remain to be liquidated by either an opposite trade or delivery of the commodity.  A year ago the total open position in London was 48,000 contracts, about the same level as New York's present open position of around 49,170 contracts.  The bulk of the London positions, particularly those that mature in December, are controlled by Phibro and Sucden, dealers say.  "So much of the world's biggest producer's cocoa is controlled by just two trading companies that markets are naturally sensitive to the size of open futures positions," says James Fry, a director of Landell Mills Commodities Studies.  Over and above the latest sale, Sucden bought 200,000 tons of cocoa from the Ivory Coast earlier this year and is storing a further 200,000 tons for the producer, dealers say.  Phibro purchased 280,000 tons from the Ivory Coast about two months ago.  So the total amount of cocoa controlled by the two merchants is nearly 1.2 million tons, dealers say, although by now the firms may have sold some of it.  Ivory Coast cocoa output this season is estimated at 780,000 tons, or a third of Western production, estimates the Gill & Duffus Group, a London commodity merchant.  "The two companies are propping up the market," says Donald Spence, an analyst at E.D.&F Man International.  Yet there is a "horrendous surplus," he says, so eventually prices will fall again.  World cocoa production has exceeded consumption for five years running, says Gill & Duffus.  This season's output of 2.4 million tons could exceed consumption by 309,000 tons, raising the world cocoa stockpile to 1.1 million tons, the firm says.  This is equivalent to about six months demand.  A lengthy study by the Economist Intelligence Unit, "Cocoa, a Commodity in Crisis," says that "a boom in prices is out of the question."  Instead, cocoa prices are likely to slump in the next four years.  The commodity has been in a long-term decline since it peaked at $5,467 a metric ton in 1977, the study says.  But the glut of cocoa shouldn't be examined at face value, a London dealer cautions.  A large proportion of the cocoa is poor quality.  Chocolate manufacturers generally favor supplies from the Ivory Coast and other West African nations, so the market in "desirable cocoa is tight," he says.  Sucden and Phibro hold the key to the market, says Brenda Sullivan, analyst at GNI Ltd., London commodity brokers.  "If they refrain from selling prices will rise; if they don't, the bears will be right."  Looking ahead to commodity markets this week:  Energy  This week should determine whether last week's oil-price rally was a flash in the pan or signaled an end to the recent slide in petroleum prices.  Despite two days of brisk gains last week, many oil traders and analysts look for further weakening soon.  Their reasoning is that the industry's supply fundamentals are negative because of higher OPEC production than had been expected.  They say these excess supplies will show up in inventories soon.  So far, U.S. and Pacific-area oil markets appear to be balanced, according to Energy Security Analysis, which monitors oil supplies world-wide.  But the Washington firm reports a buildup of 10 million barrels in crude oil inventories in Europe in July.  Its analysts say they remain "neutral to modestly bearish" on the price outlook.  Views of other traders and analysts are mixed.  Some said it's a toss-up whether oil prices will go up or down over the days ahead.  "There may be a little weakness in the fundamentals, but there is some strength technically," said Eric Bolling of Edge Trading Corp.  From a technical point of view, last week's price action for the West Texas Intermediate crude traded on the New York Mercantile Exchange was "very constructive," said Shahrokh Nikkhah, senior vice president, futures investments, for Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  He said $18.30 a barrel was an "important number" for the September contract, and he noted there were "two back-to-back settlements" above that price last week.  Even though the futures price of September West Texas crude declined 11 cents a barrel Friday to settle at $18.48, he said the near-month crude contract "should be going up to test $19.65 or $19.75 over the next week or so."  Grains and Soybeans  Traders this week will focus on fallout from the government's Thursday report that projected less of a rebound in corn production than had been widely forecast by analysts.  The price of several corn futures contracts Friday at the Chicago Board of Trade rose their daily permissible limit of 10 cents a bushel.  The Agriculture Department forecast a 49% jump in corn production instead of the 53% jump widely predicted by market analysts from the drought-stunted 1988 harvest of 4.92 billion bushels of corn.  Traders this week will also watch for any corroboration of a rumor that the Soviet Union is interested in buying between 500,000 metric tons and one million metric tons of U.S. corn.  Many traders are skeptical.  The weather will continue to be a hot topic because of lingering dry conditions in parts of the western Corn Belt states.  Orange Juice  Traders this week can expect a continuation of Friday's price decline, which followed the sudden upward spike last Thursday.  For some time there has been concern over whether there are enough supplies of the concentrate to deliver against the September future, said Judith Ganes, analyst for Shearson Lehman Hutton, New York.  The first notices to deliver the juice against September contracts will be issued Sept. 1.  Brazilian new-crop concentrate usually begins arriving in the U.S. in July, but the Brazilian 1989-90 orange crop's development was delayed by drought last fall and it is now thought that shipments won't begin to arrive in the U.S. until late October, according to Ms. Ganes.  "It is the doubt about whether there are enough domestic supplies to cover this time gap that is creating the concern," said Ms. Ganes.  "However, supplies should be ample to meet exchange delivery commitments."  Thereafter, Ms. Ganes notes, the concern will be that supplies will be more than ample.  Brazilian sources are estimating that country's orange harvest at a record 290 million boxes.  That would be 40% higher than last season's 210 million boxes and top the record of 239 million boxes in 1985-86.  A box weighs 90 pounds.  Moreover, Ms. Ganes said, demand has turned sluggish, which has contributed to recent price declines.  Sugar  A drop in Brazilian sugar output helped sugar prices rise sharply Friday and may continue to be a supporting factor this week.  The October delivery contract rose 0.57 cent a pound to 14.42 cents.  A report from a prominent Brazilian trade house said that Brazilian sugar production during the three months ended in July amounted to 1.6 million tons, compared with 2.4 million tons during the same period last year.  Increasing demand for sugar and alcohol in Brazil is raising concern about Brazilian sugar supplies, according to the report, an analyst said.  Brazil is a major exporting country.  In addition, the analyst said, Morocco is expected to buy as much as 150,000 tons of sugar this week, and it is still anticipated that India will be a major buyer.  Copper  If the host of actual or potential production-threatening problems aren't soon solved, traders can look for another week of price advances.  On Friday, prices shot up 4.75 cents a pound in the September contract as technically oriented traders were aggressive buyers.  The advance was accelerated when the September future rose above $1.14 after three failed attempts, and then above the longer-term resistance level of $1.15.  Major price-supporting factors, an analyst said, were the continuing strike at Highland Valley mines in British Columbia, which began July 9, and the Peruvian national miners' strike that was to have begun today.  "The Highland Valley strike, especially, has gone on longer than expected," he said.  Only a year ago, foreign businessmen were beating a path to Meishan Metallurgical Corp.  The iron mill's $2 billion expansion project was one of the biggest in China.  Bankers fell over one another offering bargain-rate loans.  Australian Prime Minister Bob Hawke came by, offering to supply iron ore.  There were so many visitors that Meishan built a 60-room hotel to put them up.  These days, the hotel is nearly empty.  "The project is being shelved for lack of support from foreign bankers," says Xia Zhiqiang, a Meishan vice president.  While China has been broadly affected by the declining confidence of international investors and the suspension of development aid since the June 4 killings in Tiananmen Square, the damage has been especially felt by areas in the vanguard of Beijing's decade-old modernization drive.  Such is the case with Jiangsu province, once meant to be a showcase for the country's coastal development.  Foreign capital has been crucial for the province's buildup in essential sectors such as steel, energy and telecommunications.  Now Jiangsu and other provinces are learning they can't automatically expect the cheap loans, special grants and technological assistance they had enjoyed under China's open-door policy.  And if foreigners now demand that business be conducted on conventional commercial terms to compensate for greater political risk, China will have to pay a higher price for modernization or pursue it at a slower pace.  With foreign development assistance cut off and the supply of domestic funds already squeezed by Beijing's economic retrenchment that began late last year, Jiangsu has been forced to postpone plans to modernize its telephone lines and retool several dozen factories.  In addition to the iron mill, a major ethylene project and a nuclear-power plant have also seen foreigners' enthusiasm fizzle.  The situation doesn't seem all that dire to Jiangsu Gov. Chen Huanyou, whose blase attitude is typical of Chinese officials these days.  "If the skies in the east don't light up, the skies in the west will; if friends from the south don't come, friends from the north will," he says, citing a Chinese saying.  Those friends of Beijing to the north worry many foreign leaders, who fear that sanctions could drive China into the arms of the Soviet Union.  China has done some barter trade with the Soviet Union, which helps it conserve scarce foreign reserves.  In fact, Soviet experts once visited the Meishan iron mill with a proposal to trade Soviet equipment for thermos flasks and garments produced in abundance in Jiangsu.  That plan, which was ignored when Meishan managers were besieged by Western visitors, has been revived.  "We can't wait forever for the foreigners to come back," says Zhang Siming, Meishan's general manager.  Before the Tiananmen massacre, the big problem for many Jiangsu projects was the shortage of domestic funds following last year's retrenchment.  At the Meishan iron mill, managers cut their expansion plans earlier this year to $300 million from $2 billion.  But since June 4, the flight of foreign bankers has made scarce foreign exchange the main hurdle.  The Jiangsu government has become heavily dependent on its own foreign borrowings and those Beijing arranges for nationwide development.  The province owes $820 million to international lenders and foreign governments.  That just about matches the amount of foreign-exchange it was allowed to retain last year from its export earnings, the province's other main source of hard cash.  Prospects for modernizing Jiangsu's antiquated telephone system also have dimmed.  The province's population of 61 million surpasses that of France, but Jiangsu's phone system can handle only 50,000 lines.  Placing a call within Nanjing, the provincial capital, can take half an hour.  After dragging its feet for years, the central government made available to Jiangsu a sizable soft loan provided by Sweden to purchase a $70 million switchboard system that would quadruple the number of phone lines.  The purchase was shelved after June 4.  Plans to improve the province's energy supply have been dashed.  Jiangsu suffers from the most acute power shortage in the country.  Plants must stop work two to three days a week, even more frequently in July and August when energy is diverted to agriculture.  Jiangsu decided earlier this year to build a $1 billion nuclear-power plant.  Foreign commercial borrowings and export credits had been expected to provide the funding.  But now, officials say, foreign bankers and suppliers aren't keen to be seen hurrying back to China.  Gov. Chen has just returned from shopping for nuclear-power facilities in the U.S., where he felt the strained relations firsthand.  "I didn't talk about (what happened in Beijing) with my American friends because I didn't want to hurt their feelings," says Mr. Chen.  "I didn't even ask them if they would sell the facilities to us," he adds, because he knew they would have trouble responding.  Jiangsu has been feeling the waning of foreign confidence even in areas where loans or aid aren't involved.  Trading business at the Nanjing office of Ryosan Co. of Japan has nearly ground to a halt.  Zhao Xinyu, an assistant manager, says some Japanese sellers, worried that their Chinese buyers are short of funds, won't respond to requests for price quotations.  Ryosan markets electronic consumer products and parts.  In addition, Jiangsu's trade commission says raw-material imports have been seriously delayed.  Some foreign suppliers won't release goods until they receive cash payment or a letter of credit from the Bank of China.  Another blow to the flow of exports came with Japan's freeze on aid to China.  Beijing had approved about $40 million for retooling export-oriented factories in Jiangsu, part of a Japanese government plan last year to strengthen the export potential of Chinese factories and help reduce China's trade deficit with Japan.  It isn't clear if these setbacks are temporary.  Some foreign businessmen are cautiously returning to China.  But even as they do, it is likely that China will pay a stiffer price for the loans and equipment it gets in the future.  Yangzi Petrochemical Corp., for example, is planning a $1.4 billion expansion to enable the ethylene producer to double capacity.  The State Council had financed the bulk of the plant's start-up costs in 1987 with soft loans from such international financial institutes as the World Bank.  But with prospects for such funds looking shaky, Yangzi is seeking to raise hard currency by bringing in a foreign partner or tapping the commercial loan market.  Plant officials estimate that costlier loans could add several hundred million dollars to the project's cost.  A tangled real estate dispute moved toward resolution as a 66-story Wall Street office tower once owned by Ferdinand and Imelda Marcos was sold at auction for $108.6 million.  The process, more commonly employed for foreclosed farms, factories and raw land, was unprecedented for a prime Manhattan office tower.  Citibank had foreclosed on the property because it was owed $60 million in mortgage payments.  The auction process emerged from a decision by federal Judge Pierre Leval to sell the property and pay off the mortgage while litigation proceeds over the question of who had legal claim to the building before the sale.  The dispute stems from a long-running battle over who owns the four Manhattan buildings that were once the property of the former Philippine dictator.  The current Philippine government, indicted Saudi Arabian weapons dealer Adnan Khashoggi and New York Land Co. -- the group that purchased the buildings for the Marcoses in the first place -- all claimed before the auction that the buildings belonged to them.  New York Land was declared the winner in the auction after New York developer Burton Resnick of Jack Resnick & Sons refused to raise his offer of $108,550,000.  So, if the judge later rules that New York Land already had legal title, proceeds from the sale will revert to New York Land.  "The price was a little steep, a little more than I wanted to pay," said New York Land's president, Joseph Bernstein.  He declined to say who will finance his purchase.  Earlier, he said, Bear Stearns & Co. had agreed to finance a $100 million settlement he proposed with the Philippine government.  "I could tell Joe's voice was getting a little squeaky there when he had to raise his bid over $107 million," said one attorney who has dealt with Mr. Bernstein.  After Citibank is paid, the remainder of the money will be held in escrow until a trial or until Judge Leval determines who is entitled to the proceeds.  Two other buildings once owned by Mr. Marcos are slated to be auctioned next month.  "I expect we will be litigating this thing into the year 2000," said Mr. Bernstein, who said that after 42 months in the courts, no pre-trial fact-finding has taken place and no trial is scheduled.  The building, located at 40 Wall St., was for a short period after its 1931 construction the tallest in the world.  It is said to require extensive renovation.  The new owner also will have to lease substantial amounts of space in a soft real estate market.  "They have their work cut out for them," said Donald Schnabel, vice chairman of Julien J. Studley Inc., a real estate brokerage concern.  Mr. Schnabel said that with nine million square feet of office space vacant in lower Manhattan, the building faces stiff competition.  On the other hand, he said, "if the Bernsteins can weather the storm, they could have a bonanza on their hands," as the sale price is lower than what has been paid for similar properties.  Complicating the whole matter, the Philippine government still has a contract to sell all four buildings to a group led by New York investor Morris Bailey for $398 million.  Mr. Bailey, whose purchase would be financed by Goldman, Sachs & Co., had agreed to submit a minimum bid in each auction.  Mr. Bailey's attorney, Jonathan Mechanic of the law firm Fried, Frank, Harris, Shriver & Jacobson, said that even if his client doesn't end up owning the buildings, he has an agreement with the Philippine government to gain a substantial financial benefit if the buildings are sold for more than Mr. Bailey was willing to pay.  Generic-drug stocks could be the new darlings of investors who buy stocks the rest of the market hates.  But the evolving scandal and related government investigations that have given the industry a black eye might bruise impulsive investors as well.  The industry is out of favor because of reports that a number of companies including Bolar Pharmaceutical may have committed fraud in winning Food and Drug Administration approval to sell generic equivalents of some brand-name drugs.  Bolar officials have denied the charges.  Federal regulators also say they have uncovered manufacturing irregularities at Par Pharmaceutical and other generic companies.  Worse yet, one analyst says, there won't be a healthy crop of new product opportunities, prompted by expiring patents on brand-name compounds, for a couple of years.  "In the near term, this isn't a terrific place to invest, even without the investigations," says Hemant Shah, an industry analyst in Warren, N.J.  "As an investor, I'd be cautious for the next year or so."  Stock prices of some publicly traded generic drug companies have tumbled.  Bolar is down 17% on the American Stock Exchange since reports surfaced on Aug. 4.  Friday it finished down 1/4 to 23 1/8.  Last week, Par fell 27% on news of guilty pleas, substantial write-offs and revoked drug approvals related to a federal inquiry of its activities.  The stock, which recently traded as high as 10 1/8, closed at 5 5/8 Friday, off 1/8, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  None of the five generic drug companies whose shares trade in the Nasdaq over-the-counter market, including Duramed Pharmaceuticals, Lyphomed, and Marsam Pharmaceuticals, have been implicated in the scandal, but they could be hurt by the fallout, analysts say.  Indeed, FDA Commissioner Frank Young said last week that if the troubles continue to spread, the industry may be totally discredited.  "It's keeping the whole industry under a cloud," says Mr. Shah.  "Nobody knows who'll be next."  Still, analysts' estimates of the industry's future growth are enticing, even if explosive expansion is still a few years away.  They anticipate that between 1991 and 1995, patents will expire for drugs with annual sales totaling between $8 billion and $10 billion.  By comparison, patents representing prescription drugs with total annual sales of $1.6 billion expired in the 1983-85 period, fueling the initial boom in the generic market.  "Right now the conservative investor should stand clear," said David Saks, an analyst for Wedbush, Morgan Securities.  "But for those who are willing to take a risk, there could be major upside potential investing in generic drug stocks."  Mr. Saks likens the troubles generic drug concerns face to the problems plaguing health maintenance organizations two years ago.  Several companies in the group, including one that filed for bankruptcy, had severe financial difficulties.  There were also investigations of fraudulent practices at a number of firms.  The HMO stocks plummeted during that time, Mr. Saks recalls, but have since rebounded.  The example shows that even though "everything hit the fan and {share prices} collapsed, the stocks represented a fantastic opportunity."  Things aren't that gloomy yet for generic-drug makers, of course.  Mr. Saks says investors shouldn't turn their backs on the group permanently.  But some generic companies face hurdles beyond the guilt-by-association problems.  Duramed Pharmaceuticals, which recently completed a $14 million, 2.3 million share sale that erased some onerous bank debt, is in the tricky business of making generic hormones.  Analysts applauded the stock sale, but remain skeptical about Duramed's prospects mostly because it hasn't convinced regulators that one of its premiere products, a generic version of the estrogen hormone Premarin, is a reliable substitute for the branded product.  Without such approval, hospitals, pharmacists, government health care programs and doctors won't buy the product and prescribe it for patients, the analysts worry.  Marsam Pharmaceuticals plans to begin shipping generic injectable drugs such as penicillin soon, analysts say.  But it isn't profitable and is still technically a development-stage company  Royce Laboratories, likewise isn't profitable.  The company says, however, that it is awaiting approval from the FDA to manufacture and sell 12 generic prescription drugs and it intends to expand its line of over-the-counter drug products to increase revenue.  Despite his reservations about investing in the group now, Mr. Shah says Lyphomed is attractive.  About 80% of the company's revenue comes from its generic injectable-drug business.  Mr. Shah notes that injectable drug products don't appear to be the target of the FDA inquiry, which so far has focused on oral compounds.  Mr. Shah and Wedbush's Mr. Saks both say Bolar is appealing, if the company is cleared of the allegations of wrongdoing.  Another industry analyst who also has bought several of the issues, is bullish on the group these days because he says it's best to buy the stocks while they're cold.  "Historically, the generic drug companies make money in very short periods," the analyst says, "so you have to buy them when nobody cares."  ---  @ Trading Under a Cloud  @ Nasdaq's generic drug stocks  @ CURRENT  @ PERCENT MARKET  @ CHANGE VALUE  @ SINCE (In mil-  @ 12/30/88* lions)  @ Duramed Pharmaceuticals  @ (DRMD) +77% $ 40  @ Jones Medical Industries  @ (JMED) + 7 20  @ Lyphomed (LMED) +83 650  @ Marsam Pharmaceuticals  @ (MSAM) +33 90  @ Royce Laboratories  @ (RLAB) -58 4  @ *Through Aug. 11, 1989  ---  Friday Market Activity  The Nasdaq Composite Index slipped 1.07, to 462.48, on 139.3 million shares.  For the week, the composite advanced 1.1%.  Among bigger issues, the Nasdaq 100 Index fell 2.23, to 432.61.  Though investors soured on the technology group by weeks' end, the roster of giant non-financial stocks improved 0.5% for the week.  The Nasdaq Financial Index rose a slim 0.75, to 462.46, Friday, and gained 2.2% for the week.  Heading the most active list Friday was Seven Oaks International.  The coupon-processing concern advanced 3/8 to 6 1/2 on 2.5 million shares.  Dow Jones Professional Investor Report said PHLCorp., which owns about 993,000 shares, apparently sold most of its 14.7% stake in Seven Oaks.  The news service said the block consisted of 949,000 shares and that "PHLCorp is the only holder of enough Seven Oaks shares to have been {the} seller."  PHLCorp executives weren't available for comment.  Apple Computer fell 1 3/8 to 41 7/8.  The Professional Investor Report said, however, that many analysts are optimistic about the company's outlook after meeting with Apple officials last week.  Other OTC technology stocks were also weak.  Intel slipped 1/2 to 30 3/4 on 1.5 million shares.  The company has been rumored as a possible suitor for National Semiconductor, PIR said.  Microsoft slid 3/4 to 57 3/4, LIN Broadcasting fell 1 to 106 3/4 on 435,000 shares, and Sun Microsystems eased 3/8 to 14 1/8 on almost one million shares.  Loral Corp. Chairman Bernard L. Schwartz, in buying two big divisions from his company, has found an attractive second job.  Mr. Schwartz bought Loral's Aircraft Braking Systems and Engineered Fabrics divisions for $455 million in a leveraged buy-out last spring.  The purchase was "a long-term investment," he said.  He put up $10 million and got a 35% stake and board control of the acquired units, now operating under the name K&F Industries Inc.  The 63-year-old chairman isn't waiting long to reap rewards from his new investment.  Mr. Schwartz and four other Loral executives will receive $200,000 a month in "advisory" fees from K&F, with the largest share going to Mr. Schwartz.  That will be in addition to his Loral paycheck, which last year totaled $1.7 million.  If Mr. Schwartz spends the 10 hours a month he estimates will be required of him as chairman of K&F, his K&F compensation would work out to at least $4,000 an hour.  Meanwhile, the acquired divisions are running losses and may have to borrow money to pay interest on loans used in the purchase.  The businesses were profitable prior to the effects of the buy-out financing.  These details were disclosed in a prospectus for a $210 million subordinated debenture sale that closed last week and were elaborated on in an interview with Mr. Schwartz.  Despite dire warnings in the prospectus, Mr. Schwartz argued that K&F is treading on firm financial ground.  "In my view, the leveraged structure here is well within the ability of K&F to manage," Mr. Schwartz said.  He also defended the "advisory" fees, saying that Loral's board would consider the K&F payments in determining the size of any "discretionary bonuses."  Last year Mr. Schwartz's compensation from Loral included $750,000 in base salary, $400,000 in incentive pay and a $500,000 bonus "in recognition of his contribution to the company's outstanding performance" the previous year, the proxy statement said.  Mr. Schwartz is Loral's largest shareholder, with 5.7% of the stock.  K&F will be making additional payments to members of Mr. Schwartz's family.  Mr. Schwartz appointed the husbands of a niece and a daughter to K&F's board, and a nephew will be chief financial officer.  Their compensation hasn't been determined yet, Mr. Schwartz said.  To refinance part of the $455 million cost of buying the Loral divisions, Mr. Schwartz and his investing group sold the $210 million of junk-bond-rate debentures with a 13.75% coupon through Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  In a provision analysts said is typical of junk-bond offerings, the prospectus said there can be "no assurance" that the company will be able to meet terms of its bank credit agreement or generate enough cash flow to cover the required interest and principal payments.  The two units were profitable when they were part of Loral, a defense electronics company; they posted net income of $28.6 million for the year ended March 31 on $312 million in sales.  But on a pro-forma basis reflecting acquisition, financing and other costs, the units had a loss of $15.8 million for the year, including $58.9 million in interest expense.  Besides Mr. Schwartz's 35% share, K&F is 61.75%-owned by Shearson and some limited partners.  Bank lenders hold 3.25% of the stock.  Mr. Schwartz acquired the Loral businesses after an auction in April in which his sweetened $455 million offer was topped by a bid of $467 million from Banner Industries Inc., Cleveland.  However, a $17 million breakup fee that Loral had originally agreed to pay to Mr. Schwartz's group, in the event the divisions were sold to another party, made the Banner offer less attractive.  Banner and some Loral holders have since filed lawsuits in state court here seeking damages, a decree nullifying the sale and a new auction.  The suits accuse Loral and its outside directors of managing the auction so as to guarantee Mr. Schwartz's purchase of the divisions.  The company and Mr. Schwartz dispute the charges in the suits.  The prospectus said the new company has a $100 million revolving-credit arrangement to help service its debt, fund capital spending and provide working capital.  Through Aug. 1, 1993, a maximum of $25 million of the credit line may be used to pay interest on the debentures.  Loral isn't recognizing any gain on the sale of the two divisions, and Mr. Schwartz said they were sold because they didn't fit in with Loral's defense electronics businesses.  Loral acquired Aircraft Braking, based in Akron, Ohio, and Engineered Fabrics, based in Rockmart, Ga., in its $588 million purchase of Goodyear Tire & Rubber Co.'s aerospace unit in 1987.  Before Mr. Schwartz bid for the units, he had tried for two years to sell them.  He said he decided to purchase the companies to keep them "within the family of Loral culture."  Mr. Schwartz, a Brooklyn native, came to Loral as chairman in 1972 when the company was riddled with losses in businesses ranging from toys to wire.  Beefing up the defense electronics businesses and shedding everything else, Mr. Schwartz has led Loral through 17 consecutive years of record earnings.  In the latest year ended March 31, Loral earned $87.6 million on sales of $1.2 billion.  A team of Harvard University researchers claimed "the first apparent vaccine protection against AIDS virus infection" in a small experiment involving rhesus monkeys.  The researchers warned that the success against the deadly and still incurable acquired immune deficiency syndrome was achieved under hothouse laboratory conditions.  They further cautioned that it would be premature to apply their findings to human disease prevention.  Still, after years of inconclusive vaccine reports and many failed animal tests, the report provided a spark of hope.  "It's encouraging," said Robert C. Gallo of the National Cancer Institute.  In contrast to previous successes limited to cat and mouse viruses, he said, "This means it's true that you can get protection against a primate retrovirus infection that's related to one in man.  Have we known that before?  No."  The report, by Ronald Desrosiers, M.D. Daniel and their colleagues at Harvard and the New England Regional Primate Research Center, is published in the current issue of the Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences.  Their experiment focused on simian immunodeficiency virus, or SIV, which causes an AIDS-like disease in monkeys.  Researchers used a whole, killed virus to vaccinate six rhesus monkeys.  One week later they injected infectious live virus into the six vaccinated animals and into four unvaccinated control animals.  All of the control animals became infected; three of them died of AIDS, and the fourth remains persistently infected.  The six vaccinated animals fared better.  While four contracted the infection, none became ill with AIDS, though one animal later died of unrelated causes.  Two didn't become infected at all, suggesting the vaccine may have prevented the virus from even gaining a toehold in the body.  Mr. Desrosiers admits he stacked the conditions for success, principally by scheduling his animals' exposure to the live virus just one week after inoculation, when protective antibody levels were believed to be at their peak.  An earlier study by the Desrosiers group, challenging the animals' immune systems 12 weeks after vaccination, failed to protect the monkeys against infection.  The test also used a smaller dose of infectious virus to challenge the vaccine's protective powers than other researchers have used.  And it used exactly the same strain of SIV as the vaccine -- a situation that probably wouldn't occur in nature.  "When everyone {in AIDS vaccine research} started out, we were all optimistic and hopeful.  After a number of failures, everyone realized it would be a tough job," Mr. Desrosiers said.  "Then we retreated and asked if we could get success under any conditions.  Our report is the first such success."  Paul Luciw, a scientist at the University of California at Davis, said he did a similar experiment -- using a virus that was 100 times more infectious -- to challenge the vaccine and failed to prevent infection.  Nevertheless, he said, despite these limitations, "Ron's work is important because he established a protocol which gives a certain level of efficacy."  "I wouldn't say this is a major breakthrough," said Patricia Fultz, a primate researcher at the Yerkes Primate Center at Emory University in Atlanta, "but it gives promise that there may be protection against one of these viruses."  SIV is about 40% identical to the human AIDS virus.  But it is gaining support as a model for AIDS vaccine research.  Other experiments, which inject human AIDS virus into chimpanzees, are troubled by several factors.  One is the scarcity and expense of chimps.  Another is the fact that chimps, while they may become infected with the human AIDS virus, never become sick, which limits the possibility for comparisons with people.  SIV, on the other hand, both infects and causes AIDS-like disease in the plentiful rhesus monkeymaking it "an excellent experimental model," Mr. Luciw said.  Yet, Dr. Gallo said, SIV isn't the same virus: "It's 60% different {from the AIDS virus}.  And the recipient is a monkey, whose immune response isn't the same as that of a human being."  Mr. Desrosiers said his next step is to design a vaccine experiment that can achieve not 33% but "uniform, 100% protection" of animals against infection.  Then, he said, he'll test whether his vaccine can protect against challenge by a different strain of SIV.  "It's premature to push this approach in humans," he said.  There's no indication it "will work in the real world."  The dark side of whole-virus vaccines remains the fear that some live virus particles could survive to infect, rather than protect, the vaccine recipient.  Even after the Desrosiers report, "I still don't think whole virus vaccine will ever be tolerable in man," Dr. Gallo said.  A number of groups are said to be exploring lines of research similar to those of the Desrosiers team, notably Michael Murphey-Corb at the Delta Regional Primate Research Center in Covington, La.  Dr. Murphey-Corb couldn't be reached for comment.  Anthony Fauci, director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, hailed the Desrosiers work as "an important first step."  While it leaves unanswered the practical question of whether this model works in the real world, Dr. Fauci said, "Scientifically, the question was, is there such a thing as a protective immune response" against AIDS?  "We now know that there is."  Fulton Federal Savings Bank, pinched by the tough new capital standards enacted last week as part of the savings and loan bailout law, said it retained Goldman, Sachs & Co. to evaluate the thrift's "strategic alternatives."  Fulton Federal, Georgia's second largest thrift, with assets of $2.56 billion, said it needs to raise $68.1 million of stockholder equity to meet federal regulators' new 1.5% "tangible capital" requirements.  The Atlanta-based company also reported a second-quarter loss of $7 million after net income of $1.4 million, or 33 cents a share, a year earlier.  For the six months, Fulton Federal had a loss of $6.1 million.  It had profit of $1.9 million, or 45 cents a share, in the year-earlier six months.  Jepson Corp., Chicago, said five shareholders filed a class-action complaint to block its agreement to be acquired by Great American Management & Investment Inc. for $12 a share, or about $222 million.  The lawsuit, filed in Delaware Court of Chancery, charges, among other things, that the price of the tender offer is inadequate and that Jepson should have put itself up for sale through an open bidding procedure.  As part of the previously announced pact, Robert S. Jepson Jr., chairman, chief executive officer and principal shareholder of Jepson, and certain members of his family, agreed to sell their 69% stake, or 12,748,590 shares of Jepson's common stock to Great American.  Jepson and Great American said that their managements believe the suit is without merit.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Jepson closed unchanged Friday at $11.75 a share.  Entergy Corp. said the third-quarter write-off of its investment in a canceled nuclear power plant will reduce 1989 earnings as much as $850 million, resulting in a loss for the year.  In 1988, the utility holding company had net income of $411 million, or $2.01 a share, on revenue of about $3.56 billion.  Entergy, formerly Middle South Utilities, said 1989 profit will be reduced as much as $4.15 cents a share.  The $910 million write-off is part of a settlement between the company and various regulatory agencies, under which regulators agreed to forgo further inquiry into construction costs of the Grand Gulf 1 power plant.  In exchange, Entergy's System Energy Resources Inc. unit will write off its $910 million investment in Unit 2 of the Grand Gulf project on Sept. 1.  Elizabeth Smith, associate curator of the Museum of Contemporary Art in Los Angeles, says, "It's akin to inside trading, and I think there's something wrong with it."  Thomas Hoving, director of the Metropolitan Museum of Art from 1967-1977, says, "It's all part of the game."  What they're referring to is the way some savvy art market players try to cash in on what might be called the "exhibition effect."  Art dealers and serious collectors know that blockbuster museum shows anoint star artists and influence -- sometimes even create -- art market trends.  So some people buy art in anticipation of exhibitions, hoping to ride the wave of hype and the likely spurt in demand to higher prices.  Consider what's been happening to the price of paintings by Ellen Day Hale, an early 20th-century New England artist.  Her genteel still lifes and portraits were considered largely of decorative, not historical, value until 1986.  That's when the Boston Museum of Fine Arts included Ms. Hale's self-portrait in its hugely popular traveling exhibition, "The Bostonians."  None of Ms. Hale's works had sold in the auction season before the exhibition, but 10 came on the block the following season.  The most expensive sold for $5,390, according to "Leonard's Annual Price Index of Art Auctions."  In 1987, the same Hale self-portrait was in the opening exhibition of the National Museum of Women in the Arts in Washington.  The Washington Post dubbed it "a first-rate picture."  The following season, at Sotheby's Holdings Inc.'s New York auction house, a bidder paid $27,500 for another Hale painting.  "Exhibition in any place of stature will raise the value of a work 15% to 20%," says Mr. Hoving, the former museum director who is now editor of Connoisseur magazine.  Other works by the artist and works by artists of the same school often also appreciate, art experts say, and usually at a faster rate than the already raging bull art market as a whole.  The most outstanding example of the exhibition effect probably is Vincent Van Gogh's "Irises," which sold in November 1987 for $53.9 million, making it the most expensive painting in history.  Some art dealers say the value of the painting, which is not even remotely considered Van Gogh's greatest work, may have been increased by several million dollars as a result of its prominent position at the entrance to the Metropolitan's Van Gogh exhibition, which opened in late 1986.  But the impact of inclusion in a museum show can also be extremely significant on the works of obscure artists and contemporary artists, exactly the works fledgling collectors can afford.  Thus, knowledge of what artists and what art movements will be featured in coming exhibitions -- and ballyhooed in museum advertisements and featured in "important" coffee-table books, limited-edition posters and multiple-city tours -- can mean big bucks.  Says David Ramus, a dealer with galleries in New York and Atlanta, "If I'm having dinner with somebody and I find out the Whitney is planning a major exhibition of John Doe two years from now, its a good investment to go out and buy some."  Individual collectors, however, like small investors in the stock market, usually don't find out about market-moving news until after the big players.  In the tight-knit art world, the rich usually get richer, and everybody else ends up with Van Gogh desk calendars.  Here's the way the inside information flows: The first to hear about planned exhibitions are curators at other museums, then auction-house officials and dealers who may know where to track down certain works.  Next on the grapevine are potential corporate sponsors, and then owners of major collections who may lend works.  Last is the amateur collector, who may first hear about an exhibit when the museum publicly announces it, typically about a year before the exhibit opens.  That's perhaps three years after art-world insiders have gotten the word.  That doesn't stop the rumors, of course.  Mr. Ramus, the New York and Atlanta art dealer, says people with paintings to sell have claimed to him that an artist is about to be exhibited by a museum, that the painting for sale might be included in the show, and that the work is almost guaranteed to rise in value.  Mr. Ramus says he has called museums to check out rumors about planned exhibitions of terra-cotta sculptures, Belle Epoque paintings and the works of American painters Andrew Wyeth and Lilla Cabot Perry.  And when rumors have been true, he says, he's bought works he wouldn't otherwise have purchased.  So what's the inside scoop now?  The big guys already know all about it, of course, but here's the word on some of the major exhibitions of 1990-1992.  The exhibits, many of which will travel to museums in other cities, include: History of Photography at the Museum of Modern Art; late-period Claude Monet at the Boston Museum; contemporary artist Ed Paschke at the Art Institute of Chicago; Lilla Cabot Perry at the National Museum of Women in the Arts; abstract expressionist Hans Hoffmann at the Whitney Museum of American Art in New York; and early 20th-century French painter Edouard Vuillard at the Houston Museum of Fine Arts.  For perhaps the most likely artist soon to turn into a household name, look to Vuillard.  Best known for his muted interiors and domestic scenes livened by spots of color, Vuillard is very well regarded in the art world, and his works are owned by such respected collectors as Walter Annenberg and Paul Mellon.  The prices of Vuillard works have already taken off in anticipation of the Houston exhibition, which will also travel to New York and Washington.  At Sotheby's May impressionist auction in New York, "Dans La Bibliotheque" sold for $600,000, $75,000 above the higher range of its estimate.  The record price for a Vuillard, set the same month at Christie's, is $1.8 million.  Nonetheless, the average price for the 14 Vuillard works that sold at auction in the 1987-1988 auction season, the last for which complete statistics are available, was $103,000, comparatively modest for a work by a major artist.  Other artists likely to be helped and hyped by coming museum exhibitions have more affordable works available.  Works by Mr. Paschke sold at auction this year for less than $10,000.  And Henry Casselli, an American realist who has a one-man show at the New Orleans Museum of Fine Art in the fall of 1991 and recently painted the portrait of President Reagan that will hang in the National Portrait Gallery, has sold works for similar prices.  After months of acrimonious negotiations over a Chapter 11 bankruptcy-law reorganization, Public Service Co. of New Hampshire told a federal judge that a resolution may be in sight.  The company said it agreed generally to a New Hampshire proposal that rate increases over the next seven years be limited to 5.5% annually.  Future rates have been the critical factor in negotiations because they will determine the utility company's financial condition and thus how much creditors and shareholders receive in the reorganization.  A reorganization based on the state's rates could value the company at as much as $2.2 billion.  PS of New Hampshire owes its creditors about $1.72 billion.  PS of New Hampshire would like to negotiate a plan under which it would emerge as an independent company.  However, Judge James Yacos said that others also can propose reorganization plans, with the plan that provides the most value winning out.  Northeast Utilities, based in Hartford, Conn., and New England Electric System, based in Westboro, Mass., both have offered to acquire PS of New Hampshire.  Judge Yacos set a deadline of Sept. 15 for filing reorganization plans.  Richard Levin, an attorney for the utility, said the company, which filed for protection from creditors in January 1988, hopes to emerge from bankruptcy proceedings by July 1, 1990.  PS of New Hampshire's common closed Friday at $4.25 a share, unchanged, in composite New York Stock Exchange trading.  Its bellwether 17.5% debentures, due 2004, closed at $85 for each $100 principal amount, up $2.875.  In view of a history of squabbles between the state and the company, differences still could arise in negotiating an internal reorganization.  "It's not a done deal," said Larry Smukler, senior assistant attorney general for the state.  "Now we have three bidders, Northeast, NEES {New England Electric} and the company itself on a stand-alone basis."  But a spokesman for the company said, "We think that {an internal reorganization} is doable."  The company said the "principles of a distribution agreement" have been discussed determining what creditors and shareholders would receive in an internal reorganization.  Creditors also were encouraged.  "We have broken a major logjam," said Daniel Frank, a fund manager at Fidelity Investments, a mutual fund company that is a major holder of PS of New Hamsphire unsecured debt and common.  Northeast, which recently improved to $1.9 billion its offer to buy the New Hampshire utility, is "more than willing to compete with other parties," said Robert Busch, senior vice president, finance.  New England Electric has said it plans to top Northeast's latest offer.  The state endorsed the Northeast bid after Northeast agreed to limit rate increases over the next seven years to 5.5% a year.  The state and PS of New Hampshire in effect have agreed to discuss an internal reorganization involving the same rate increases.  The company had been seeking slightly higher increases, but it says that differences in the rate-making assumptions used by the two parties mean the proposals are very similar.  PS of New Hampshire filed for bankruptcy-court protection because of the large debt related to its 35.7% stake in the long-delayed Seabrook, N.H., nuclear power plant.  Proponents hope that the plant, which recently completed low-power testing, will finally get a commercial license and begin full-power operation early next year, although critics continue to oppose its start-up.  The billionaire investor Warren Buffett of Berkshire Hathaway has been widely lauded for taking big, friendly stakes in major companies that were running scared because of raiders.  The idea behind these "white squire" investments is to give managers time to work out their plans without being harassed by so-called quick-buck artists.  But there is another side to Mr. Buffett's expanding role as corporate savior.  By offering help against takeover attacks to USAir, Gillette and Salomon, he has managed to extract exclusive and highly favorable investment deals for his Berkshire Hathaway investment company that weren't available to other shareholders; these three deals alone total $1.7 billion.  In each case, he got a call on the takeover-prone company's common shares at a bargain price, and voting powers that could allow him to wield great influence over the company's affairs.  Many Wall Street investors say Mr. Buffett's special deals amount to a kind of gentlemanly protection game.  In the old days, these investors say, corporate raiders such as Saul Steinberg got paid "greenmail" to go away.  But Mr. Buffett is getting "whitemail" to stick around and hold management's hand.  Until Mr. Buffett rode to the rescue, USAir was considered a very likely airline takeover target.  Steinhardt Partners, a New York investment fund, owns a big USAir stake and apparently was trying to put the carrier in play.  Gillette in recent years has fought off two raids.  Salomon had raider problems in 1987.  Mr. Buffett declined to be interviewed for this article.  But his exclusive arrangements with takeover targets give Berkshire Hathaway preferred shares paying high dividends; the securities are much safer than common shares if the market falls.  The dividends, moreover, are largely exempt from corporate taxes for Berkshire Hathaway.  And the newly issued preferred shares are convertible into common stock at only small premiums over the market price.  The $358 million of USAir preferred shares that Mr. Buffett bought last week convert to common at roughly a 15% premium.  The conversion premium on his $600 million of Gillette preferred, bought last month, is about 18%.  Recently, conversion premiums on preferreds sold by companies in the open market have been 20% to 25%, investors say.  Dividends on the USAir and Gillette preferreds also are pretty rich, traders say.  Mr. Buffett's deals seem unfair to some people, because they aren't available to other shareholders.  "I think all shareholders should have same rights as Warren Buffett" to buy these attractive preferred shares, says a New York money manager, Martin Sosnoff of Atalanta/Sosnoff Capital.  And a trader says, "I wish I could get a piece of paper like that."  Nobody likes to knock Mr. Buffett.  The Omaha, Neb., investor is considered one of the all-time great money managers.  Shares of Berkshire Hathaway have vastly enriched holders.  He mostly buys common stock without special deals; for example, his big stake in Coca-Cola.  Moreover, Mr. Buffett isn't forcing anybody to pay him for anti-takeover protection.  Managers approach him because of his reputation for being a supportive, long-term investor in companies such as Washington Post and Capital Cities/ABC.  Mr. Buffett isn't alone in this anti-takeover game.  In May, General Electric Capital, a unit of General Electric, played savior to Dunkin' Donuts.  Lazard Freres's so-called white squire fund got a sweet deal from Polaroid to fend off raids.  And other investors with deep pockets are expected to get into the game.  But what about other holders?  At least in the short term, the agreements with Mr. Buffett could deprive them of the chance to sell their shares to the highest bidder, complains Paul Tierney of Coniston Partners, which last year lost a proxy fight against Gillette.  "I think it's lousy," he says.  Also worrisome is that managements of USAir, Gillette and Salomon may be signing away future control of the companies to Mr. Buffett at a price far below what it would cost to go into the market and buy a controlling stake, Mr. Tierney says.  "It violates the well-established principle of selling control at a premium," he says.  Laurence Tisch of Loews Corp., which owns 25% of CBS, seized control of the broadcasting company's board a couple of years ago without paying a takeover premium for the company's stock.  The outcome of this Trojan Horse strategy: He now is also chief executive of CBS.  Of course, if Mr. Buffett ever moved to control a company, he might lose his ability to play the protection game.  He apparently hasn't shown any inclination to pursue a Trojan Horse strategy.  He has agreed to limit his stakes in Gillette, Salomon and perhaps USAir for several years.  Still, if any of Mr. Buffett's white squire investments turn sour, the eminent investor is in "a strong position" to increase his influence, says a person who is close to Loews.  Mr. Buffett's USAir preferred shares are convertible into a 12% stake, though he wasn't offered a USAir board seat.  His Gillette investment represents an 11% stake that may go as high as 14%, and he has been offered two Gillette board seats.  His 12% Salomon stake, bought for $700 million, could go to 20%.  Mr. Buffett and Berkshire Hathaway Vice Chairman Charles Munger are Salomon directors.  Through an intermediary, Mr. Buffett says there are absolutely "no voting restrictions" on any of his shares in these companies, whether he holds preferred or common shares.  In other words, he isn't obliged to vote with management or the rest of the board.  In the Gillette deal, Mr. Buffett gets the right to vote on any company plans that might "impair the rights and preferences" of Berkshire Hathaway's preferreds, according to Mr. Buffett's 13-D filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Also, if something happens to endanger the preferreds, Mr. Buffett gets the right to elect two Gillette directors, in addition to the two board seats he would get as part of his investment agreement.  But Mr. Buffett promised Gillette that for 10 years, Berkshire Hathaway won't join with any other group holding 5% or more of Gillette.  Mr. Buffett also agreed to offer Gillette first right of refusal if he wants to sell any Gillette stock.  Mr. Buffett expects to file a 13-D on USAir early this week.  Meanwhile, USAir won't discuss the terms of its agreement with the investor, or any aspect of this article, except to say the purpose of the deal was "so the management team can devote itself to running the airline."  Will Mr. Buffett wield a big stick in the board room?  He has in the past been an active and apparently beneficent director of companies where he took big stakes, including Washington Post and Geico.  Some insiders say that since getting onto Salomon's board, Mr. Buffett has encouraged the investment bank to take a cautious, low-risk approach to trading and leveraged buy-outs.  But John Gutfreund, Salomon's chairman, says Mr. Buffett and Mr. Munger, the Berkshire Hathaway vice chairman, are "essentially passive" and haven't offered advice on how to run the business.  "Maybe I could use it, but there hasn't been any advice," Mr. Gutfreund says.  Mr. Buffett's investment in Salomon is considered his least successful.  His preferred shares are convertible at 38; Salomon closed Friday at 27 3/4.  But Mr. Buffett has much less risk than other equity holders.  He is collecting a 9% annual dividend on the Salomon preferreds.  Revlon Group, which took a run at Salomon in 1987, thought the deal was so enticing that it wanted to buy Mr. Buffett's preferreds.  No one has ever tested the white squire defense in a takeover battle.  Takeover specialists say a white squire might not stop a takeover if the target gets a high cash offer for all of its shares.  Mr. Buffett is a fiduciary and has to think of Berkshire Hathaway holders, these specialists say.  "If a third party came in with a price that reflected the long-term values of the company, {Mr.  Buffett} would go along, I expect," says Arthur Fleischer, a New York takeover lawyer.  Still, Mr. Fleischer says he might recommend a white squire strategy to a corporate client that is worried about raiders.  Mr. Buffett's investments provide some comfort to management, Mr. Fleischer says.  Under Delaware law, moreover, if Mr. Buffett was the only holdout in a takeover bid and refused to tender his shares to a would-be acquirer, the bidder would have to wait three years to complete a merger, the lawyer says.  Mr. Buffett has "done a brilliant job of convincing people" that his white squire investments are good for America, says a well-known raider.  But the jury is still out on whether companies are being smart in forging protection arrangements with Mr. Buffett.  After the USAir deal was announced, the rating concern Moody's Investors Service said it might downgrade $875 million of the company's bonds and commercial paper.  In issuing new preferreds to Mr. Buffett, USAir isn't making itself stronger by adding equity; instead, it plans to use Berkshire Hathaway's money to buy back common stock.  Moreover, the 9.25% annual preferred dividend represents a big call on USAir's cash flow.  USAir also is mulling plans to put another big block of stock away in an employee stock option plan.  BUDGET DIRECTOR Darman warned that the Fed's credit policies may be pushing the economy toward a recession and suggested that interest rates should be brought down further.  His televised comments made it clear that if the economy takes a downturn, the administration is prepared to publicly blame the Fed.  ---  Producer prices fell 0.4% in July, easing inflation fears.  Retail sales climbed 0.9%, and figures for May and June were revised upward.  Even so, stocks and bonds tumbled, reflecting doubts that the Fed will cut interest rates.  The dollar rose.  ---  GM appears ready to join its domestic rivals in aggressively raising 1990-model prices.  Its price plan indicates a desire to boost profit by offsetting the high costs of new safety equipment and sales incentives.  ---  Seaman Furniture, acquired by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts in 1987, missed its August debt payment, and is in danger of failing.  The disclosure is a black eye for KKR.  KKR received federal antitrust approval to buy up to 15% of BTR, but observers doubt that the British conglomerate is as vulnerable to a takeover as B.A.T Industries.  ---  UAL Corp. has received expressions of interest from other potential bidders, following Marvin Davis's $5.4 billion proposal, an official said.  ---  Drexel Burnham settled with 10 states as part of a nationwide plan to extricate itself from its legal mess.  The plan would allow Drexel to continue operating in the states despite its record as an admitted felon.  ---  U.S. thrifts reduced assets by $7.6 billion in June, while net withdrawals increased to $4.6 billion.  Credit ratings on banks' non-depository obligations, such as letters of credit, could suffer from the new thrift-rescue legislation.  ---  The telephone strike grew as 40,000 Ameritech workers joined 160,000 strikers at three other Baby Bells.  Southwestern Bell and U S West, meanwhile, reached preliminary agreements with their unions.  ---  Pinnacle West Capital's access to funding is being restricted, just when the utility and thrift holding company needs money to repay debt.  ---  Prudential Insurance agreed to buy Merrill Lynch & Co.'s residential real estate sales and relocation businesses for more than $300 million.  ---  McDonnell Douglas paid the FAA a $180,000 fine for failing to make a design change to its MD-80 twin-jet.  ---  Interlake Corp. announced a restructuring, viewed as a ploy to thwart a possible takeover attempt.  ---  Corona Corp. won the right to Canada's richest gold mine, ending a long legal battle with LAC Minerals.  ---  The semiconductor industry's leading indicator slipped again in July.  Demand is expected to remain flat, but analysts said the numbers don't presage an industry recession.  ---  Underwriters shelved Magnet PLC's plan to sell $455.3 million in debt.  The retreat caps a series of buy-out troubles with U.K. retailers.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 197,550,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2683.99, off 28.64; transportation 1413.23, off 6.40; utilities 217.56, off 2.64.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3302.17, off 30.19.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.23, up 0.82; spot index 128.00, off 1.03.  Dollar: 141.85 yen, up 2.00; 1.9405 marks, up 0.035.  Barron Hilton loves a good game of poker, and these days he knows he's playing the hand of his life.  The stakes?  No less than the multibillion-dollar Hilton Hotels Corp. hotel and casino empire built by the legendary Conrad Hilton and expanded immensely since 1966, when his son Barron became chief executive.  Last week, after months of rumors, the company officially put itself on the block.  The move has created no end of mystery among investors.  After all, Barron Hilton just finished a grueling, 10-year fight over his father's estate, finally gaining full control of the company last May.  Why, then, would the 61-year-old major Hilton stockholder sell off the family jewels for mere money?  Even to his circle of hunting and card-playing buddies, Mr. Hilton is something of an enigma -- predictable, perhaps, only in his dedication to what he perceives as his father's wishes.  When Conrad Hilton died in 1979 and left his 28% stake in Hilton Hotels to charity -- not his children -- Barron insisted, and eventually convinced a court, that his father really wanted Hilton to stay in family hands first, and benefit charity second.  So it is that, in an interview Friday, his first in months, Mr. Hilton again invoked his father's name: Dad, he says, would be considering a sale, too.  "My father was a businessman, and if it was in the interest of his shareholders, he was interested in negotiating a deal," Mr. Hilton says, his deliberate speech tinged with a Texas accent. ". . .  I like to feel I approach transactions the same way he would have."  In fact, he says, his father once considered selling Hilton Hotels to Harold Geneen, former chairman of ITT Corp., in 1967.  Considering the whopping prices investors are paying for hotel chains these days, and the growing interest casino properties are getting, it is easy to see why Mr. Hilton is taking bids.  Recently, for example, Seibu/Saison Group of Japan paid $2.2 billion for Intercontinental Hotels, and Hong Kong's New World Development Co. agreed to buy Ramada Inc.'s hotels for $540 million -- prices far higher than industry estimates of the companies' values.  Over a year ago, an unidentified Japanese investor informally offered $1 billion for one of Hilton's 50%-owned hotels, the Hawaiian Village.  Hilton also has a network of more than 270 hotels bearing its well-known name and owns New York's Waldorf-Astoria.  Some securities analysts say Hilton could fetch $120 a share or more, giving the company a value exceeding $6 billion.  A big chunk of that would fall to Barron Hilton: He owns or controls about 25% of the public company's shares.  This Barron Hilton, who senses that his properties now may bring top dollar in a world-wide auction, seems startlingly different from the man real estate entrepreneur Donald Trump dismisses merely as the inheritor of another man's achievements.  Mr. Trump, who tangled with Mr. Hilton over the 1985 sale of an Atlantic City, N.J., casino, snipes that Mr. Hilton's stewardship at Hilton "has nothing to do with merit.  It's called birthright."  History tells a different story.  In 1966, when Barron Hilton became chief executive officer, the company owned or leased 29,000 rooms and had a market value of about $60 million.  But at the end of last week, Hilton's shares had closed on the New York Stock Exchange at $105.88 -- more than twice what they were selling for when rumors of a Hilton sale began brewing in January -- and Hilton's indicated value had jumped to $5.1 billion.  The number of hotel rooms under the Hilton name at the end of last year: 95,500.  Until now, the company has been associated primarily with its flamboyant founder, Conrad Nicholson Hilton, whose name became synonymous with hotels.  "Connie" Hilton, born in New Mexico on Christmas day 1887 to a Norwegian immigrant father and a mother of German extraction, was a born deal maker.  He scraped together a $20,000 down payment on his first hotel in Cisco, Texas, in 1919, lost much of his fledgling hotel chain during the Great Depression, then built, bought and sold properties in Texas through the 1930s.  A man of enormous energy, the senior Hilton had a decided taste not just for deal making, but for dancing and pretty women, too.  He often appeared for breakfast at 8 a.m. after a night spent dancing until 2, and worked six days a week until shortly before his death in 1979.  In business, Conrad Hilton was a sharp real estate investor with an innate sense of a property's potential.  Operations, though, he preferred leaving largely to subordinates.  In his autobiography, "Be My Guest," which is still left in Hilton hotel rooms, he says he bought the Waldorf-Astoria and Chicago's Palmer House after only brief inspections, relying on instinct instead.  Conrad Hilton was married three times, once to the actress Zsa Zsa Gabor.  In contrast, the son born William Barron Hilton married his current wife, Marilyn, at age 18 after he served a World War II stint as a Navy photographer.  In 1946, he turned down his father's offer of a job at $150 a month.  Instead, he started up a fruit juice company called Vita-Pakt Citrus Products Co., in which he still holds an interest.  He became involved in an oil company and several other businesses before finally joining Hilton Hotels in the late 1950s as a vice president.  At Hilton, he has had his share of missed calls.  He helped develop the Carte Blanche credit-card company in the late 1950s, which racked up big losses and was later sold.  He also helped his father engineer the sale of Hilton's profitable international hotels to Trans World Corp. in exchange for stock.  Trans World stock soon plunged, while the hotels became quite lucrative.  But there were shrewd moves too.  In 1974, Barron Hilton freed up large chunks of capital by selling off a 50% interest in six prize hotels to Prudential Insurance Co., reducing debt but continuing to manage the properties.  This "management-leaseback" strategy has since become a standard practice in the hotel industry.  Without question, his master stroke was persuading his father and a reluctant board in the early 1970s to buy two Nevada casinos.  Today, the two properties, the Las Vegas Hilton and Flamingo Hilton, are highly profitable.  The company, meanwhile, has moved into the burgeoning Laughlin, Nev., casino market, while also enlarging its Reno, Nev., property.  A foray into the New Jersey gaming market, though, turned into disaster.  In 1983, Hilton Hotels broke ground for the biggest project in the company's history -- a planned 2,000-room casino resort in the marina area of Atlantic City.  Hilton, with its deep pockets and clean reputation, had been invited in by the governor and considered its licensing application little more than a formality.  But New Jersey gaming regulators said they questioned the "good character and integrity" of certain company officials, particularly their relationship with a Chicago lawyer that law enforcement agencies said had ties to organized crime.  Just weeks away from the casino's opening, the New Jersey Casino Control Commission stunned the company by rejecting its licensing application.  Insiders now concede a certain corporate arrogance may have alienated regulators.  "They didn't take the licensing process seriously, and they felt they were entitled to it," says one person familiar with the hearings.  "It killed them."  In the end, Hilton sold the casino resort to Mr. Trump.  When he died at age 91, Conrad Hilton believed that inherited wealth can morally corrupt one's heirs.  So he left nearly all his fortune, including the big Hilton Hotels stake, to the Conrad N. Hilton Foundation, assigning it to charity, with certain conditions.  For his part, Barron got $750,000 in stock.  "There is a natural law, a Divine law, that obliges you and me to relieve the suffering, the distressed and the destitute," the elder Mr. Hilton wrote in the 33rd and last version of his will.  "Charity is a supreme virtue, and the great channel through which the mercy of God is passed on to mankind."  But, according to Barron Hilton, his father also had worried about the company falling into outside hands.  Barron Hilton argued that a current tax law could indirectly aid a hostile takeover by forcing the foundation to sell the stock to outsiders -- something, he says, his father never intended to have happen.  Mr. Hilton claimed his father's will granted him an option to buy the shares for about $165 million, their value at the time of Mr. Hilton's death.  The claim became the source of a series of lawsuits that eventually involved the Catholic Church and several orders of nuns, which stood to benefit as charities.  On May 8, Mr. Hilton won control of the company in a settlement.  He got four million shares outright and control of an additional six million as a trustee, making his total 25%, counting his previously held shares.  The foundation retained 3.5 million shares and stands to reclaim the six million shares in the trust in 20 years or at Mr. Hilton's death, whichever comes later.  Until recently, Mr. Hilton had said he'd probably favor keeping the company under family control.  In years past he had even hinted at a leveraged buy-out.  No more.  "We have the opportunity today to make a sale of the domestic company at what appear to be very attractive values," Mr. Hilton says.  At the moment, Hilton's New York financial advisers, Shearson Lehman Hutton and Eastdil Realty Inc., are reviewing potential buyers.  Hilton says it has been swamped with calls from investors in Asia, Europe and the U.S. since Mr. Hilton told the May annual shareholders meeting that any legitimate bid would be considered.  The company, however, won't say who specifically has expressed interest in buying Hilton.  There is the possibility, too, that only part of the company will get sold off.  Hilton has said it might keep an interest in the casinos if a sale of the entire company can't be worked out easily.  For one thing, the casinos present licensing hurdles to buyers.  But, more importantly, they are cash machines.  In 1988, they churned out about half the company's total net income of $130.9 million as well as about half its revenues of $953.6 million.  Wall Street observers say current tax laws also favor a sale now.  And some old friends and colleagues speculate Mr. Hilton may simply be unable to see a future for family operation of the company after his departure.  His son David heads casino operations at the Flamingo Hilton and son Steve sits on the board of his grandfather's foundation, but none of his eight children are likely to take the company's helm.  His brother, Eric, has been content to keep a low profile while working in Hilton's international unit.  Indeed, "there's no one in that company who can take Barron's place," contends Henri Lewin, who ran Hilton's Nevada casinos for 13 years and now runs the Sands hotel-casino in Las Vegas.  "If Hilton ever makes a big mistake, it's by Barron.  If Hilton ever makes a great move, it's by Barron.  Nothing is done without him."  What will Mr. Hilton do if he doesn't retain the casino business?  He's not ready to retire, he says, and would probably end up spending much of his time with his father's foundation.  "If the entire company were to be sold, the total value of the foundation would be in the area of a billion dollars plus," he notes.  "That's something my father never would have dreamed of, probably."  As for passing along his own wealth, Mr. Hilton says, "I share my father's views on inheritance 100 percent" -- which may bode well for charity, though perhaps not for family members.  Friends hint Mr. Hilton might be ready to trade corporate pressures for recreation, especially in light of his wife's frail health.  When he's not at his estate in the posh Holmby Hills section of Los Angeles, friends say, he's happily crouching in a muddy duck blind at sun-up.  He is said to be a crack shot, despite weak vision in one eye.  Mr. Hilton's other passions include tending his 460,000-acre Nevada ranch and his own miniature Air Force -- including an acrobatic biplane, a Beechcraft Staggerwing, four gliders and a hot-air balloon.  "Barron's kind of a man's man," says Wayne M. Hoffman, former chairman of Tiger International Inc. and a longtime flying companion and friend.  "He really has an abiding love for hunting, soaring and things like that, and he really doesn't care about the social circuit or the Fortune 500."  Mr. Hilton may also use any new wealth from a sale of Hilton Hotels to dabble in other businesses or perhaps buy a ball team, associates say.  But those closest to him say his life style is unlikely to change even if a windfall does come his way.  "He doesn't need any more new planes or new houses," says John Giovenco, head of the Hilton casino operations and a longtime associate.  "I doubt he'd live any differently at all."  ---  @ Hilton's Growth  @ Hilton Hotels Corp. 1986 1988  @ Revenue (in millions): $195.6 $953.6  @ Net profit from operations  @ (in millions): $6.7 $243.7  @ Dividends per share: $.75 $.95  @ Working capital:  @ (in millions) $13.1* $279.5*  @ Long-term debt $151.5* $586.5**  @ (in millions):  @ Shareholders' equity  @ (in millions): $112.6* $814.1**  @ Shares outstanding  @ (in millions): 3.4* 48.1**  @ Total rooms: 29,000 95,488**  *At Dec. 31, 1966  **At Dec. 31, 1988  Mack Trucks Inc. said it will slash production rates nearly in half for the quarter that began July 1 because of consistently declining customer orders.  The Allentown, Pa.-based manufacturer of heavy-duty diesel trucks said third-quarter production rates at its four U.S. and Canadian manufacturing and assembly plants will be 45% lower than second-quarter rates.  An undisclosed number of the 4,600 employees at the plants will be laid off.  The company cited a 12% decline in new orders from the first quarter to the second quarter as evidence that overall demand for its products is dropping and will continue to damp its earnings.  But the firm also said that demand for its new CH600 truck exceeds capacity and that it will continue retooling its plants for production of the new model.  Bryant C. Boyd was more than a little baffled when Bavaria's Hypo-Bank tried recruiting him away from Merrill Lynch in Frankfurt last December.  After all, Mr. Boyd is an American who had always been in securities marketing, and Bayerische Hypotheken & Wechsel Bank AG had always been mostly a regional German real estate lender.  "Why are they interested in me?"  Mr. Boyd wondered.  Because, it turned out, Chairman Eberhard Martini was trying to soup up stodgy old Hypo-Bank so that it won't be brushed aside by stiff new competition after 1992.  The European Community's plan to create a single internal market is expected to tear down barriers sheltering national and regional banks from outside rivals.  Mr. Martini hired Mr. Boyd to give his bank an edge -- a U.S.-style securities retailing unit offering international investments to the wealthy.  And that is what the 37-year-old Mr. Boyd is setting up, from scratch.  "I was impressed by Mr. Martini's insistence on creating a whole new sales culture," he says.  On May 1, he became general manager of the newly minted Hypo Capital Management G.m.b.H., starting with an office, a secretary and no clients.  By November, he hopes to have opened the first two of what eventually will be 12 regional Hypo Capital offices.  By 1992, he hopes to have attracted at least a billion marks ($520 million) in customer accounts.  It's a crucial element of Mr. Martini's strategy to make Hypo-Bank -- the No. 7 bank in Germany -- a niche player strong enough to compete in the post-1992 financial services market.  Since he took over as chairman in May 1988, the 54-year-old Mr. Martini has been maneuvering to make Hypo-Bank's property-lending business pan-European and to diversify into international asset management for private and institutional investors, including pension funds.  Even Hypo-Bank executives acknowledge that it's an audacious strategy that may fail.  But the alternative is to languish as a regional spectator awaiting the auction block.  The bigger West German banks, such as Deutsche Bank AG, are buying up smaller banks, insurance companies and consulting firms, aiming to blanket Europe with full-service financial supermarkets.  The big banks of Britain, France, Italy and the Netherlands are forging cross-border alliances and shopping around for acquisitions of their own.  That leaves Hypo-Bank and other smaller institutions to try to ensure their survival by seizing on geographic or product niches.  Sal.  Oppenheim & Cie., a privately held German banking concern, is moving to expand its European operations in insurance-related financial services.  "Second-tier banks have to diversify and expand in key areas to survive, but it would be suicidal to adopt the blanket strategy of the bigger banks," says Thomas Albrecht, a bank analyst for UBS-Phillips & Drew in London.  "Customers are no longer happy with savings accounts.  They're asking for securities and unit trusts, and a bank that can't give them a full service risks losing its depositor base."  Mr. Martini says he feared that Hypo-Bank was already falling behind and needed to push ahead quickly with investment-management activities.  "There is a very great danger of us falling back into the status of a provincial bank, which we once were, or being swallowed up by somebody much larger," Mr. Martini says over a short glass of Bavarian beer.  "But this danger applies to most German banks, if not all.  We are making some changes, and the legal process of European integration makes this possible."  Hypo-Bank was chartered in 1835 by King Ludwig I of Bavaria to finance the realm's property development.  It has always prospered from extensive property financing operations, which make up two-thirds of total annual credit volume of 107.7 billion marks.  The bank was able to offer cheap financing because of the deposit base generated by its branches.  Over the past decade, Hypo-Bank's business doubled thanks to steady West German economic growth and rising demand for commercial and residential real estate in Bavaria, which has become a center for West German growth industries.  Total group assets nearly doubled to 135.2 billion marks in 1988, and profit more than doubled to 256.6 million marks.  But by last year, Hypo-Bank's assets were growing faster than its profit.  In fact, income from regular banking activities, excluding rising profit from securities trading for the bank's own account, has been declining each year since 1985.  Increasing competition from other banks has been squeezing interest rate margins.  The deterioration got management worried.  "We have to accept that the traditional banking business is becoming more difficult and will remain under pressure," Mr. Martini says.  "At the same time, never in history have so many people had so much money."  Hence the move into investment management.  While the credit market is quickly becoming saturated, securities retailing is largely underdeveloped, particularly in Germany.  Mr. Boyd's hiring was a late step in Mr. Martini's plan to seize part of the personal investing market.  First, Hypo-Bank had to gain access to an international investment fund to give potential clients a broad selection of investments.  So last summer, Mr. Martini contacted Foreign & Colonial Management Ltd., a prestigious London manager of international investment trusts.  After a year of negotiations, Hypo-Bank agreed to pay #17.5 million ($27.9 million) for a 50% stake in Foreign & Colonial.  The investment is the basis for a joint operating agreement under which the London firm is to manage mutual funds to be marketed in Europe by Hypo Capital.  Next, Mr. Martini needed a settlement bank for Hypo Capital's accounts, to be run independently of Hypo-Bank.  So last month, Hypo-Bank increased its equity holding in Maffei & Co., a small privately held Munich bank, to 75% from 25%.  Hypo-Bank also has taken a minority interest in Gesellschaft fuer Industriebeteiligungen KG, a West Berlin venture capital group controlled by Matuschka Group, a Munich financial services firm that also manages personal investments.  Meanwhile, Mr. Martini has been methodically expanding Hypo-Bank's mainstay property-finance business outside Bavaria.  Last December, Hypo-Bank paid #25 million ($40.4 million) for a 5% stake in Richard Ellis, a U.K. real estate concern, as a basis for a joint venture to develop commercial property in Europe.  Similarly, Hypo-Bank bank paid 60 million marks for a 1.7% stake in Banco Popular of Spain, with which it is setting up a property finance joint venture in Spain.  "Martini has ambitions for the bank, and he's the driving force behind redistributing emphasis," says Peter Fischer, senior vice president for securities trading at Hypo-Bank.  "In doing so, he is quickening the pace.  He also is making tough decisions."  One of them was to go outside the bank to recruit an American, the youthful Mr. Boyd, to head the investment-management operation.  Mr. Martini acknowledges that some top-level egos were bruised.  But Mr. Martini argues that to succeed, the new venture needs an aggressive, free-wheeling personality.  Putting a German banker in charge would have resulted in a conservative business culture, he says.  "This was exactly what we didn't want," Mr. Martini explains.  And rather than transfer employees and existing bank clients to the new unit, Hypo Capital is starting with an empty card index in its search for investors who can put up at least 250,000 marks.  It is raiding other concerns for financial consultants and research analysts.  Hypo Capital expects to introduce some new wrinkles to Germany.  About half of its eventual staff of 165 will be working on commission as financial consultants, a term borrowed from U.S. investment houses to differentiate them from the salaried sales force of other banks.  Mr. Boyd also plans a U.S.-style cash-management account yielding at least 4%, compared with 2.5% at ready-cash accounts of other West German banks.  And Hypo Capital's West German offices will stay open until after the close of the New York Stock Exchange, until about 10:30 p.m. local time.  That would be almost unheard-of in West Germany, where investment advisers normally stick to bankers' hours.  Anchor Glass Container Corp., Tampa, Fla., the object of what analysts say is the first unsolicited bid by a Mexican company for a U.S. concern, said it established a committee of outside directors to review Vitro S.A.'s $20-a-share tender offer.  The maker of bottles and other glass containers said it will announce its response to the bid by Aug. 23, and it asked shareholders not to act on Vitro's offer before then.  Anchor said its advisors are Morgan Stanley & Co. and the law firm Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom.  Columbia Savings & Loan Association's second-quarter earnings fell 76% to $6.4 million, or 16 cents a share, from $27.1 million, or 64 cents a share, a year ago.  "Nothing has occurred in the first six months of this year to change our belief that it would be difficult to achieve 1989 earnings in excess of what Columbia earned in 1988," said Thomas Spiegel, the Beverly Hills, Calif., company's chairman and chief executive officer.  Columbia increased its provision for losses on investment securities and loans during the quarter to $20 million from $16.5 million.  For the six-months, Columbia raised its loan-loss provision to $39.1 million from $34 million.  Earnings in the six months fell 56% to $14.3 million, or 36 cents a share, from $32.4 million, or 77 cents a share.  The savings institution said it raised general loss reserves to $120.5 million and has capital funds of $795.8 million supporting assets of $13.1 billion.  It said it lent out about $700 million during the period, more than double the amount of a year ago.  Smith Corona Corp., New Canaan, Conn., said it plans to cut its inventories and work force in light of a general softening of retail demand.  The company makes portable electronic typewriters and personal word processors and markets office supplies, including file folders and customized printed products.  Smith Corona said it will reduce its work force by 10%, or 450, at its Cortland, N.Y., and Singapore plants, with the layoffs to begin by Aug. 28.  Socanav Inc. and its financial backer, the Quebec government's pension fund agency, radically restructured their bid for Steinberg Inc., signaling their determination to acquire control of the Montreal real estate and food retailing concern.  According to an amended offering circular, the Quebec agency, Caisse de Depot et Placement, will lend Socanav, if needed, as much as 1.25 billion Canadian dollars (US$1.04 billion), with interest payable only at the end of five years, to acquire any shares tendered to Socanav's offer for Steinberg.  In return for this unprecedented loan, which would be by far the largest corporate investment in the Caisse de Depot portfolio, the agency gets a veto over major decisions by Socanav, its subsidiary making the offer and Steinberg.  Socanav, a small Montreal shipping concern, and Caisse de Depot also altered other aspects of their agreement, apparently in response to a request for an injunction blocking Socanav's offer filed by rival bidder, Oxdon Investments Inc. of Toronto, which is owned by three companies, including Unicorp Canada Corp.  The amount Socanav is offering Steinberg holders, C$75 a common share and C$51 a Class A share, remains unchanged.  In a typically curt statement Thursday, Socanav said its C$1.33 billion offer for Steinberg wasn't any longer conditioned on holders' tendering at least 90% of each class of Steinberg shares, but it didn't mention the other changes disclosed in the offering circular.  Socanav and Caisse de Depot officials wouldn't comment on the circular.  Oxdon officials couldn't be reached.  Backed by the financial muscle of Caisse de Depot, which manages about C$32 billion in assets, Socanav seems wellplaced to outlast Oxdon in any extended battle for control of Steinberg.  In its amended circular, Socanav said that if it fails to acquire enough shares to take Steinberg private, it will seek to elect a majority of Steinberg's board.  Socanav will then "explore" ways of transferring the debt incurred in acquiring Steinberg stock onto Steinberg's books and "pursue all reasonable methods" of selling Steinberg's real estate assets to Caisse de Depot for a minimum C$820 million, Socanov's amended circular said.  As of Friday, about 71% of Steinberg's nonvoting Class A shares and none of Steinberg's common had been tendered to Oxdon's C$1.315 billion tender offer for all the shares it doesn't already own.  About 59.5% of Steinberg common and 12% of Steinberg Class A stock had been pledged or tendered to Socanav, including a 52% block of common that Socanav can acquire from a Steinberg family group under an exclusive option agreement.  However, despite Socanav's lock on a majority of Steinberg's voting shares, under securities regulations a bidder needs 66.6% of each class of shares to take a company private.  By taking Steinberg private, Socanav could dispose of Steinberg assets at will and merge the concern with the Socanav subsidiary making the bid, transferring debt onto Steinberg's books.  If Oxdon takes up and pays for the 71% of Steinberg Class A tendered to its bid, it can force Socanav to attempt its planned restructuring through control of the Steinberg board, a much longer and more complicated process.  Separately Friday, Oxdon extended its bid to 1 a.m. PST Aug. 22, just a few hours before Socanav's offer expires.  Steinberg said its board will meet today to discuss the amendments to the two bids and issue a new directors' circular.  In Toronto Stock Exchange trading Friday, Steinberg Class A shares closed at C$50.50, up 50 Canadian cents.  London share prices closed higher Friday after a late rally that was inspired by data pointing to the continued slowing of the U.S. economy.  In Tokyo, stocks finished off from early highs in thin dealings Friday.  The London market also had an early flurry of activity after the industrial conglomerate BTR disclosed that U.S. takeover specialist Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. has applied to U.S. regulators to buy as much as 15% of the company's stock.  The U.S. July producer price index and retail sales reports prompted a strong rally in U.S. stocks and bonds, though Wall Street had started dropping from its early peaks toward the close of trading in London.  British traders said that buying activity was patchy through the day, and they noted modest amounts of selling pressure in many of the leading stocks.  Despite the late rally, nearly half the Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100 stocks were showing price losses at the close.  Traders said the market may drift back during the coming three-week August trading account, which started Friday.  The extended August account is traditionally one of the quietest of the year.  The 100-share index closed 6.9 points higher at 2354.2, just short of the day's peak of 2354.9, which came a minute before the close.  The Financial Times 30-share index closed 8.2 points higher at 1969.6.  Volume was a moderate 605.8 million shares, up from 574.5 million shares on Thursday.  BTR shares closed 36 pence (58 cents) higher at 455 pence ($7.37) in the wake of news of the Kohlberg Kravis filing, which was subsequently confirmed in a brief statement by the New York corporate financiers.  But the shares ended well below their high for the day of 486 pence, up 65, and analysts said the market remained uncertain about the significance of Kohlberg Kravis's move.  Some 33 million BTR shares were traded by the close.  Other actively traded stocks included Allied-Lyons, which closed 9 pence higher at 537, and Asda Group, which ended 3 pence higher at 212, with 6.5 million shares changing hands.  Both stocks have attracted bid speculation in recent months.  British Petroleum rose 3.5 pence to 299.5 with 13 million shares traded.  Dealers said the shares responded to a positive meeting with analysts about the company's secondquarter earnings, which were released Thursday.  Meanwhile, in Tokyo, the market lacked energy as many institutional investors and traders stayed away in the middle of Japan's "Obon" summer holiday season.  The Nikkei average of 225 issues fell 6.84 points to 34712.96.  The index fell 139.47 points Thursday.  Volume on the first section was estimated at 500 million shares, down from 672.99 million shares Thursday.  Declining issues outnumbered advancers 534 to 368, with 193 issues unchanged.  Midway through the morning session Monday in Tokyo, the Nikkei index had dropped 78.97 points, to 34633.99.  Share prices generally softened Friday in the face of fewer buy orders.  This was especially true of large capitalization issues like steels, in which selling orders by far outnumbered buying orders, traders said.  Steel stocks have declined this week as expectations of lower interest rates have faded.  They sustained more losses Friday as investors sold them off to buy higher-priced issues, according to observers.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which fell 3.78 points Thursday, was down 1.93 points at 2638.20.  Daily volume was subdued throughout the week, with a low of 300 million shares traded Monday and a high of 650 million reached Thursday.  Traders blamed the summer holidays and an absence of viable themes to encourage overall buying interest.  The Nikkei managed to stay at a relatively high level despite low volume because of index buying and active trading of high-priced stocks, which made substantial gains throughout the week, traders said.  The boost was sparked by Nintendo, which announced a 1-for-2 gratis distribution, and a rally in Sony that spilled over into related high-tech issues.  Lack of other market trading themes also helped maintain the popularity of high-priced issues for an unusually long period.  One trader noted that such sector rallies usually last for three or four sessions at most.  On Friday, Nintendo and Sony continued to score gains, but some high-priced issues ended flat or lower as investors took profits, traders said.  Nintendo gained 400 yen ($2.86) to 18,600 yen ($133.19).  Sony was up 160 yen to 8,840, Fuji Photo Film rose 140 yen to 4,730 and Fanuc gained 30 yen to 6,970.  But Kyocera dropped 20 yen to 6,680, and Seven-Eleven fell 50 yen to 7,600.  Friday's losers included housing issues.  Daiwa House fell 20 yen to 2,700, Sekisui House dropped 30 yen to 2,230 and Misawa Homes was down 30 yen to 2,670 yen.  In Taipei Friday, renewed concern about investigations of investment firms that illegally solicited funds from investors again caused the local stock market to plummet, pushing the Weighted Index down 3.57%.  All eight market sectors registered major declines, with food, cement and paper hit the hardest.  In other Asian and Pacific trading, share prices closed lower in Seoul and Manila, mixed in Hong Kong and Singapore, higher in Sydney and steady in Wellington.  In Frankfurt, an early rally, spurred initially by strong interest in chemical stocks, gave into profit-taking that sent stocks mixed to lower.  Brussels stock prices rose to a record in moderately active trading, capping two weeks of uninterrupted growth.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Amsterdam and Zurich, lower in Paris and Stockholm, and mixed in Milan.  South African gold stocks closed lower.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 10 Aug 9 Year  @ U.S. ................ 320.9 319.7 + 25.3  @ Britain ............. 709.3 713.3 + 29.9  @ Canada .............. 437.4 435.8 + 19.1  @ Japan ............... 1561.6 1564.7 + 9.9  @ France .............. 524.4 524.6 + 18.5  @ Germany ............. 253.4 251.8 + 21.9  @ Hong Kong ........... 1945.7 1961.5 - 4.1  @ Switzerland ......... 235.9 237.1 + 36.4  @ Australia ........... 337.9 341.3 + 16.4  @ World index ......... 548.7 547.6 + 11.0  LELAND'S PLANE WAS FOUND and all aboard were reported killed in a crash.  Search crews discovered the charred wreckage of the aircraft on a mountainside in southwestern Ethiopia, six days after it disappeared on a flight from Addis Ababa.  All 16 people aboard the plane, including the Democratic congressman from Texas, were believed dead.  A U.S. Embassy spokesman said 12 bodies initially were found.  The plane, which a Pentagon official said had "basically disintegrated," crashed about 100 miles northwest of its destination, a refugee camp near the border with Sudan.  The cause of the crash wasn't known.  Bush expressed sadness over the deaths.  Eight other Americans were traveling with Leland, who was examining famine-relief efforts in Africa.  ---  BATTLES RAGED between Christian and Syrian forces in and around Beirut.  Christian troops thwarted a Syrian-led ground assault on a garrison in the mountains overlooking Beirut as artillery attacks in the Lebanese capital killed at least 19 people and trapped scores more in burning buildings.  Authorities said hospitals overflowed with civilian casualties from four days of bombardments.  More than 640 people have been killed since March, when the latest round of sectarian fighting erupted in the 14-year-old civil war.  France proposed an international effort to end the conflict in Lebanon, saying Saturday it would send envoys to Damascus, Moscow and Washington.  ---  The space shuttle Columbia landed in California's Mojave Desert, completing a five-day mission to deploy a spy satellite.  The five astronauts reportedly also conducted tests for a space-based anti-missile system.  A spokesman at Edwards Air Force Base said the spacecraft sustained little damage to its protective tiles.  The Voyager 2 space probe discovered two partial rings orbiting the planet Neptune.  NASA said Friday that the "ring arcs" are quite different than the completed rings that encircle Saturn and Uranus.  ---  China has ordered this year's college graduates to work for as long as two years before pursuing further studies.  The Beijing government's rules, unveiled Saturday in an official report, appeared to be an attempt to prevent a rekindling of this spring's crushed student-led, pro-democracy movement.  ---  West Germany will close its embassy in Budapest today.  Bonn's foreign ministry said the embassy's staff is "totally exhausted" from trying to assist hundreds of East German refugees seeking exit visas to the West.  The West German diplomatic mission in East Berlin was closed indefinitely last Tuesday.  ---  Thousands of Irish nationalists marched through Roman Catholic neighborhoods in Belfast and expressed support for the Irish Republican Army.  The protest march by the republican forces, marking the 20th anniversary of the deployment of British troops in Northern Ireland, followed a big Protestant parade Saturday in Londonderry.  ---  Harvard researchers claimed "the first apparent vaccine protection against AIDS virus infection" in a small test involving rhesus monkeys.  But the scientists warned that the success against the disease was achieved under laboratory conditions, and that it would be premature to apply their findings to humans.  ---  Lucas was named by Attorney General Thornburgh to head a Justice Department office that coordinates relations with state and local groups and civil-rights organizations.  The post doesn't require Senate confirmation.  The Senate Judiciary Committee last month rejected Lucas's nomination to be the nation's top civil-rights enforcer.  ---  The Israeli army refused to accept that two soldiers taken captive in Lebanon have been killed.  London's Sunday Times reported that the pair have been dead for more than three years.  Over the weekend, an influential Shiite cleric said the hostage issue would meet a "rational solution," but he warned it could take a long time.  ---  South Africa's foreign minister said Education Minister de Klerk, the ruling party leader, would meet Aug. 28 with Zambian President Kaunda despite objections from Botha.  The 73-year-old president, who is to step down after parliamentary elections Sept. 6, said Friday he hadn't been consulted about de Klerk's planned meeting.  ---  Solidarity welcomed Prime Minister Kiszczak's offer of negotiations to break Poland's political impasse, but again refused to join a Communist-led government.  Walesa, meanwhile, prepared for talks today with two Communist-allied parties about formation of a non-Communist coalition.  ---  About 50,000 Serbs defied authorities in Yugoslavia's central republic of Bosnia and staged a rally in support of their leader, Slobodan Milosevic.  Bosnia's predominantly Moslem leadership views Milosevic as a potential strongman and has accused him of attempting to topple his opponents.  --- Payne Stewart won the 71st PGA Championship by one stroke at Kemper Lakes Golf Course in Hawthorn Woods, Ill.  American Business Computers Corp. said it expects to report a loss of about $500,000 for the first quarter, ended July 31, compared with a profit of $52,000 a year earlier.  The company said revenue would be down by 40% from the year-earlier $1.1 million.  The company attributed the drop to lower revenue from its soft-drink dispensing system.  Poor Mandy Patinkin.  Just a few short years after surmounting a phobia about singing in public, he steps out to become the musical theater's most emergent, if most idiosyncratic, leading man.  Yet as luck would have it, at the same time Mr. Patinkin has become a running joke both at the essential theater revue "Forbidden Broadway" and on TV's popular "Late Night With David Letterman."  Trouble is, the mockery he inspires does not look like good-natured swiping at an established talent.  Instead, it reflects a troublesome flaw in Mr. Patinkin's art, a flaw so noticeable that it may soon repel audiences (who still love him, if the crowd at his current concert engagement at the Helen Hayes Theater can be used as an indicator) as it is now repelling long-time Mandy watchers.  Gerard Alessandrini's "Forbidden Broadway" has recently added a skit in which a Patinkin impersonator (Jeff Lyons, new to the company) sings a song to the tune of a Patinkin favorite, "Somewhere Over the Rainbow."  Mr. Alessandrini has analyzed Mr. Patinkin's delivery and renamed the song "Somewhat Over Indulgent."  Meanwhile, late last month David Letterman invited Mr. Patinkin to appear on his talk show, the show that sets a standard in cynical hip.  Why Mr. Letterman did this is anyone's guess, since he has a noticeable aversion to anything theatrical.  Mr. Patinkin, on the other hand, is known for a highly charged theatrical sensibility that he has recently combined with a tendency to go over the top when interpreting a lyric for an audience.  His impulse to overexplain a song can seem alternately patronizing, forced or just plain goony.  Mr. Letterman innocently (I am assured by one of the "Late Night" writers that it was innocent) urged Mr. Patinkin to sing -- what else? -- "Over the Rainbow."  An unrehearsed and ill at ease Mr. Patinkin led the startled musical director, Paul Shaffer, through the song's little known verse and into the part that everyone knows, starting with the lyric "somewhere over the rainbow."  Then Mr. Patinkin proceeded to sing a full, if hurried, version of the song, while a horrified Mr. Letterman watched as this weirdly intense guest took up three or four minutes instead of the 60 seconds he had anticipated.  He didn't know that Mr. Patinkin takes this singing thing very, very seriously.  So, after having invited Mr. Patinkin to sing, Mr. Letterman ridiculed him for weeks afterward for having sung.  What is it about Mandy Patinkin that invites ridicule?  In his concert show he displays an art that is at times brilliant, at times problematic, and almost always woefully misguided.  As it turns out, "Over the Rainbow," by Harold Arlen and E.Y. Harburg, is one of his better numbers, as is Stephen Sondheim's "Anyone Can Whistle," Arthur Johnston and Johnny Burke's "Pennies From Heaven," and the nonsense song "Doodle Doo Doo" by Art Kassel and Mel Stitzel.  These songs have something in common: They are artfully straightforward, and they give the singer little room for intricate rationalizations and embarrassing emoting.  For these lovely songs, Mr. Patinkin uses his pure, high tenor with an almost devotional restraint, and he tenderly plucks out the unabashed love of melody that the composers poured into them.  But when he sings another seemingly simple number, Harry Warren and Johnny Mercer's "On the Atchison, Topeka and the Santa Fe," his body betrays him.  Mr. Patinkin sits on a chair and suddenly his limbs -- as if of their own accord -- begin to imitate the movement of a chugging train wheel, pitching rhythmically up and down, forward and back.  It looks like a spasmodic and involuntary action.  This is not a train as it might be rendered by a polished showman or choreographer like, say, Tommy Tune, with razzmatazz in a stylish dance step.  This is an anguished, internalized train -- the kind an acting student might attempt in a primitive exercise.  This is the kind of train that no audience really wants to see, a train in pain.  And woe to the song that appears to be simple but is really a minefield of subtext and subtlety.  "No More" from Mr. Sondheim's "Into the Woods" is such a song.  In the context of the musical, a father and a son sing this intricate but stylistically simple lyric.  The son has just learned that his wife is dead, and in his grief he feels ready to surrender his own life, yearning only for "No more feelings/Time to shut the door/ Just-no more."  The father answers with puzzling and ultimately subversive advice -- he being a man who has long ago shut the door, having absolved himself of any responsibility when he deserted his family to wander aimlessly through, I guess, the woods.  Mr. Patinkin sings both parts.  In his attempt to make clear the meaning of the song, he employs the patronizing gestures of a schoolteacher trying to teach Schopenhauer to a kindergarten class.  He chops the air with his hands, as if making a point in a lesson plan (a bad acting habit that "Forbidden Broadway" parodies).  He sits on a chair and virtually explains the lyric to the audience.  Then, in the emotional climax, he squinches up his face in agony and closes his eyes tight.  He so fills the song with his explanation and his anger that he crowds it, and I dare any listener to experience his own response.  Mr. Patinkin is the antithesis of a great pop singer like Mel Torme, a singer who never invades and clarifies the meaning of a song; when Mr. Torme sings, he leaves room enough so that anyone is free to interpret a lyric.  Mr. Patinkin needs a director, and badly.  His instincts are too often wrong.  Won't someone out there save him from himself?  Royce Value Trust Inc., a New York-based closed-end investment company, said it's offering to sell 484,948 shares to stockholders through a rights offering that would raise about $4.5 million.  Holders of record Aug. 22 will be issued one right for each Royce common share.  The rights will entitle stockholders to acquire new one share for 25 rights.  Per-share cost will be the lower of 96% of the closing price on Sept. 27 or $9.375.  The company, which hasn't previously sold rights to raise funds, said it will use sale proceeds to continue investing in small businesses with capital of $50 million to $300 million.  It has 12.1 million shares outstanding.  Owens-Corning Fiberglas Corp. said it has agreed to acquire full ownership of its Fiberglas Canada affiliate by purchasing PPG Industries Inc.'s 50% interest in the company's voting equity for about $200 million.  Owens-Corning will record a one-time charge of $10 million in the third quarter of 1989 in connection with the transaction.  Upon completion of the transaction, Fiberglas Canada will be operated as a unit of Toledo, Ohio-based Owens-Corning.  Fiberglas Canada is Canada's largest producer of glass fiber insulation and reinforcement, with 1988 profit of $35 million on sales of $395 million.  Royal Trustco Ltd. said it plans to issue seven million preferred shares in two series at 25 Canadian dollars (US$21.35) a share, or a total of C$175 million (US$149.4 million).  The trust concern said proceeds would be added to existing capital and may be used to help finance future acquisitions.  A trust concern is similar to a U.S. thrift.  The planned issues, which are expected to close Sept. 6, include five million Series Q preferred shares and two million Series R preferred shares.  The Series Q non-cumulative, perpetual preferred shares would pay quarterly dividends at 9% annually, or at a rate equal to 1.35 times the regular dividend on Royal Trustco's common shares, which currently pay 18.5 Canadian cents a quarter.  Issue underwriters include RBC Dominion Securities Inc., Gordon Capital Corp., Wood Gundy Inc., Burns Fry Ltd., Nesbitt Thomson Deacon Inc., ScotiaMcLeod Ltd., and Toronto-Dominion Securities Inc.  All are Toronto-based securities dealers.  Royal Trustco said the dividend rate on the non-cumulative, redeemable Series R shares would be similar to the Series Q shares, but wouldn't exceed 10% annually.  Both the Series Q shares and the Series R shares will be redeemable, after five years, at Royal Trustco's option.  The issue of Series R shares will be underwritten by Toronto-based Trilon Securities Corp.  Jacobs Engineering Group Inc., Pasadena Calif., said it was withdrawing its proposed offering of $35 million of convertible subordinated debentures.  The international engineering firm also said it wasn't aware of any "adverse developments affecting the company to justify the current market activity" in its common stock.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Jacobs closed at $24.125, up $1.875, on volume of 25,400 shares.  With a backlog of $962,000,000, the company said, "it would not be in the best interest of its current shareholders to go ahead with the offering."  Western Capital Investment Corp., a thrift-holding company, said it had a second-quarter net loss of $24.8 million, largely because of charges taken in response to the new federal thrift legislation.  For the year-earlier quarter the parent of Bank Western, a federal savings bank, reported net income of $212,000, or three cents a share.  The charges of $24.2 million represent additions to Western Capital's loan-loss provisions, set aside to counter further erosion of the weakened Colorado real estate market, a spokesman said.  Western Capital expects a depression of real estate values as the new thrift legislation prompts sales of repossessed real estate held by thrift regulators, he said.  For the first six months, Western Capital posted a net loss of $26 million, compared with year-earlier net income of $539,000, or six cents a share.  Alpha 1 Biomedicals Inc. will run out of operating funds by the end of 1989 unless it receives external financing of some kind, the Washington, D.C., pharmaceutical research concern said at its annual meeting.  "We are a research and development company, and we do not have a sales stream," said R.J. Lanham, an Alpha 1 spokesman.  For the first quarter ended June 30, the company had a loss of $198,681 on revenue of only $17,221.  Mr. Lanham said the company is looking for potential sources of funds but doesn't know if it will be successful.  As for a merger with a stronger firm, Mr. Lanham said, "I don't believe that's in the cards."  J.J. Finkelstein, Alpha 1's president and chief executive, said he will resign those positions when his contract expires in December to pursue other opportunities.  The company hopes to find a replacement in early fall.  Mr. Finkelstein will remain as vice chairman of the board.  USAir Group Inc., Arlington, Va., said July traffic at USAir and Piedmont Airlines rose 4.9% and 14%, respectively, from a year earlier.  Piedmont's operations were merged into the company's USAir unit Aug. 5.  USAir's traffic rose to 1.7 billion revenue passenger miles from 1.62 billion.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  The airline's load factor, or the percentage of available seats occupied, rose to 67.6% from 63.1%.  Piedmont's July traffic rose to 1.36 billion revenue passenger miles from 1.2 billion.  Its load factor fell to 61.7% from 63.1%.  For the first seven months of this year, USAir's traffic rose 16% to 11.06 billion revenue passenger miles from 9.51 billion; its load factor rose to 63.2% from 62.1%.  Piedmont's traffic increased 14% to 8.57 billion revenue passenger miles from 7.53 billion; its load factor dropped to 58.8% from 59.9%.  Global central banks may face more of a headache than a summer break with the dollar's rejuvenation.  Major monetary nations, aided by declining U.S. interest rates and a heavy round of dollar profit-taking, had been having a respite in their battle against the stronger dollar.  But a favorable outlook for the U.S. economy and, until Friday at least, robust U.S. stock and bond markets have been boosting the dollar's prospects.  That could give central banks little chance for rest in battling the currency's rise.  To rein in the dollar's rally, central banks may have to "really gang up" with concerted sales, says Mike Malpede, a senior currency analyst at Refco Inc. in Chicago.  Friday's concerted intervention, the first since mid-June, was far from a success.  Despite a barrage of dollar sales -- from the U.S., Canada and a host of European nations -- the dollar was at 1.9405 marks and 141.85 yen in late New York trading, up sharply from 1.9055 marks and 139.85 yen late Thursday.  In Tokyo Monday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 141.85 yen, up sharply from Friday's Tokyo close of 140.10 yen.  The dollar, above the key resistance point of 1.9 marks and poised for further gains, is close to the 2.0 mark resistance level that was particularly problematic for central banks early this summer.  Once the dollar topped 2.0 marks, it went on to two-year peaks of 2.0475 marks and 151.85 yen June 15 before running out of steam.  It's widely thought that major industrial nations are uncomfortable with the dollar above 1.9 marks and 140 yen because a stronger U.S. currency can disturb the correction of trade imbalances.  Inflationary pressures, too, can increase overseas when dollar-priced imports become more expensive.  On Friday, central banks "tested the waters to see how strong the dollar demand is," and they found out that it's pretty substantial, says Mr. Malpede.  Christiane Mandell, a trader at Security Pacific Merchant Bank in Los Angeles, agrees.  "There seems to be good, strong, legitimate dollar demand," she says, adding that the dollar has potential to test resistance around 1.96 marks in coming days.  "We'll keep pushing at the upside.  I think we have another two pfennigs on the upside" before the dollar meets resistance followed by consolidation, Ms. Mandell predicted.  A less bearish outlook for U.S. interest rates is the main force behind the rising dollar, analysts say.  While lower U.S. rates hurt the dollar recently, buying is being revived by speculation the Federal Reserve will ease monetary policy reluctantly to foster an economy with relatively low inflation and moderate growth -- the "soft landing" to which economists refer.  Lower rates are generally negative for the dollar because of diminished attractiveness of dollar-denominated securities.  But lower rates are also a key element in the soft landing view that has attracted investors to U.S. financial markets this year.  And U.S. economic data "are painting a nice, soft landing-type of scenario for the economy," says Ms. Mandell of Security Pacific.  Friday's data seem to support the soft landing picture.  The producer-price index fell 0.4% in July, the largest decline in three years, while July retail sales rose 0.9%.  Some economists expect July's consumer price index, due Friday, to have risen 0.3%.  The Fed apparently is succeeding in fine-tuning the economy, and "the bottom line is that the U.S. is seen as a good investment environment," says Mr. Malpede.  He adds that there probably will be continued demand for U.S. stocks, bonds and, consequently, dollars.  Some stock market watchers say the Dow Jones Industrial Average, which flirted with a record high last week, probably will continue to climb.  And some bond market players say U.S. bonds still have potential for more gains as well.  Analysts say bullishness about the U.S. economy could intensify if the merchandise trade data, due Thursday, are favorable.  The trade deficit is estimated to have narrowed to $9.5 billion in June from $10.2 billion in May, according to an early survey of economists by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report.  News of a deficit of less than $10 billion could cause another dollar-buying spree, traders say.  But while the dollar is strengthening, another decisive move above 2.0 marks isn't seen as likely soon because of the downward bias in U.S. rates and anticipated central bank intervention.  Central banks may be quick to extinguish dollar rallies, fearing it won't take much buying to build momentum in the thin summer markets.  "The dollar will not go up forever.  It's still in a trading range with bullish undertones" and should fluctuate between 1.8 and 2.0 marks in the next few months, asserts Diego Giurleo, senior Treasury bond manager at the Royal Bank of Canada.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York Friday, gold for current delivery settled at $365.20 an ounce, down $2.10.  Estimated volume was a moderate 4.2 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Monday, gold was quoted at $364.24 an ounce.  Sierracin Corp. reported second-quarter net income fell to $370,000, or 11 cents a share, from $521,000, or 15 cents a share, a year earlier.  The high-technology products company attributed the 29% drop to greater provisions for excess and obsolete inventories, cost overruns on fixed-price development contracts and higher material costs.  Revenue climbed less than 1% to $20.4 million from $20.3 million.  For the six months, Sierracin posted net of $845,000, or 25 cents a share, down from $951,000, or 28 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue increased 3.7% to $40.9 million from $39.5 million.  International Telecharge Inc., which previously projected a "moderate" quarterly loss, said it had an $8.7 million net loss for the second quarter.  The provider of long-distance telephone services attributed the final figure to write-downs and a bigger-than-expected operating loss, which it blamed on slow conversion of public pay phones to the company's network by regional telephone companies.  International Telecharge has projected that 200,000 to 250,000 public pay phones will be converted to its operator-assisted long-distance service.  To date, only 80,000 have been converted, although the company said the number is still increasing.  In addition to the operating loss, the company wrote down inventories of a discontinued product line by $1.2 million and wrote down its receivables by $2.8 million.  In June, the company said it would take a $2 million reserve for doubtful accounts to reflect its decision to stop trying to collect on 1988 phone calls made by customers of small independent telephone companies.  After further review, International Telecharge said it decided to increase the charge to $2.8 million.  In the year-earlier second quarter, International Telecharge had net income of $3.2 million, or 18 cents a share.  Revenue for the latest quarter was $66.6 million, up 54% from $43.3 million.  For the six months, the company had a net loss of $8.2 million after net of $6 million, or 33 cents a share, in the 1988 period.  Revenue was up 69% to $128.5 million from $76.2 million.  The growing British trend toward leveraged buy-outs hit a snag, as underwriters for U.K. retailer Magnet PLC shelved plans to sell #281.2 million ($455.3 million) in debt arising from a Magnet buy-out.  The retreat, confirmed yesterday by lead Magnet underwriter Bankers Trust Co., caps a series of troubled buy-outs in British retailing.  Rising interest rates have hit retail sales here, unsettling potential investors.  "Market conditions aren't right for this sector," a Bankers Trust spokesman said, explaining the decision to withdraw the Magnet debt-syndication plan.  When conditions improve, he added, the plan will be revived.  The decision leaves New York-based Bankers Trust and its eight underwriting partners holding far more Magnet debt than they had planned.  The underwriters have already provided Magnet's management with #562.5 million to complete its highly leveraged, #629 million buy-out of the home-improvement chain.  To reduce their own exposure, the underwriters had planned on marketing half that high-yielding debt in a syndicated offering.  The snag highlights the growing pains of Europe's leveraged buy-out business.  In such a transaction, an investor group finances its purchase of a company with heavy borrowings, often paid by selling company assets afterward.  Recently, buyout attempts have multiplied in Britain.  The biggest, unveiled last month, is a #13.35 billion leveraged bid for conglomerate B.A.T Industries PLC by financier Sir James Goldsmith and colleagues.  Bankers Trust, which also advises Sir James's group, denied the Magnet problem would affect the B.A.T or other buy-out attempts.  Instead, the Bankers Trust spokesman said, the Magnet snag reflects problems unique to Britain's slowing retail sector.  For instance, on Friday U.K. retailer Ward White PLC said it failed to organize its own leveraged buy-out.  The company, under attack from a #900 million bid by Britain's Boots Co., had been hunting financing for a higher counterbid.  But, Ward White said, "in the current state of the debt markets it isn't possible to create leveraged proposals."  Earlier this month, British furniture chain MFI Group said deteriorating sales are forcing it to refinance some debt left over from its own 1987 management buy-out.  With high interest rates cooling Britain's former retailing boom, "everyone's being much more cautious" about buying risky, high-yielding debt securities in U.K. shopkeepers, said analyst Joan D'Olier of London-based County NatWest Securities Ltd.  She added that the Magnet underwriters may have to wait until at least next year for the British retail market to recover sufficiently for a relaunched Magnet debt offering.  U.S. Banknote Co. agreed to extend to Aug. 24 its offer for International Banknote Co. to allow additional time to discuss the merger with the Justice Department's Antitrust Division.  U.S. Banknote also said the companies amended their merger agreement.  Under the new terms, either company can terminate the agreement if it isn't completed by the closing date.  U.S. Banknote added that the closing date could be extended to as late as Oct. 15 to allow it to continue talks with the Antitrust Division and to complete financing arrangements.  U.S. Banknote offered $7 a share, or $126 million, for up to 14.9 million or 78.6% of International Banknote's shares outstanding.  As of Friday, the previous closing date, about 14.0 million or 73.5% of the shares outstanding had been tendered.  U.S. Banknote and International Banknote are both based in New York and both print stock certificates and currencies.  Chevron Corp., San Francisco, said it agreed to acquire Husky Oil Ltd.'s 17.5% interest in the Canadian Beaufort Sea's largest oil field, as well as the Calgary, Alberta, company's interests in other properties in that area, in a transaction valued at more than $120 million.  Chevron, through its Chevron Canada Resources Ltd. subsidiary, will buy Husky's interest in the Amauligak oil field and various interests in about 800,000 acres of oil and gas properties.  Amauligak, discovered in 1984, contains recoverable reserves of more than 500 million barrels of oil and two trillion cubic feet of gas.  The Canadian Beaufort Sea is believed to contain four to five times the 1.75 billion barrels of oil and 12 trillion cubic feet of gas already established there, Chevron said.  American Pacific Corp., its bottom line ravaged when its rocket-fuel facility blew up last year, says sales and profits are set to blast off again.  Last month, the company began deliveries from a new chemicals plant, and it is expecting net income for the fiscal-fourth quarter to leap to about $1.3 million, or 27 cents a share, from a year-ago loss of $182,000.  The plant should be completed in September.  "There were a lot of people," says C. Keith Rooker, American Pacific's executive vice president, "who didn't think we could start up this quickly."  The new plant, in Iron County, Utah, makes ammonium perchlorate, a chemical used in solid-rocket propellants.  It is an oxidizing agent, which, when combined with fuel, creates an atomosphere in which combustion can occur.  "It's why rockets can go in outer space or missiles can go under water" where there is no air, Mr. Rooker says.  It is also what makes American Pacific go.  Though company officials are confident their pollution-control equipment and real-estate arms are poised for growth, American Pacific anticipates $1 million in net, or nearly 77% of its profit, will be derived from the ammonium-perchlorate business in the quarter ending Sept. 30.  The sector will account for about $7 million of the corporation's $9 million in revenue.  In the prior-year period, with its chemicals plant destroyed, sales were only $500,000.  The May 4, 1988, explosion in Henderson, Nev., was massive, producing a five-square-mile toxic cloud.  Buildings shook 10 miles away in Las Vegas.  The company contends the accident was triggered by a natural-gas leak in a high-pressure line that ran under the site, though the exact cause is the subject of litigation.  Reverberations were felt on Wall Street, too.  Midday on May 4, Mr. Rooker called his wife to tell her the company's stock hit a record high of $8.50 in over-the-counter trading.  Five minutes later, his secretary came in to tell him there was a fire and he had better exit the plant.  "Twenty minutes after that," he says, "there was no plant."  Boom meant bust.  The company's shares dropped below $3 in a matter of hours.  The explosion also spelled trouble for the nation's rocket industry.  Only one other company, Kerr-McGee Corp., makes ammonium perchlorate.  In addition, American Pacific supplies some top-flight programs for the Pentagon and the National Aeronautics and Space Administration.  Among them: the space shuttle, the Titan rocket, the North Atlantic Treaty Organization's multiple-launch rocket system and the Delta launch vehicle.  "That disaster eliminated approximately one-half of the nation's ammonium perchlorate capacity thus creating . . . an emergency," says Fred D. Gibson Jr., American Pacific chairman.  "It was imperative that we bring the new plant on stream on an expedited, fast-track basis."  The government helped.  In an agreement worked out with federal authorities and Thiokol Corp., which makes the shuttle's rocket motor, American Pacific will be allowed -- through sales of ammonium perchlorate -- to recoup the $92 million it invested in the Iron County plant.  A surcharge has been added to the chemical's price, boosting it to roughly $2.50 a pound from the 85 cents a pound it fetched before the Henderson plant was destroyed.  Moreover, the government has guaranteed it will support a production level at the new facility of at least 20 million pounds of ammonium perchlorate a year.  "And we expect to do better than that," Mr. Rooker asserts.  The company's turnaround is capturing the attention of investors.  During the past few months, American Pacific's shares have rebounded, closing Friday at $10.875 each, unchanged.  Says Mr. Rooker, "We're looking forward to the next few years."  Atek Metals Center Inc. said an investigation disclosed that a former employee embezzled about $2 million from the metals concern between May 1980 and May 1989.  About $295,000 of that was embezzled in 1989, the company said.  It also said it had reached a settlement providing recovery of $600,000 from the former employee and said a suit filed against her has been dismissed.  Atek earlier said it filed suit against Jeanetta Ponchot, a former controller of its metals distribution group, claiming she had embezzled at least $700,000.  The metals concern said it took a charge of $169,500 during the nine months ended June 30 to cover the remaining loss.  Ms. Ponchot couldn't be reached for comment.  The Commerce Department ruled that Japanese manufacturers are exporting transfer presses to the U.S. at prices that violate the U.S. anti-dumping act.  Transfer presses are custom-built, metal-forming machine tools.  The agency said in a preliminary decision that imports of the presses supplied by Komatsu Ltd. were priced 14.52% below "fair-value," while transfer presses supplied by Awa Engineering Ltd. had a "dumping price margin" of 5.89%.  For all other Japanese manufacturers, the department said the dumping price margins averaged 13.83%.  If upheld, the finding could lead to the imposition of penalty duties equal to the dumping margins.  The imports totaled about $109.1 million in 1988.  U.S. buyers of such equipment include auto and appliance manufacturers and other metalworking industries.  The ruling came on a trade complaint filed in January by the Chicago-based Verson division of Allied Products Corp.  The United Auto Workers and the United Steelworkers unions joined in the complaint.  Generally, the Commerce Department finds violations of the anti-dumping act if foreign-produced goods are sold to U.S. buyers at prices below the "home-market" price for the same products, or at prices found to be below the foreign cost of production.  Under U.S. trade law, the Commerce Department must issue a final ruling against imports, and the U.S. International Trade Commission must rule that the imports are harming a U.S. industry, before anti-dumping duties can be assessed.  Pending final rulings in this case, due in late October, the U.S. government will require importers of the presses to post cash deposits or bonds to cover anti-dumping duties that may be imposed later.  Tri-State Motor Transit Co., Joplin, Mo., said Trism Inc. rejected its proposed modifications to Trism's merger offer.  Tri-State said it would accept Trism's offer and submit it to a shareholder vote if Trism would, among other things, agree to obtain a commitment for financing by Aug. 29 and raise the total cash consideration available to holders to $23.1 million from $21.9 million.  Trism is a New York-based investment firm.  In a letter to the company, Trism said it was unwilling to accept the modifications.  Tri-State, a trucking concern, said its board will meet today to discuss whether an agreement can be reached.  After months of delay and large cost overruns, Asia's tallest skyscraper is nearing completion.  At 1,040 feet, the Bank of China building towers over Hong Kong's central business district.  For many, the structure is an apt symbol of 1997, the year China is due to regain sovereignty over this British colony.  American-Chinese architect I.M. Pei designed the building, which will serve as headquarters for Beijing's main overseas bank.  The structure is a crystalline progression of triangles that Mr. Pei says symbolizes a bamboo shoot reaching for the sky.  Tradition-minded Chinese residents, however, view the design as bad feng shui.  Literally translated as "wind, water," feng shui is an ancient system for seeking harmony with nature.  The object is to locate buildings or even furniture to take advantage of natural forces that can bring good fortune; not to do so can bring misfortune.  Moreover, certain shapes, colors and numbers are more propitious than others.  It is Mr. Pei's use of triangles that has caused unease among the many adherents of feng shui in Hong Kong.  Triangles symbolize daggers and are generally avoided in traditional Chinese architecture.  To deflect possible bad vibrations from the building, some nervous residents have hung small "spirit mirrors" in their windows.  The building has had its share of troubles since construction began in 1986.  But the explanation is economic rather than spiritual, according to Martin Hadaway, project manager for Kumagai Gumi (Hong Kong) Ltd., principal contractor for the building, along with its parent, Kumagai Gumi Ltd. of Japan.  "I don't know anything about feng shui," he says.  The building was originally scheduled for completion in November 1988, but that deadline was extended to April 1989 after builders discovered that they were going to have to dig deeper than expected to secure the foundation of the 70-story building.  Kumagai Gumi's original work program also was extended after it took on the task of the internal fitting work for Bank of China's half of the building's office space.  Interior design changes caused further delays.  Hong Kong's chronic shortage of construction workers didn't delay the project, but the resulting rise in wages stung Kumagai Gumi and many of its subcontractors, Mr. Hadaway says.  "Labor costs have basically doubled since 1986," says Mr. Hadaway.  "In some cases, the increases have been more than that."  As many as 2,000 workers were involved in the project.  Currency fluctuations and inflation also drove up the cost of materials.  "Overall construction costs have gone up 30% in the last couple of years," Mr. Hadaway says.  He adds that the final cost of the building was "quite a bit more than" the 1.1 billion Hong Kong dollars (US$141 million) that Kumagai Gumi bid for the project, but he declined to provide a figure.  Mr. Hadaway says, however, that despite losing money, Kumagai Gumi "is very proud to have built this building."  The government is expected to issue an occupancy permit for the building within the next few days.  Tenants will be able to start their own interior work and move in after Sept. 1.  Bank of China is expected to begin moving into the building in October, with the move completed by year end, says Robert Warburton, project manager for Sun Chung Building Management Co., a Bank of China subsidiary formed to supervise the project.  The bank will occupy the lower 15 floors and the top three floors.  The bank plans to keep the building of its current headquarters, about 200 yards away.  The new building is 90% let, says Jeff Finney, associate partner of Knight Frank Kan & Baillieu, the leasing agent.  "There are two floors vacant," he says.  The June 4 massacre of pro-democracy demonstrators in Beijing hasn't caused any politically motivated defections from China's flagship building in the colony, Mr. Finney says, although Bank of China and its affiliates were hit by a wave of deposit withdrawals after the government-ordered killings.  But Mr. Finney says the building has been affected by the souring view of China's economic prospects in wake of the Beijing massacre and concerns over a slowdown in Hong Kong's economy.  "The level of inquiries overall in the market has slowed considerably, and this building is no exception," he says.  Two prospective tenants have withdrawn from lease negotiations since June 4 for economic reasons, he says.  Rather than political worries, "The biggest concern for tenants is justifying the space they agreed to lease," Mr. Finney says.  A half-dozen or so tenants are planning to sublet space they no longer feel they will need, he says.  When Sanford Sigoloff took Wickes Cos. through a massive Chapter 11 reorganization a few years back, he found a way to let everybody know that Wickes's stores were still operating.  He became the Lee Iacocca of the bankruptcy-court set.  In television commercials and print ads for Wickes's Builders Emporium home-improvement chain, turnaround specialist Mr. Sigoloff was the star.  The ads drove home his point -- that the shelves were full and the doors open -- with the tagline, "We got the message, Mr. Sigoloff]"  Today, Mr. Sigoloff again is dealing with a store chain in Chapter 11 proceedings.  As newly named chief executive officer of L.J. Hooker Corp., the U.S. unit of Hooker Corp., of Australia, he is faced with reversing the fading financial fortunes of two of the most gilded names in U.S. retailing, Bonwit Teller and B. Altman.  Almost immediately, he must tackle a marketing question facing every consumer company pushed over the edge and into Chapter 11: whether store ads should face the unfortunate plight head-on or just ignore it.  The dilemma is a thorny one.  Some consumers hear of a Chapter 11 filing and mistakenly believe the company is going out of business; others are totally unaware of the difficulties.  At the same time, advertising is often the first expenditure that companies in financial trouble will cut, making any message that much more difficult to spread and its content especially crucial.  Under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code, a company operates under protection from creditors' lawsuits while it works out a plan to pay its debts.  Marketing experts say Hooker should keep the advertising faucet turned on, to let people know the company is still alive.  Hooker's "problem seems to be trying to make money, so they better keep the folks coming to their stores.  They've got to sell pots and pans and sheets," says Joseph Karle, an executive vice president for ad agency Lintas, which handles advertising for Eastern Airlines, another Chapter 11 company.  But he cautions against alluding specifically to problems in Hooker ads: "At best it would be a barrier, and why would you advertise a barrier?"  A spokesman for Mr. Sigoloff, Michael Sitrick, says the executive doesn't plan to appear in ads this time around, and that his marketing strategy aside from that hasn't been decided.  But the steps he took with Wickes, which went into Chapter 11 reorganization in 1982, are instructive.  There, Mr. Sigoloff first negotiated with edgy vendors to get near-empty store shelves filled again.  Only when the stores were well-stocked several months later, did Wickes begin advertising again, with a campaign that tiptoed around the Chapter 11 difficulties -- acknowledging them without specifically mentioning them.  Mr. Sigoloff is likely to take a similar tack at Hooker.  "The first priority is to get the goods in the stores . . . to get the stores stocked to sell for Christmas," Mr. Sitrick says.  Until then, Hooker's B. Altman & Co. at least has put its advertising on hold.  Jack Schultz, Altman's president and chief executive, says his stores suspended advertising two weeks ago.  "What we should be advertising is new, fresh fall deliveries, and I don't have them all in hand yet," he says.  He says he hopes Altman will have enough merchandise to begin advertising in September, when a refurbished third floor of its flagship New York store will be ready for unveiling.  The new floor will be "a wonderful handle for us to come back into the market" without addressing the bankruptcy issue directly, he says.  At Bonwit Teller, however, David Dworkin, president and chief executive, says, "We don't intend to change our advertising at all."  Although Bonwit is "reviewing" its level of ad spending, he says, the ad campaign's format won't change, and no mention will be made of Hooker's problems.  "You might create some concern with that sort of stance," he adds.  Among many companies in trouble these days, however, a side-stepping approach seems to be the most common, even fashionable, way to reach out to customers.  Texas Air Corp.'s Eastern Airlines unit, which was forced into Chapter 11 following a pilots' strike last winter, came up with a new tagline in March that alluded to its problems without elaborating on them: "We're rebuilding a great new airline, one customer at a time."  Mr. Karle of Lintas, a unit of Interpublic Group, won't comment on the Eastern campaign, but he says that in general, a Chapter 11 filing "isn't something you acknowledge in your retailing advertising.  I don't think the public needs to be told.  Why would you do that?"  Yugo America, in its consumer advertising, also kept mum about its January Chapter 11 filing.  But in ads created for the business press, the Upper Saddle River, N.J., car distributor has been relatively vocal about its problems.  With the slogan, "The beginning of new success," the ads outline the company's accomplishments since filing for Chapter 11.  "Our biggest problem is how to convince people that Chapter 11 doesn't mean out of business," explains Zoran Basaraba, manager of corporate communications, who also oversees advertising.  "We are still selling cars, we are servicing our cars, everything is going on normally -- but there is a problem in communicating that to people."  Mr. Basaraba adds: "You have to acknowledge the fact that people have a perception of a disturbed business.  You can't act as if nothing happened."  He says the surest way for a troubled company to get its message across is to stress the future while facing up to problems.  Yugo, which had been run by Americans but which is now controlled by Yugoslavian car maker Zastava, made a point of showing up at trade shows just after its Chapter 11 filing, for example.  Still, Yugo's efforts have been hampered by an ad budget that is less than half of the $25 million it spent last year.  Eastern also has cut its ad budget since being forced into bankruptcy-law proceedings.  Hooker must face the ad spending dilemma next.  Altman's Mr. Schultz says he isn't "slashing" but has "no plans to dramatically increase" ad budgets, which he says will be "commensurate to the size of the business we expect."  He says some shifting of budgets will probably be inevitable, since the store isn't currently able to create catalogs, which need long lead times.  And he says he is preparing to start advertising again, with a meeting scheduled today with the New York Times -- which, according to Hooker's Chapter 11 filing, is owed $280,012 for advertising.  A Times spokeswoman declined to comment specifically on Hooker, but said the paper demands companies in bankruptcy to pay cash, up front, for ads.  ---  Lever Switches Account  Lever Brothers pulled its Wisk account from BBDO, an Interpublic Group agency, and awarded it to WPP Group's J. Walter Thompson unit.  New York-based Lever declined to say what prompted the switch.  According to Leading National Advertisers, the consumer-products company spent about $14 million promoting the brand last year.  BBDO serviced the account for more than 30 years.  It was there that copywriter Jim Jordan wrote the well-known "ring around the collar" line.  The agency continues to handle a number of other Lever accounts, including Caress soap, Mrs. Butterworth's pancake syrup and new products.  J. Walter Thompson handles Lever 2000 soap and Close-up toothpaste, among other products.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   PRUDENTIAL REVIEW: Prudential Insurance Co. of America hired consultant Bill Weilbacher to supervise the review of its $60 million to $70 million ad account.  Backer Spielvogel Bates, Prudential's agency since 1970, will participate in the review.  J. WALTER THOMPSON: Ronald S. Burns was named chairman of JWT Canada.  Andrew G. Krupski was named to succeed Mr. Burns as president and chief executive of JWT Canada.  TV PROGRAMMING: Young & Rubicam set up a TV programming unit to develop TV movies, mini-series and regular series.  Y&R also said Nina Rosenthal, a former Capital Cities/ABC executive, was named to head the unit.  The following U.S. Treasury, corporate and municipal offerings are tentatively scheduled for sale this week, according to Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ U.S TREASURY  @ Today  $14.4 billion of 13-week and 26-week bills.  @ CORPORATE  @ One Day This Week  Bizmart Inc. -- initial offering of 3.4 million common shares, via Alex, Brown & Sons.  Bonneville Pacific Corp. -- $40 million of convertible debentures, via Kidder, Peabody & Co.  Chart House Enterprises Inc. -- initial offering of 3.8 million common shares, via First Boston Corp.  Conner Peripherals Inc. -- offering of 6.3 million common shares, via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  Edgcomb Metals Co. -- $110 million of senior notes, via Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  Government Trust Certificates of Israel -- $740 million, via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  Grace Energy Corp. -- initial offering of 3.7 million common shares, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Horace-Mann Educators Corp. -- $115,748,000 of senior discount notes, with one common stock warrant for each note and $200 million of debentures, via Goldman, Sachs & Co.  @ MUNICIPAL  @ Thursday  Municipality of Metropolitan Seattle -- $80 million of limited sales tax general obligation bonds, Series 1989, with serial and/or term bonds, via competitive bid.  @ One Day This Week  Southern California Public Power Authority -- $650 million of multiple project revenue bonds, 1989 Series, via a Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. group.  San Antonio, Texas -- $640 million of gas and electric revenue refunding bonds, via a First Boston group.  South Dakota Student Loan Corp. -- $290 million of revenue bonds, Series B & C, via a Smith Barney group.  Southeastern Public Service Authority -- $198,175,000 of various bonds including $175 million of senior revenue refunding bonds and $23,175,000 of revenue refunding bonds, Regional Solid Waste System, via a Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. group.  Triborough Bridge & Tunnel Authority, N.Y. -- $150 million to $250 million of general purpose revenue bonds, via a Goldman Sachs group.  Southern Minnesota Municipal Power Agency -- $90 million of power supply system revenue bonds, Series A and B, via a Morgan Stanley & Co. group.  Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia -- $83,630,000 of various refunding revenue bonds, including $57,930,000 million of power revenue bonds, Series T, and $25.7 million of general power revenue bonds, 1989 Series B, via a First Boston group.  Philadelphia Municipal Authority, Pa. -- $71,405,000 of equipment revenue bonds, Series 1989, via a Grigsby Brandford Powell Inc. group.  Michigan State Hospital Finance Authority -- $54.1 million of hospital revenue refunding bonds, Oakland General Hospital, Series 1989, via a Smith Barney group.  South Dakota Health And Educational Facilities Authority -- $51.6 million of revenue refunding bonds, Rapid City Regional, Series 1989, via a Dougherty Dawkins Strand & Yost Inc. group.  Ohio Air Quality Development Authority -- $50 million of state of Ohio air quality development revenue bonds, Ohio Power Co., Series B, via a Goldman Sachs group.  Indefinite Port Authority of New York & New Jersey -- $100 million of consolidated bonds, 65th Series, via competitive bid on 48 hours' notice.  Port Authority of New York & New Jersey -- $100 million of consolidated bonds, 66th Series, via competitive bid on 48 hours' notice.  BroadBeach Associates Inc., a Los Angeles-based securities firm, made a proposal to acquire McGill Manufacturing Co. for $62 a share, or an indicated $85.3 million for the nearly 1.4 million McGill shares BroadBeach doesn't already own.  BroadBeach holds 73,800 common shares, or about a 5.1% stake, of McGill Industries, a Valparaiso, Ind.-based maker of ball bearings.  The announcement came after the close of national over-the-counter trading Friday when McGill shares ended at $51.25 each, up 25 cents.  In a letter last Thursday to James C. McGill, chairman, president and chief executive officer of McGill Manufacturing, BroadBeach said it is seeking to acquire the company in a "friendly transaction."  Now it can be told: George Bush switched political parties two months ago.  It happened in Clay County, near Jacksonville, Fla., where Mr. Bush is the owner of an insurance agency and an elected member of the county school board.  This Mr. Bush, no relation to the president, switched from the Democrats to the Republicans.  He wonders why he took so long.  "I'm a conservative," he says.  "I just got tired of those Dukakises, the Tip O'Neills, the whole Kennedy clan, all those liberals.  They cater to minorities rather than mainline citizens."  Mr. Bush is one of 128 elected Democratic officials who have switched to the Republicans this year in the Deep South, 35 of them in Florida alone. (The GOP also picked up Maurice Turner Jr., the District of Columbia's recently retired police chief.)  "The worm has turned," says Clay County's Mr. Bush.  "We are opening the final doors that will make us the dominant party in the South," says GOP National Chairman Lee Atwater.  "It doesn't send chills down our spine," counters Michael McCurry, chief spokesman for the Democratic National Committee.  "They {the Republicans} have labored mightily in the vineyards -- and produced vinegar."  But he concedes, quietly, that the Democrats are suffering some of the consequences "of losing five of the last six presidential elections."  Out in the vineyards, Democrats aren't always sanguine.  "There are people switching here," says former Rep. Buddy MacKay, state campaign chairman for Florida Democrats.  "The Republicans have some momentum going for them.  It's a head-counting game that's spooking a lot of Democrats."  "We're working hard to calm down our people," says Brian Martin, political director for Mississippi Democrats.  "We're telling our candidates, 'Remember, you're not Michael Dukakis and you're not running against George Bush.' Don't let them stampede you."  The point of Mr. Atwater's operation is to stampede moderate and conservative Democrats, spook them and ultimately, through mass switching, to bring the Deep South, top to bottom, into the Grand Old Party.  So far, it isn't working as well as Mr. Atwater boasts, but it isn't as harmless as Mr. McCurry suggests.  Florida is the key test -- "target No. 1," in Chairman Atwater's words.  The state already has a Republican governor, lieutenant governor, treasurer and secretary of state, a Republican U.S. senator and Republicans in 10 of the state's 19 House seats, after a party switch by Rep. Bill Grant this year.  The GOP also is favored to pick up its 11th House seat in a special election Aug. 29 to fill the late Claude Pepper's seat.  "We're on a roll," says Gary Landry, chief spokesman for Florida Republicans.  "Next thing, we're going to take control of the state Senate in 1990."  That would be the big breakthrough -- the first state legislative chamber to turn Republican in the Deep South in modern times.  "It's not ordained," says Democrat MacKay, who lost a bid for a seat in the U.S. Senate last year by 33,000 votes, while in the presidential race Mr. Bush was whomping Mr. Dukakis by 960,000 votes.  Working for the Democrats is the performance of Republican Gov. Bob Martinez, whose positive rating in statewide polls hovers at less than 50% and who seeks re-election next year.  "He's done everything but shoot himself in the head," says Simon Ferro, state Democratic chairman.  "He's going to taint a lot of other Republicans.  Anybody could beat him.  I could beat him."  Mr. Atwater doesn't deny Mr. Martinez may have a difficult time winning re-election, but he says he takes comfort in the fact the Democrats are hoping for a "knockout punch" to turn things around.  "That's a big change," he says.  "It used to be the Republicans who desperately sought the big knockout punches."  The Atwater operation works at two levels.  The first involves big names -- switchers such as Rep. Grant in February and Rep. Tommy Robinson of Arkansas last month.  Making the top list, too, are Secretary of State Fox McKeithen in Louisiana and State Auditor Pete Johnson in Mississippi.  But this sort of thing's been going on for years.  Before Watergate closed in on Richard Nixon, Democrats were switching over to the GOP at a sprightly rate, including such big names as Govs.  John Connally of Texas and Mills Godwin of Virginia.  There was still another switching surge in President Reagan's first term, when the party picked up Reps.  Phil Gramm of Texas, Andy Ireland of Florida and Eugene Atkinson of Pennsylvania.  Mr. Atkinson, who went straight from supporting Ted Kennedy to endorsing Ronald Reagan, didn't survive politically.  Democrats say they don't worry so much about these people.  As often as not, they argue, there's a special reason for their switching.  Congressman Robinson, for example, makes no secret of his intention to run for governor next year.  Louisiana Democratic Chairman James Brady says Mr. McKeithen switched after Republicans promised they would take care of his $400,000 campaign debt from 1987.  Mr. McKeithen denies it.  He is expected to be the GOP challenger to Democratic Sen. Bennett Johnston next year.  "The Republicans make two different pitches to these people," says Chairman Brady.  "First, they make sure your campaign debt gets erased.  Second, they promise they'll run you for a higher office held by a Democrat."  Sometimes it works, sometimes it doesn't.  Mr. Brady points to former Democratic state Rep. Jock Scott (who was also a national committeeman).  He defected to the Republicans and challenged an incumbent Democratic state senator in 1987 -- and lost.  The Atwater campaign's second level is more fundamental -- and, for the long run, more significant.  It's the one aimed at people like Clay County's George Bush; it's the campaign for school board members, judges, aldermen, sheriffs.  William "Buddy" Eubank, sheriff of Pontotoc County, Miss., is fairly typical.  "I began thinking about making a change while I was watching the Democratic convention on TV last summer," he says.  "I just thought to myself, I can't go along with the philosophy of these people.  They're liberals.  I'm a conservative."  The sheriff switched.  "Every four years," says Florida's Mr. MacKay, the Democratic Party "gets hijacked by what you might call the presidential wing of the party, and that tends to pull the entire debate to the left."  The result, of course, is a continuing erosion of conservative and moderate Democrats, of whom there are far more in the Deep South than in Massachusetts.  Mr. Atwater says the Democrats can't do anything about it because their party has drifted out of the mainstream and no longer offers a coherent message to the voters.  "They have no systematic set of beliefs," he charges.  Mr. MacKay acknowledges the existence of a problem.  "The first thing we've got to do," he says, "is convince ourselves we haven't fallen apart.  And then we've got to coordinate our message and show we are centrist, mainstream Democrats."  Mr. MacKay and other Southern party leaders lean heavily on the Democratic Leadership Council, an organization of moderate Democrats seeking new directions for the party.  Sen. Sam Nunn of Georgia is the chairman.  Leading members, with Mr. MacKay's blessing, will swing through Florida as well as Texas and Louisiana in a political cavalcade early in October "to give people hope and a home," says Deb Smulyan, the council's deputy director.  "This will give Democrats in Florida who feel isolated a chance to take a second look at us and at some of the people in our emerging mainstream leadership," says Mr. MacKay.  "We can still get our act together."  ---  @ Officials Switching Parties  Elected Democratic officials in Southern states who have switched to the Republican Party this year:  @ State Number of Switches  @ Alabama 13  @ Florida 35  @ Georgia 6  @ Louisiana 10  @ Mississippi 39  @ North Carolina 1  @ South Carolina 7  @ Texas 17  @ TOTAL 128  Source: Republican National Committee  About 40,000 union workers struck Ameritech Corp.'s Bell companies this weekend, joining about 160,000 striking employees of three other "Baby Bell" telephone companies.  Meanwhile, negotiators for Southwestern Bell Corp. and the Communications Workers of America reached a tentative agreement covering nearly 40,700 employees after negotiations continued into the evening yesterday.  Wages and health care issues were the final items resolved.  In Denver, U S West Inc. and union negotiators representing 40,000 employees met yesterday to iron out details of a verbal agreement reached early in the morning.  Neither company experienced work stoppages.  Little progress was reported in the weeklong strikes against Nynex Corp., Pacific Telesis Group, San Francisco, and Philadelphia-based Bell Atlantic Corp. Negotiators for Pacific Telesis's and Bell Atlantic's telephone companies have held informal talks with their union counterparts in the past week, but formal talks haven't resumed.  At New York-based Nynex, neither the company nor the union has picked up the phone to initiate discussions, union and company spokesmen said.  In the four strikes, the sides appeared far apart over wages and health care benefits.  Union officials contend that workers haven't received a fair share of the Baby Bells' healthy profits.  At Bell Atlantic, for instance, the union said that from the Bell System divestiture in 1984 until last year, profit climbed 20%, executive compensation jumped 43%, the cost of living rose 13.3%, and workers' compensation rose 11.9%.  The health care issue is particularly contentious, especially at Nynex.  Generally, the companies want workers to pick up a greater portion of their health care costs, and the unions contend the proposals represent significant wage cuts.  Moreover, union leaders fear that cost-shifting will harm workers and ultimately will raise health care costs because employees will delay seeking treatment.  The Bell companies, on the other hand, have been under pressure from Wall Street to control their costs, and the companies have been pushing for so-called incentive regulation that would allow them to earn higher profits if they cut expenses.  Although the local phone companies are essentially monopolies, their parent companies also cite the need to rein in costs as their markets become increasingly competitive.  The strike against Chicago-based Ameritech began immediately after the three-year contracts expired at midnight Saturday.  The contracts covered nearly 40,000 employees of the five local phone companies in Illinois, Indiana, Ohio, Michigan and Wisconsin, as well as Ameritech Services, where 600 union members are engaged in purchasing and materials management.  The union and the company conducted separate talks for the six units.  The strike follows a settlement reached a month ago between Ameritech's Illinois Bell unit and its biggest union, the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers, which represents nearly 13,000 employees.  The company also reached agreements with IBEW locals representing a total of 570 employees at Indiana Bell and Ameritech Services.  Communications Workers of America and company officials were waiting to see whether IBEW members would cross CWA picket lines today.  Of the seven regional Baby Bell companies formed by the Bell System divestiture, only Atlanta-based BellSouth Corp. reached a tentative agreement with the CWA before its contract expired a week ago.  The union accepted major changes in the health care package three years ago, and although the wage increase was a modest 4% in the first year and firm increases of 1% in each of the next two years, the company retained a cost-of-living adjustment that would cover about 80% of the effects of inflation.  Waterford Wedgwood PLC, the Irish purveyor of lead crystal and china, named William George chairman of its U.S. unit, based here.  The Waterford, Ireland-based parent had 1988 sales of about $460 million, of which the U.S. division contributed 40%.  This year, the company said, the division may account for 50%.  It didn't estimate revenue for the year, but said it will increase.  Mr. George had been chief executive officer of the U.S. division, a position that won't be filled.  As chairman, he succeeds Jim Colleran, who remains chief executive officer for North and South American operations.  Tim C. DeVine, formerly senior vice president of sales, was named president of the division, a new post.  Vicki Knaup was named to the vacant post of president of the Waterford Wedgwood Stores division, which operates 15 stores in the U.S.  She had been vice president of retail at the U.S. division.  The company plans to open a flagship store in New York this month.  Wyle Laboratories, El Segundo, Calif., said it expects to report that profit for the second quarter ended July 31 declined from the $2.1 million, or 21 cents a share, the year earlier.  But the company said 1989 second-quarter per-share earnings increased about 50% over the first quarter net income of 10 cents a share, which equaled $1.1 million.  The company didn't estimate second-quarter sales.  The electronic components, computer systems, and research, engineering and testing services concern also said its board authorized the buy-back of as many as 1.5 million of its common shares, or about 15% of the 10.1 million shares outstanding, from time to time on the open market or through negotiated transactions.  Funds for the buyback will come from working capital and bank borrowings.  George Lucas, producer of the Indiana Jones films, used his July 13 editorial-page article ("World Market Is the Last Crusade") to praise the Time-Warner marriage.  He asserted it will help the U.S. in the global marketplace.  Actually, the acquisition of Warner by Time Inc. for $14 billion will have the opposite effect.  In all probability, the new entity will be far less able to compete in any market, let alone globally, than could either Time or Warner by itself.  The reason for the major loss of competitive strength will be the enormous increase in debt that the Time-Warner combination will be shouldering.  Not only will the new combination create a massive cash drain due to higher interest costs, but the firm will be less able to (a) borrow from banks, (b) to sell bonds, and (c) to sell equity securities.  Instead of two profitable companies, each able to compete in international markets, there will be one giant financial cripple less able to compete in any market.  In the Indiana Jones films a disastrous event is converted regularly into a triumphant one.  However, in the creation of a company burdened with $19 billion of debt, a triumph is less likely than bankruptcy.  Theodore A. Andersen  Associate Professor  Anderson Graduate School of Management, UCLA Los Angeles  I am compelled to take issue with your careless use of my name in the June 22 Leisure & Arts article "An Acre of Books on the Block at Sotheby's."  A healthy discussion pertaining to the ramifications of our acquisition would have been welcomed.  Instead, it was more important to condemn the art dealer as a means to illustrate your particular, emotionally charged theory.  You chose to portray the art dealer as a cultural mercenary without regard for scholarly concerns.  You have overlooked grossly the integral part we play in a larger picture that includes libraries and museums among its clientele.  I would like to ask at which point in the existence of an "important document of American cultural history" is it deemed important enough to be removed from the free market?  You contend that our museums and libraries no longer can afford these items.  Certainly the Audubon journal was much less expensive when H. Bradley Martin originally purchased it.  Where were the scholars then . . . or do these objects become of such interest only after the marketplace has recognized them?  In addition, it should be pointed out that the Audubon journal cited did not change status as a result of this sale.  Mr. Martin, who was exalted to a position of scholarly sanctity in the article, was a private collector.  He was, in fact, similar in many respects to the gentleman whose collection the Audubon journal now graces.  This item has not been removed from the public sector and placed into a private sphere.  If we are successful in our plans to publish the journal in its entirety, the end result will, in fact, be quite the opposite.  Joel Oppenheimer  Director  Douglas Kenyon Inc.  Chicago  Steven W. Sanger, president of the company's Big G division, was named a senior vice president of this food and restaurant concern.  The company also promoted four corporate vice presidents to the posts of senior vice presidents.  They are Stephen H. Warhover, president of the Gorton's unit; Stephen J. Garthwaite, director of research and development; Jeffrey J. O'Hara, president of the Red Lobster USA unit, and Ronald N. Magruder, president of the Olive Garden unit.  Joseph A. Pechman's Aug. 3 letter is a good illustration of how the proponents of capital-gains taxation constantly redefine income until they find a measure that justifies their claim that only the rich have capital gains.  Mr. Pechman tries to achieve this result by defining all business losses as tax shelters.  In other words, all the people who lost their farms during the 1980s and the real-estate bankruptcies that led to the massive federal bailout of savings-and-loan associations were really just losses generated through the use of tax shelters and other tax-accounting devices.  In Mr. Pechman's economic world, real losses never happen.  They are just an accounting artifact that disguises income for tax reasons.  Paul Craig Roberts  Center for Strategic and International Studies  Washington  Robert P. Rittereiser was named a director of this maker of seals and dampers for the computer and semiconductor industries, increasing board membership to eight.  Mr. Rittereiser was president and chief executive officer of E.F. Hutton Group Inc. prior to its merger with Shearson Lehman Brothers.  Your July 20 page-one article about the dangers of farming stated incorrectly that OSHA had dropped its plan to require portable toilets for field workers.  In fact, in February 1987, the U.S. Court of Appeals ruled in favor of the Farmworker Justice Fund and ordered the Labor Department to issue the regulations.  By July 31, 1987, farm employers with 11 or more workers were required to provide drinking water, toilets and hand-washing facilities in the fields.  The small-farm exemption means that 85% of the more than three million farm-worker adults and children still are left unprotected.  It took 14 years of litigation against the Labor Department by farm-worker organizations to get these regulations on the books.  But that's only half the battle.  Enforcing the standard is a monumental task.  There are too few OSHA inspectors to conduct routine inspections and investigate complaints.  Workers do not want to risk being fired for complaining about violations, or they may not know their rights or where to complain.  Even when workers complain, the field sanitation standard is of low enforcement priority at OSHA.  In an industry where employers oppose safety regulations for themselves and their families, it's hardly surprising that they are more adamantly opposed to regulations to protect their hired workers, especially when the workers are outsiders -- migrants who speak a different language.  The willingness of Congress to forgo implementation of reasonable and much-needed health and safety laws to appease agribusiness lobbyists on Capitol Hill is shameful in light of the ever-increasing list of casualties, not only among adult farmers and farm workers, but most disturbingly, among their children.  Valerie A. Wilk  Health Specialist  Farmworker Justice Fund Inc.  Washington  GPA Group Ltd., an Irish aircraft leasing concern, said net income for its first quarter ended June 30 was $52.5 million, up 53% from $34.4 million the year earlier.  The Shannon-based company said revenue jumped to $399 million from $264 million, while the number of aircraft on lease surged to 190 from 118.  South Korea's debt-ridden Daewoo Shipbuilding & Heavy Machinery Co. said it will diversify into auto and aircraft production.  Kim Woo Choong, founder and chairman of the Daewoo Group, said the shipyard will undergo fundamental changes in order to move into new project areas.  By 1993, he said, shipbuilding will represent only 36% of the shipyard's revenue, down from the current 95%.  The group has begun to build an auto plant in Changwon that will have an annual production capacity of 120,000 cars when completed next year.  The capacity is to be increased to 240,000 units by 1993.  The shipyard, located on the southern island of Koje, has debts totaling more than $1.4 billion.  Toward the end of this month, the government will decide whether to approve a bailout plan for the shipyard.  N.V. Philips said net income nearly doubled in the second quarter of this year to 235 million guilders ($110.5 million) from 121 million guilders a year earlier, helped by a gain on the sale of a subsidiary.  Philips officials indicated that the Dutch electronics group's earnings growth will accelerate in the second half.  The company's sales rose 3.9% in the quarter to 13.55 billion guilders ($6.37 billion) from 13.04 billion guilders.  The year-earlier figure included sales of Philips's former domestic appliance division, which was spun off late last year to a new joint venture between Philips and Whirlpool Corp. of the U.S.  Fierce market competition forced Philips to slash prices in the quarter, squeezing margins and weakening profitability in some key product areas.  But the company's results were aided by a 184 million-guilder drop in net financing costs.  The company also benefited from a 38 million-guilder gain on the sale of its Swedish defense electronics subsidiary to Nobel Industrier AB earlier this year.  For the first half, earnings rose 36% to 458 million guilders from 338 million guilders last year.  Sales edged up 2.7% to 26.2 billion guilders from 25.5 billion guilders.  Sea Containers Ltd., the Bermuda-based shipping concern battling against a hostile Anglo-Swedish takeover bid, said pretax profit more than doubled in the second quarter from a year earlier.  Pretax profit was $21.5 million, up from $9.4 million.  The company cited strong improvements in its British ferries and its bulk-container rental and sales businesses.  The sharp improvement comes a day after the company announced it was willing to sell some of its assets and distribute the proceeds to shareholders to thwart a $777 million bid by Stena AB of Sweden and Tiphook PLC of Britain.  The companies, which launched their bid in May, are offering $50 for each Sea Containers share.  Sales in the quarter rose a more modest 6% to $239.0 million from $225.4 million.  Sea Containers' net, or after-tax, earnings also more than doubled in the latest quarter, to $19.4 million from $7.7 million, while earnings per share rose to $1.22 from 28 cents.  The Malaysian government has targeted 246 state-owned concerns, with a combined value of M$16.34 billion (US$6.11 billion), for privatization.  In a paper presented to the Malaysian Economic Association, Mohamed Sheriff Mohamed Kassim, director general of the government's Economic Planning unit, provided a glimpse into the long-awaited privatization master plan.  Malaysia already is five years into an initial privatization program.  To date, 22 government-owned concerns have been privatized, including a lottery, the national airline and shipping companies, regional water utilities, highway construction projects and a commercial television station.  Mr. Sheriff said a blueprint would include a tentative time frame for the privatization of the 246 companies, which were selected from among 434 government-owned enterprises studied by a team of foreign and local merchant bankers.  The 246 companies are owned and either directly or indirectly managed by federal, state or local government authorities.  They range from construction concerns to medical services, with most concentrated in the agricultural, manufacturing, transportation, utilities and hotel and recreation sectors.  Of the 246 concerns selected, 69 of them, valued at about M$3.53 billion, have been earmarked for privatization within the initial two years of the master plan; another 107, totaling about M$9.58 billion, within five years; and the balance, valued at about M$3.23 billion, thereafter.  Although Mr. Sheriff didn't disclose the names of the enterprises and their anticipated privatization dates, officials have said that the national telecommunications, electrical and postal operations are likely early targets.  Meanwhile, 81 companies established by the government to assist bumiputras, or indigenous Malaysians, have been divested to national entity charged with amassing corporate holdings on behalf of the designated citizens, or sold directly to bumiputra individuals and concerns.  Despite the considerable privatization inroads made by Malaysia, the program inititated under Prime Minister Mahathir Mohamad's administration still suffers from public and union resistance, poor government regulatory control, legal and financial obstacles, and accusations of political favoritism.  Mr. Sheriff said the new master plan will address these concerns, as well as providing a more systematic framework for future privatization to replace the ad hoc arrangements currently in place.  Several earlier privatization deals sparked criticism among Malaysians, due to secret negotiations, the paucity of subsequent government disclosure, and the granting of lucrative contracts to individuals and companies with close links to the Mahathir administration.  One of the government's criteria in awarding privatization contracts had been private-sector initiative in identifying and proposing various arrangements, according to various businessmen.  That practice, they said, gave rise to charges of political favoritism and disregard of Malaysians who depend on such targeted government services.  A number of measures are being considered to circumvent bureaucratic, legal and financial obstacles to the privatization program, said Mr. Sheriff.  Among them is the proposed creation of a single Federal Regulatory Commission to assume supervisory control from the separate ministries now charged with overseeing the various targeted enterprises.  Mr. Sheriff also indicated that the master plan would call for a privatization act to be submitted to Parliament, a measure long suggested by lawyers and merchant bankers who grappled with the complexities of earlier privatization deals.  In addition, he said amendments to Malaysia's tax statutes would be proposed to grant newly privatized concerns a tax status equal to those of private companies, while also offering special tax incentives and other concessions.  A leading index of the Australian economy rose 1.6% in May.  But the growth rate, which has remained steady for nearly a year, "combined with a slowdown in the smoothed growth rate of the leading index since late 1988, is likely to mean a slowdown in business activity in the months ahead," said Westpac Banking Corp., which, with Melbourne University's Institute of Applied Economic and Social Research, compiles the index.  It said a coincident index of the state of economic activity fell 1.6% in May, reflecting an "apparent turnaround in the Australian economy."  Despite concern that the turmoil in China had undermined banks' confidence in Hong Kong, the biggest private-sector financing ever arranged here has drawn the same response as many other local loans in recent years: Japanese banks have swarmed to participate, while most Western banks have stayed away.  The response to the 10.5 billion Hong Kong dollar (US$1.35 billion) credit, which was oversubscribed, indicates that banks remain eager to lend for large projects here even amid the uncertainty about how Hong Kong will be affected when it returns to Chinese control in 1997.  The one cloud over the syndication was the absence of a significant number of Western lenders, whose participation in loan groups is sought to demonstrate broad international support.  Still, analysts said the lack of significant Western participation stemmed from unhappiness with the terms of the loan, not directly from worries about Hong Kong's future.  Wardley Ltd., the arranger of the financing for two units of Hutchison Whampoa Ltd., said Wednesday that 22 banks, all but four of them Japanese, have agreed to join the group of 10 underwriters formed recently.  The amount the 32 banks were willing to commit would have been enough to fund a HK$13 billion credit.  In a separate announcement Wednesday that illustrated a Western bank's continued interest in lending in Hong Kong, Great Eagle Co. said the local unit of Citicorp has agreed to arrange and partly underwrite loans to help finance a HK$5.3 billion office development.  The U.S. bank also is likely to buy a 5% equity stake in the project.  The financing for the two units of Hutchison was split into two parts: HK$8.4 billion for Hongkong International Terminals Ltd., or HIT, which is owned 66% by Hutchison, and HK$2.1 billion for Omaha Investments Ltd., which is owned 100% by Hutchison.  The funds will be used to build additional facilities at Hong Kong's main container port.  The process of soliciting banks to participate in the loan has been widely watched.  Even after a group of banks announced July 24 that it had agreed to underwrite the financing, some bankers said a true assessment of banks' confidence in Hong Kong couldn't be made until the underwriters completed the syndication process.  While the syndication result does represent a vote of confidence in the future of Hong Kong's container-shipping business and the economy that supports the port, the vote wasn't a landslide.  At best, the fact that the loan group is dominated by Japanese lenders signals that business is returning to normal in Hong Kong's banking sector.  The main question for banks considering participating in the transaction was whether the interest terms adequately reflected the possibility that the borrowers would be unable to meet their obligations.  Most Western banks thought that the interest-rate margin was too low, particularly because repayment of the HK$8.4 billion portion for HIT largely will depend on revenue from an as-yet unfinished project: a new terminal at the container port.  Repayment of the Omaha Investments credit, by contrast, is being guaranteed by Hutchison.  In the eyes of many Western bankers, the uncertainty about the HIT loan would have made the terms unattractive even without the doubts about Hong Kong's future that were raised by the June 4 massacre of students in Beijing.  "In our case, we would have said the pricing was too low even before June 4," said an executive at a European bank that isn't in the loan group.  "But the Japanese love this pricing and they are piling in like they have done for the past 10 years."  The four non-Japanese banks that did participate despite that concern are Bank of East Asia Ltd. of Hong Kong; BBMB Finance (Hong Kong) Ltd., a unit of Bank Bumiputra Malaysia Bhd.; a unit of Chemical Bank of the U.S.; and Westdeutsche Landesbank Girozentrale of West Germany.  Because of their huge deposit base and their ability to raise funds inexpensively, Japanese lenders have a large supply of relatively inexpensive capital.  They therefore are able to undercut the interest rate terms offered in Asia by their rivals.  Back in the old days, BTV, the PGA Championship had no trouble distinguishing itself from other golf tournaments.  It was the Match-Play Major, 36 holes of qualifying followed by six rounds of elimination matches capped by 36-hole semifinals and finals that uniquely tested players' stamina as well as their swings.  If corporate sponsorship had been in vogue, Dr. Scholl's would have been a natural.  But television, the great homogenizer, waggled its lucre, and since 1958 the PGA has been 72 holes of stroke play, just like the other stops on the Sans-a-belt circuit.  And without a flag to wave, a la the U.S. and British Opens, or the Master's glorious springtime shrine in Augusta, Ga., golf's fourth "major" has something of an identity problem.  This is, however, not to say that the tourney, whose 71st edition teed off yesterday at Kemper Lakes Golf Course in deepest Chicago suburbia, is the same as the rest.  By ancient custom, dating from a time when earning a living playing golf was considered about as reputable as dealing three-card monte, its field includes a goodly number of club pros, men whose days normally are spent selling golf balls and telling hackers to keep their left arms straight.  One might think that golfdom would glory in this rare instance of diversity, but such is not the case.  Every year one touring pro or another can be counted upon to grouse publicly that the Professional Golfers Association of America, the club-pro-based group that runs the tourney, is taking bread from the mouths of honest toilers like himself by allotting its rank and-file 41 of the 150 places in the field.  When questioned about this on Wednesday, PGA of America President Patrick Rielly waxed defensive.  "We think the top 100 players here are the best around," Rielly said.  "Besides, it's good to have the golfing public think of the guy behind the counter {the club pro} as a tournament player once a year."  The grousers still have a point insofar as order of finish is concerned; the club boys rarely collect any serious loot in this thing.  The biggest splash any of them has made of late came last year at the Oak Tree Club in Edmond, Okla., when Floridian Jay Overton thrilled the multitudes by standing second after 36 holes with rounds of 68 and 66 before subsiding into a tie for 17th place.  Most club-pro contestants came here harboring modest immediate expectations.  Bob Klein Jr., a slim swinger from Northern California, said, typically, that he'd be happy to make the cut that determines who survives to play the final 36 holes.  Sammy Rachels, a bearded 38-year-old from Destin, Fla., said he'd be glad simply to make it off the course under his own power.  "Bad back," he explained.  "My aim?" laughed Emil Esposito, the 51-year-old Kemper Lakes home pro who made the field by virtue of the annual host's dispensation.  "To make the cut.  Or break 80.  Or not whiff any."  He adds: "Just the honor of being here is enough, getting to rub elbows with the big guys.  This is almost what most of us had in mind when we became pros."  Esposito's accent was on the "almost," because few take up golf to tend a pro shop.  Like most of the accidental tourists here, he had youthful dreams of links glory.  A champ in high school and college, and with a few Chicago-area professional crowns for ballast, he sampled the Big Time for various periods between 1962 and '66.  He says that, among other things, the experience taught him it is one thing to break par playing with the locals, and quite another to do it with five-figure checks (now it's six figures) on the line.  "It wasn't just the golf -- it was the competition, the driving and the motel living.  That takes two or three full years to get used to, and I couldn't afford to do it.  I'd play for a few months, then have to come home and earn some money.  It was tough to get things together that way."  The last straw came at a 1966 tournament in Pensacola, Fla.  "I played the qualifying round in the morning, when it was cold and miserable, and shot a 72 to lead the field for the 25 places in the real tournament," he says.  "Then the weather turned beautiful, and guys started coming in under me.  By the end of the day, I was in a six-way playoff for the last three spots, and I three-putted for a bogey on the first extra hole.  "Next morning, I got up at 5:30 and didn't stop driving until I hit Indianapolis.  I phoned my wife from there. 'Put on the coffee,' I said. 'I'm coming home for good.'"  Esposito is now comfortably stocky and graying, and says that club life has been good to him.  He has worked at a succession of courses around Chicago, for the last four years at newish Kemper Lakes, which is public to anyone willing to pay $75 for a round of golf and reserve a tee time at least a week in advance.  He and his four assistants supervise all golf activities there and, at $40 for a half-hour lesson, he has established a reputation as a good teacher.  "My teaching secret is to not overload people with advice," he confides.  "I treat everybody the same -- like they're 12 years old."  He has forsaken his students this week for golf and elbow rubbing.  He has hit practice balls alongside Craig Stadler, putted with Paul Azinger and played a practice round with Seve Ballesteros ("What a thrill] A real gentleman.").  And while he notes that his always-compact swing is becoming compacter with time, and that he doesn't get to play as often as he'd like, he's been hitting the ball as well as ever.  "Maybe I'm getting smarter," he smiles.  "I`ve discovered it's not the end of the world if I miss a shot.  Who knows?  Maybe I'll try the senior tour."  Foolish talk?  Perhaps, but not uncommon at any level during the heady days of PGA week.  "Would I like to try the big tour?" muses Scott Davis, a 33-year-old club pro from Nitro, W.Va.  "Well, I've got a new baby, a good job and my wife likes me home.  Yeah, I'd love to try it."  Damon Biotech Inc. said it will need additional external funding after "the next few fiscal quarters," but has so far been unable to make arrangements for such funding.  In a letter to shareholders commenting on the fiscal-third quarter ended May 31, President William Terry said the company's existing cash, marketable securities and anticipated revenue "should be sufficient to satisfy cash needs for the current level of operations over the next few fiscal quarters."  But, "beyond those quarters existing cash reserves together with the funds expected to be produced by operations will not be sufficient."  In an interview, Mr. Terry said the biotechnology company's search for funding has centered on potential "corporate partners," which might stand to benefit from products Damon Biotech is developing.  For the second quarter, Damon Biotech had a loss of $2 million, compared with a loss of $1.1 million a year ago.  "Costs and expenses continue to be reduced, but an increase in revenues has not been achieved," Mr. Terry said in his letter.  Damon Biotech is 61%-owned by Damon Corp., which was acquired in May by Nomad Partners Limited Partnership.  Nomad has said it intends to sell the interest.  It hasn't done so yet, said Mr. Terry.  Chester E. Finn Jr.'s July 12 editorial-page article, "Made in Japan: Low-Tech Method for Math Success," made my day.  I have taught math to freshmen and sophomores for 27 years at a state university in Massachusetts and have found that the students' math backgrounds have declined significantly over the past 15 to 20 years.  Over the years, I have heard many horror stories, such as the students who loved their high-school math teacher because he was the football coach and they talked sports during each math class for the entire year.  This past semester, a math colleague told me that her child's fifth-grade teacher incorrectly taught the class how to do fractions.  When she complained to the school, she was told the teacher could not understand the approach in the textbook so she taught the students the method she remembered from her grammar-school years, which was completely incorrect.  When teaching optimization-type problems in calculus, I find that many students do not know how to find the area of a rectangle or square nor the volume of a box] This past year, I asked my students to find the largest rectangular area enclosed by a given length of fencing.  The answer was a square, but many students challenged me because the answer was not (according to them) a rectangle.  This country has major problems with math education, and the Kumon method used at the Sumiton Elementary School in Birmingham, Ala., which was featured in Mr. Finn's article, appears to be a step in the right direction.  I tip my hat to June Williams, the fourth-grade teacher, and her vice principal Ilene Black (of Sumiton) for refusing to use the calculator approach to math now gaining favor.  I don't allow calculators to be used during my calculus exams.  Unfortunately, far too many students, when deprived of a calculator, struggle to multiply numbers such as 1,000 by 20.  I feel sorry for them because they have been cheated by a high-tech world.  For the past 15 years, I have coordinated a pre-calculus course, which had an enrollment of more than 1,200 students this past year.  After seeing the failure statistics for the course, I looked over the exams and found that they were easier than the ones I gave several years ago.  The lecturer in the course is excellent, so I knew the material was covered fully.  Yet less than 60% of the 1,200 students passed]  The students taking this pre-calculus course are liberal-arts majors filling a core math requirement, and business majors taking it as a pre-requisite for their two required calculus courses.  Students at our university won't have to fear this course in the future.  The math department has been requested to offer an "Appreciation of Math" course for liberal-arts students beginning next semester.  The course instructor said he was asked to give no grades under "C" and that it was suggested to him that no exams be given] The College of Management Science is solving the problem by studying the feasibility of dropping the requirements that its business majors take this course.  If anyone wonders why the U.S. is having problems with its educational system, all they have to do is look at the accommodations those in authority make in order to take the path of least resistance.  Bernard Shapiro  Lowell, Mass.  London Festival Ballet isn't the worst company to have appeared at the Metropolitan Opera House during the past 20-or-so summers, but it's surely the most anonymous.  Founded in 1950, it has never set its sights any higher than popular success, something it has sought to achieve with a combination of old favorites and, for the most part, unchallenging novelties.  Like American Ballet Theatre before the advent of Mikhail Baryshnikov, LFB has tended to replace long-term artistic planning with any passing choreographer or star dancer who promised to fill the house.  Though LFB has had several artistic directors, it has retained essentially the same populist aims it started out with.  In his five years as artistic director, Peter Schaufuss has made only incidental changes.  He has brought in guest artists like Natalia Makarova and taken on works by dance makers as wildly dissimilar as Paul Taylor, Roland Petit, John Neumeier, George Balanchine and Michael Clark, the last of whom created a piece for LFB called "Drop your pearls and hog it, girl."  The names may be different from those current in the days of Mr. Schaufuss's predecessor, but the results are scarcely more interesting.  Not surprisingly, the company, unshaped by the demands of a single strong choreographer, lacks a sense of common purpose.  The corps de ballet, it's true, is fairly homogeneous in manner, exhibiting the blend of diffidence and docility customarily found among English-trained dancers.  The principals, on the other hand, exemplify a bewilderingly extensive range of styles: English, Danish, French, Italian, Spanish.  Some artists are lyrical in manner, others punchy, some small-scale, some expansive.  Taken as a whole, they seem to have been chosen in order to satisfy any possible preference on the part of the audience.  Despite the international character of LFB's roster, none of its dancers is of international quality.  What the company badly needs is a ballerina and a premier danseur of sufficient distinction to epitomize the standards of accomplishment to which LFB as a whole can aspire.  Not one of the three Juliets seen in New York in Sir Frederick Ashton's "Romeo and Juliet," for example, could muster up the authority the role requires.  And though the 40-year-old Mr. Schaufuss, who doubles as artistic director and leading male dancer, has preserved much of his prowess, he has done so only at the cost of elegance, authority, legato.  For its two-week engagement here, LFB brought three programs: two full-length ballets, "Romeo and Juliet" and "Napoli," and a triple bill.  While these constitute only a tiny part of the company's working repertoire, they give a fairly accurate idea of its artistic makeup.  Because LFB spends a lot of the year touring around the British Isles and the Continent, it needs a large number of full-length works, since these are good box office, especially outside the major cities.  But because even the most populist ballet troupes need a certain amount of artistic prestige -- especially when, like LFB, they depend in part upon government subvention -- the company must also have short ballets by contemporary choreographers.  Of the two full-length pieces, one, "Romeo and Juliet," is recognizably the work of a master.  While Ashton could do little to mitigate the tedium inherent in the adaptation of an elaborate Shakespearean plot, he had the good sense to cut great chunks of Prokofiev's reiterative music, and, wherever possible, to subvert narrative to the ends of dance.  Though the performers could not rise fully to the level of the work's great rhapsodical passages, they commendably did not attempt to tailor these to their own limited capacities.  Much to Mr. Schaufuss's credit, it is still possible to discern Ashton's direct participation in this resuscitation of a ballet once thought to have disappeared forever.  In the case of "Napoli," the intentions of the original choreographer, August Bournonville, have been willfully ignored -- as one might have guessed from the fact that the piece is listed in the program as "'Peter Schaufuss' 'Napoli.'" While other ballet masters have amended the work since it was first performed in 1842, none before has so misrepresented its moral intentions.  Instead of venturing into the depths of the Bay of Naples and restoring his drowned sweetheart to life with the aid of a holy medal, the hero, Gennaro, now merely dreams that she has been drowned, and, upon waking, finds her safe and sound on a ledge inside the Blue Grotto.  No longer is the ballet about faith but good luck.  Good luck, and Gennarosince the net result of Mr. Schaufuss's changes is to make the hero's role larger than the heroine's.  But it was the one-acters that revealed most unmistakably Mr. Schaufuss's lack of artistic purpose.  Not only are all three bad, they are bad for his company, since they call for a range of skills, both technical and interpretive, beyond his dancers' capacities.  "Land," by LFB's associate choreographer, Christopher Bruce, is a feeble attempt to use a primitive modern dance technique for the ends of social commentary.  Though the piece seems to deal with the ravages of war, it is neither clear nor convincing -- especially as performed by LFB.  Just as unclear and unconvincing is Sir Kenneth MacMillan's too-often-seen "Anastasia," a confusing glimpse into the mind of the woman who might have been the only member of the Imperial Russian family to survive the bloodbath at Ekaterinburg in 1918.  Historically dubious, psychologically superficial and choreographically thin to the point of negligibility, the piece served mainly as a vehicle for the return of Lynn Seymour.  She was ill-served by it.  In her heyday, Ms. Seymour was cherished for her dancing -- her Giselle was among the triumphs of our time -- not for her miming.  "Etudes," the work that brought the curtain down on the triple bill, is not only vulgar, it requires a mixture of insouciance and technical brilliance beyond the capacity of LFB.  The kind of European company that could once offer the summertime public at Lincoln Center big stars and a dazzling display of virtuosity has disappeared.  Yet to judge from the applause, the subscription audience doesn't yet know what's happened.  When it does, the ballet boom will have ended.  Dental floss was a hot item last fall in the commissary at Manhattan's Metropolitan Correctional Center.  In fact, at least 15 rolls changed hands as three prisoners stocked up.  But, villains that they were, the cunning cons didn't waste any of the Johnson & Johnson product on dental hygiene.  The reason: The 100-foot rolls were a key element in a daring -- and unconventional -- escape attempt.  No hand-to-mouth scheme this, the men slowly accumulated the rolls for months prior to their flight.  To avoid attracting attention, the trio, instead of buying the unwaxed floss, sometimes swapped cigarettes and other items for rolls that other inmates had purchased.  Then, sitting quietly in their ninth-floor cells at night, they painstakingly braided the sturdy strands into a rope.  Though only a quarter-inch in diameter, the rope was strong enough to support the three men, each weighing in the range of 170 to 190 pounds.  They slid one at a time down the rope to a third-floor terrace one night last November.  The floss held but the plot unraveled.  A fifth-floor guard heard a noise, went to a window and saw one of the men dangling.  The guard called U.S. marshals, and the three men were arrested on charges of conspiracy to escape and attempted escape.  Two of them pleaded guilty and returned to prison.  The other, Kourosh Bakhtiari, a 27-year-old Iranian who allegedly masterminded the escape attempt, pleaded innocent and will stand trial this fall.  Earlier this week, Mr. Bakhtiari was convicted of impersonating a U.S. State Department official and possessing illegal weapons -- the offenses for which he was originally arrested.  For that, he faces a maximum of 28 years in prison.  If convicted in the escape attempt, he would face 10 more years.  In any case, Mr. Bakhtiari isn't likely to use dental floss again, except on his teeth.  Having failed to include gloves in his plans, he severed tendons and ligaments in both hands during his slide in November.  Last February, at a Manhattan hospital where he was having surgery on his hands, he escaped again.  This time, with no need to thread his way out, he simply left by the side door for a three-day outing.  Recaptured, he faces further charges.  Within two days after the 1987 stock-market crash, one financial printer says, all his business was "suspended in air" and soon afterward fell like a lead ballon.  Almost two years later, the stock market is near its pre-crash highs, but the financial-printing business remains mired in one of its worst slumps in memory.  During the past month, two of the industry's biggest players, Sorg Inc. and Charles P. Young & Co., have filed for protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  The filing permits them to operate while they work out debt-payment plans.  They aren't alone.  Last January, Packard Press, along with its parent Basix Corp., filed under Chapter 11.  Industry observers speculate that some private printing houses are struggling and may be on the block.  They expect a further shakeout in the industry to concentrate the business in fewer, more secure hands.  Even the biggest financial printer, Bowne & Co., of New York, has been battered.  Its net income last year fell 50%, to $12.8 million, or 70 cents a share, from $25.5 million, or $1.39 a share, the previous year, while sales for the year fell to $187.8 million from $217 million in 1987.  In this year's first half, net fell to $2.7 million, or 15 cents a share, from $6.1 million, or 33 cents a share, the previous year, while sales were about flat at $90.8 million.  Thomas J. Vos, Bowne's vice president of marketing, estimates that, industrywide, annual revenues before the crash was about $800 million.  Volume of financial printing dropped 30% the year after the crash, and so far in 1989, has recovered about half the decline.  In the industry it's said that the printers pay their bills with recurring jobs such as annual reports and annual meeting proxies, but profits come from the one-time proxy contests, tender offers, initial public offering circulars and other equity and debt offering documents.  The latter segment is very market sensitive and for many printers has virtually dried up.  By far the biggest financial-printing job this year was tied to the $25 billion buy-out of RJR Nabisco Inc. by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., handled by closely held Commercial Printing Co.  The company won't comment on estimates that the bill could have run as high as $10 million.  Sorg says printing orders for proxy contests, tender offers and equity and debt offerings represented about 71% of its printing volume before the crash but dropped to 54% last year.  Diversification is partly responsible for pulling that figure down.  Industrywide, the volume of printing proxies and other "annuals," has held steady, but revenue has declined because of a price war.  "Price cutting is where you get killed," says David L. Rosenstein, a Sorg vice president.  Across-the-board, competitors have cut profit margins in order to retain market share, printers say.  But some say the industry was in trouble before the crash.  "A lot of people in financial printing used the crash to mask" the industry's other problems, one executive says.  "Computer word processing has taken the service out of financial printing," he adds.  Bigger houses incurred expenses to provide conference rooms, telephones, beds, kitchens and showers for the platoons of lawyers and executives who huddled together to structure a merger or tender offer, while printers nearby set and reset the type as language changed.  "It isn't just press capacity that makes a financial printer what it is," Mr. Vos says.  But computerized word processing and printing has made such services less necessary.  Financial printers get more "camera-ready" copy, cutting demand for ancillary services.  Big printers have made major capital investments in satellite and printing technologies, enabling them to expand far beyond Manhattan's Varick Street, the area which is to printers what Madison Avenue is to advertising firms.  For firms in New York, unionized labor costs remain a major cost factor.  Despite efforts to cut costs, financial printers say they have to have full staffs on-hand for the big job that might walk in the door.  "But during these past couple of years people have been walking in a lot less frequently," Mr. Vos of Bowne says.  Some regional printers have prospered by resisting the temptation to get too big.  George Shifrin, chairman of Corporate Printing, says some call his outfit a "boutique" because of its size.  In 1988, Corporate had sales of about $34 million, up from $28 million.  The company is profitable, its chairman maintains, because its typesetting shop is non-unionized and because it doesn't face the high overheads of owning a site in every city.  Mr. Shifrin said the company has embraced the use of a small laser-printer system, which allows lawyers to proof documents in their offices, rather than at the printing house.  Sorg says it was in a cash crunch and was "pushed into" bankruptcy-law proceedings by its bank, Irving Trust Co., which wouldn't let the printer refinance about $12 million of debt.  It is also in default on about $1.4 million in notes issued in connection with its 1987 acquisition of Kellow-Brown Co. Sorg is confident it will emerge from bankruptcy-law proceedings a stronger company, but says the business will remain very competitive.  "I don't think it's ever going to come back to what it was," says Sorg's Mr. Rosenstein.  Young, which was purchased from Service Resources by Century Partners Limited Partnership earlier this year, said it has been unable to cover costs because of the slowdown since the crash.  Service Resources unloaded the company after Young was unable to make a payment on certain outstanding bonds.  Bowne, careful to emphasize its 200-plus years in business, claims it will gain market share during this down cycle.  "We emerge from these market downturns in a better competitive position," says Mr. Vos.  He estimates Bowne gained an extra 5% of the financial-printing business since the crash and controls 25% of the pie.  Kellow-Brown, acquired by Sorg in 1987, represents a diversification move into printing computer-software manuals.  But now Sorg says it is considering selling Kellow-Brown, which a spokesman calls a "good business."  Part of the reason Bowne remains profitable, Michael J. Walker, a Legg Mason Inc. analyst says, is that it has "entrenched relationships" with large companies and investment houses that regularly need financial printing.  Bowne is "very good," he adds, and has an "excellent balance sheet."  "I don't think the smaller niche guys are fighting with Bowne," says Mr. Walker.  "They're fighting with the other regional niche players."  R.R. Donnelley & Sons Co., a Chicago commercial printer, has a financial-printing business that is expected to continue to be a major force in the industry largely because of the parent company's deep pockets.  Donnelley doesn't break out figures for its financial-printing business.  Mr. Walker says "this down cycle is Donnelley's opportunity to establish itself as one of the two strong players," along with Bowne.  Despite concern about its overburdened infrastructure, Thailand is stepping up efforts to attract direct investment, but analysts don't think the new measures are strong enough.  The campaign is two-pronged.  One element is geared to foreign investors unnerved by China's turmoil and involves loosening residency restrictions for foreign investors.  The changed guidelines resemble some that were set up in 1984 to attract Hong Kong investors made skittish by the Sino-British agreement to return that territory to Chinese sovereignty in 1997.  Those guidelines were allowed to lapse after a year.  The other part of the campaign aims to bring in investment on a more selective basis, avoiding the low-end industries that have swarmed to Thailand in favor of those that, ideally, offer technology transfer.  Toward this end, delegations of Thai officials and businessmen are about to start holding seminars in several Asian locations.  In addition, the Thai government will give special consideration to the educational background of those applying for residency -- an effort akin to Singapore's moves to attract skilled immigrants, particularly from Hong Kong.  Some analysts question whether the new residency guidelines will make a significant difference in the investment picture.  "There is a distinct possibility that a lot of Hong Kong Chinese might find it an interesting proposition to have an (alternative) Asian base, but it's not the cheapest deal around," says Mark Greenwood, general manager of First Pacific Asia Securities Thailand Ltd.  Australian and Canadian guidelines require less investment, Mr. Greenwood says, and unlike the Thai offers, "the Australian and Canadian regulations tend to virtually guarantee passports" for the new arrivals.  The newly approved Thai regulations allow three-year residency permits for foreign investors, along with their spouses and children under age 20, in return for bringing in more than 10 million baht ($390,000) of direct investment.  The investment must reflect an equity holding equal to 25% of the registered capital in a company, although the investor may appeal for a waiver of that rule if the size of the project exceeds 100 million baht.  Currently, nonresidents are allowed initial 90-day non-immigrant visas and a generally unlimited number of six-month extensions.  The new guidelines also grant three-year residency permits in exchange for the purchase of 10-year, nonredeemable, nontransferable Finance Ministry bonds.  For individuals, the bond must be more than eight million baht; for married couples, the amount is six million baht a person plus two million baht for each child under 20.  "They want to be in a position to choose only those industries which will benefit Thailand in terms of transfer of technology and so on," says Bangkok Bank economist Viraphon Vachratith.  "This gives the Board of Investment more options when they sit down to choose."  However, Mr. Viraphon says, to help ease the burden on the country's infrastructure, officials should design additional guidelines to move industry out of the overcrowded Bangkok area and into other parts of the country.  The continued strength of financial stocks helped the Nasdaq over-the-counter market advance in the face of heavy selling of Liz Claiborne and some big technology issues.  The Nasdaq Composite Index rose 1.14 to 463.55 on moderately heavy volume of 134.4 million shares.  Advancing issues outnumbered declining ones 1,062-922.  Yet traders said sellers dominated the action.  "I saw some old-fashioned profit-taking," said Robert O'Toole Sr., manager of institutional OTC trading at Shearson Lehman Hutton.  The weakness in many OTC stocks surprised some traders who expected the OTC market to rise in sympathy with the Dow Jones Industrial Average, which briefly surpassed its record closing level of 2722.42 before retreating.  For the day, the Dow was up almost 1%.  The selling pressure on the OTC market was such that "you wouldn't think {the Dow Jones Industrial Average} was going for a record," said Mr. O'Toole.  Financial stocks, which soared as speculation continued that the economy will avoid a recession and that interest rates are headed lower, rescued the OTC market from a decline.  Bank and thrift earnings tend to improve when interest rates fall.  The Nasdaq Financial Index rose 3.66 to 461.71.  One of the OTC market's glamour stocks, Liz Caiborne, lost 3/4 to 24 3/4 on one million shares.  Traders blamed profit-taking for the decline.  Analysts who follow the stock said there was no corporate news or any shifts in the fundamentals of the company to account for the stock's weakness.  Much of the selling was in the technology sector, which continued its intense love-hate relationship with investors.  Only three days ago, investors and securities firms re-embraced the group they have rebuffed for months because of disappointing earnings news.  Now many investors, who feel betrayed as the earnings surprises resume, are turning their backs on the stocks again.  Yesterday, investors reacted to disappointing news from Computer Associates on the New York Stock Exchange and Novell on Nasdaq.  Novell fell 3 7/8 to 25 on 2.8 million shares.  The maker of computer-networking products said it expects to report net income for its third quarter, ended July 29, was slightly lower than the $11.5 million, or 35 cents a share, it posted for the second quarter of fiscal 1989.  The results are likely to be well below current analyst estimates, which range from 37 cents to 49 cents a share.  The third-quarter results are expected to be released Sept. 11.  Novell said that although shipments of software products increased modestly, the company's previously announced strategy of shifting out of its non-strategic hardware business was the primary reason for the decline during the quarter.  The company said the benefits of its actions to reduce operating expenses, including workforce reductions, won't be realized until the fiscal fourth quarter, which ends in October.  The news was a blow to analysts and investors, coming on the heels of an announcement from Novell's chief rival, 3Com, that it might post a loss for its fiscal 1990 first quarter, ending this month.  Some analysts, anticipating the bad news from 3Com, have been advising investors to sell their 3Com shares and buy Novell, which they believed had a brighter outlook.  Other technology stocks that suffered included Apple Computer, down 3/4 to 43 1/4, and Sun Microsystems, off 5/8 to 14 1/2.  Intel eased 1/4 to 31 1/4 and Seagate Technology lost 5/8 to 11 7/8.  Len Hefter, head of Jefferies & Co.'s OTC trading desk in Dallas, said many technology-stock investors are frustrated.  "People are starting to feel that enough is enough and that now isn't the right time to be involved in this sector," he said.  "The {outlook for the} whole sector is tentative at best and there probably are more surprises on the downside on the horizon."  Some technology stocks did rise, however.  Shares of three laser manufacturers mentioned in an article in this newspaper earlier this week posted huge gains in OTC trading.  Summit Technology rose 1 1/16 to 7 3/16 bid, Visx jumped 2 7/8 to 9 7/8 bid and Taunton Technologies soared 5 3/4 to 18 1/2 bid.  The article said the three companies are racing to market a version of a highly specialized laser used in corneal sculpturing to correct vision defects.  Among other active stocks, Wheelabrator Group added 1/4 to 9 3/4 on 2.6 million shares.  First Executive gained 1/4 to 13 and MCI Communications improved 1/2 to 37 1/2.  Painful Progress  A political approach that's bipartisan  Barely makes sense in my view,  For it usually means on the issues  Neither party has a clue.  -- Edward F. Dempsey.  ---  Updated Health Tip  Those who avoid the sun  May think they have it made  But soon they may be warned  To keep out of the shade.  -- Joshua Adams.  ---  GWTW Update  "Rhett, I want a video camera."  "Frankly, my dear, I don't give a Cam."  -- Shelby Friedman.  Pinnacle West Capital Corp., parent of Arizona Public Service Co., has squared off with powerful state regulators over their decision to limit money that Pinnacle West can withdraw from its cash-rich utility unit.  The case, closely watched by lawyers and financial analysts, is expected to influence Pinnacle West's capacity to finance a stable of troubled non-utility investments, including MeraBank, its sick thrift unit.  Under debate is a provisional order, entered last month, by the Arizona Corporation Commission that limits the dividend that Arizona Public Service may pay Pinnacle West to its current rate of $52.7 million a quarter.  The commission's preliminary decision stands pending an Oct. 16 hearing on a permanent order.  After initially appearing to acquiesce to the temporary order, Pinnacle West, based in Phoenix, Ariz., has opened a two-pronged challenge.  In a hearing yesterday, the Arizona commission agreed at Pinnacle West's request to hear objections to its temporary order.  And, in another route, Pinnacle West on Wednesday filed a lawsuit in state court alleging that the commission was acting beyond its powers in curbing the flow of cash between its utility unit and the parent.  The importance to analysts is both the immediate potential effect on wounded Pinnacle West and the longer-term precedent that may emerge for Arizona regulation.  "There is a fundamental issue here: Who controls the dividend policy -- the regulators or the management?" says Edward J. Tirello, Jr., an analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  The commission took its action last month to forestall what it believed was a risk that Pinnacle West might drain cash from Arizona Public Service to meet a Federal Home Loan Bank order that MeraBank must shortly obtain $192 million in added capital.  The thrift's parent company is the only likely provider of those funds and, among Pinnacle West's units, the utility is the most likely source.  Pinnacle West also has investments in uranium mining and real estate.  The real source of worry here may be the parent company's strategy with its own dividend, says Mr. Tirello.  After a 40% cut announced late last year to 40 cents a share quarterly, Pinnacle West is paying dividends at an annual rate of about $139 million a year while receiving dividends from Arizona Public Service at a rate of $211 million a year.  The $72 million difference has given the parent company additional funds that can be used for its non-utility operations.  However, theorizes Mr. Tirello, if Pinnacle West eliminates its dividend, the commission might reduce or eliminate the utility's payment to the parent on the grounds that the funds weren't needed for payout to shareholders.  A company spokesman wasn't immediately available to comment on Mr. Tirello's theory.  Pinnacle West has said repeatedly that it won't "subsidize" non-utility operations with utility funds.  Pinnacle West faces an uphill climb with its state court challenge of the corporation commission's powers, precedents suggest.  The commission has unusual authority because it was established by the state constitution rather than the legislature and because its members are elected.  Time and again, state courts have been reluctant to interfere with the commission's authority and, in an early state Supreme Court opinion, the commission was actually refered to as "a fourth branch of government," with stature equal to the other three.  However, the current commission, in a series of recent steps, "has been trying to expand its powers to the constitutional maximum," asserts Hugh Holub, utilities lawyer with the Tucson firm of Linden, Chapa & Fields.  To date the courts have mostly continued to uphold the commission.  For instance, the state Supreme Court not long ago agreed that the commission had the authority to review Pinnacle West's accounts, establishing a newly asserted authority to look into the inner workings of a non-regulated parent.  Says Mr. Holub of the commission's order controlling the Arizona Public Service payout to Pinnacle West, "they are certainly on the edge of their authority; the question is, which edge?"  Taxpayers paid 7% more in state taxes in fiscal 1988 than they did in the previous year, the government reported.  The Commerce Department said state tax revenues totaled $264 billion for the year ended June 30, 1988, compared with $246 billion in the previous fiscal year.  Tax collections in Hawaii, Montana and Oklahoma posted 20% gains each, the department said.  Other states registering big gains included Texas, 19%; Alaska, 18%; Kansas and Maine, 17% each; Florida, 16%, and South Dakota, 15%.  Alaskans also paid more state taxes on a per-capita basis -- $2,439 each -- than residents of the other 49 states, the department said.  However, the Alaska payments included $818.7 million in severance taxes on oil and gas production that distort individual income-tax payments.  New Hampshire had the lowest per-capita state tax, $532.  The national per capita tax average was $1,077.  Three states had decreases in 1988 overall tax collections -- Wyoming, down 9%, and Oregon and West Virginia, falling 6% each, the department said.  California had the largest total state tax revenue, $36 billion, followed by New York, $26 billion; Texas, $13 billion; Pennsylvania, $12 billion; Illinois, Michigan and Florida, $11 billion each; and Ohio, $10 billion.  These eight states accounted for nearly half of the taxes collected nationally.  Although it ranked among the top nine states in percentage revenue gains, South Dakota collected the smallest amount in state taxes, $476 million.  Ranking with it at the bottom of the tax collection list were Wyoming, $573 million; New Hampshire, $583 million; Vermont, $617 million; and North Dakota, $633 million.  General sales and gross receipts taxes were the largest source of state tax revenues at $87 billion, up 10% from 1987.  Individual income taxes accounted for $80 billion, up 5%, while corporate net income taxes rose 6% to $22 billion.  The Commerce report included data on state taxes only, most of which was collected by a canvass of state offices.  Revenue from non-tax sources such as federal government payments wasn't included.  A former branch manager at Society for Savings Bancorp embezzled more than $1 million, the bank holding company said.  No indictment has yet been brought against the ex-employee, but the Federal Bureau of Investigation has been investigating the matter, the company said.  The company declined to identify the former manager.  Joan Libby, vice president and associate counsel, said the employee was fired after the embezzlement was discovered during a standard internal audit in the first quarter of this year.  About $1,050,000 has been restored to accounts of depositors affected, and additional claims of about $26,000 are pending.  Ms. Libby, citing security considerations, declined to discuss how the embezzlement was carried out.  The company said it has adopted additional auditing and operational procedures to prevent a recurrence.  The restitution was reflected in the company's first and second quarter results, effectively reducing pre-tax earnings by more than $1 million.  For the six months, Society reported profit of $31.7 million, or $2.66 a share, including a net gain of $14.5 million from the sale of a credit-card portfolio.  That compared with earnings of $14.9 million, or $1.25 a share, a year earlier.  Society had assets of about $4.3 billion as of June 30.  The company had refrained from disclosing the embezzlement while the FBI investigation was under way but decided to make the announcement after it became apparent that the investigation might not be completed soon, Ms. Libby said.  The Bush administration is using a widening circle of contacts to communicate with Iran, and officials don't rule out direct talks at some point.  Pakistan has emerged as the latest intermediary in communications between the two nations about U.S. hostages.  Iran may be sending a signal that it would like to work through the Pakistanis.  Sahabzada Yaqub Khan, Pakistan's foreign minister, met with Vice President Dan Quayle and other U.S. officials in Washington last week, and one administration official said the fate of hostages was "prominently discussed."  Mr. Quayle urged Pakistan to help win the release of eight Americans held in Lebanon.  The Pakistani official is planning a trip to Tehran next week.  U.S. and Pakistani officials say the U.S. didn't specifically ask Mr. Yaqub Khan to undertake a mission to Iran, which he has visited before to discuss regional issues, including the war in Afghanistan.  But Iran yesterday seemed to signal an interest in working through Pakistan to talk about the hostages.  The Tehran Times newspaper said Iran would soon begin "indirect talks" with the U.S. over the hostage situation, and quoted "political observers" as saying that Pakistan's foreign minister was the intermediary with the best chance of success in such discussions.  For their part, White House officials tried to signal their openness to communicating through Pakistan.  White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said that "we would take advantage of every visit like that to send a message in."  The U.S. doesn't have formal diplomatic relations with Iran.  But Pakistan, while a strong friend of the U.S., has maintained good relations with its fellow Moslem nation.  Iran, in turn, exerts strong influence over the Shiite extremists in Lebanon who are holding Western hostages.  White House officials say the U.S. has sent other diplomatic messages to Iran this week.  The U.S. normally transmits formal diplomatic notes through the Swiss government, which represents American interests in Tehran.  Algeria is believed to be communicating with the Iranians on behalf of the Bush administration as well.  And it is understood that the U.S. has asked other nations, including Turkey, to use any influence they might have to try to help in the hostage situation.  According to diplomatic officials, Turkey has been in contact with Iran on its own, telling Iranians that if they are interested in an opening to the West, now is the time to use their influence to resolve the hostage crisis.  In addition, a senior administration official said President Bush is using a variety of personal contacts to send messages outside usual diplomatic channels.  Margaret Tutwiler, the State Department's spokeswoman, yesterday reiterated administration statements that the U.S. is prepared to begin talking directly with authorized representatives from Tehran.  However, she added that improved relations "depend upon that government stopping its support for terrorism and taking action to bring about the immediate, unconditional and safe" release of U.S. hostages being held in Lebanon.  And Mr. Fitzwater, while also expressing willingness for direct talks, said it is "premature" to consider holding them now.  The Iranian newspaper report about contacts through Pakistan was relayed on Iran's government-operated IRNA news agency, suggesting that the report was sanctioned by the government in Tehran.  The Iranian newspaper has been known to have good contacts with the office of Iranian President Hashemi Rafsanjani.  Still, some observers speculated that Iran's use of public communications like newspaper stories suggests that diplomatic communications between the U.S. and Iran haven't yet become detailed and serious.  "I wonder why, if Rafsanjani has something concrete going, he would need all this public diplomacy," said Shaul Bakhash, an Iranian writer and analyst at the Woodrow Wilson International Center for Scholars.  In forum after forum, the inside-the-Beltway advocates of "more" for the federal sector echo former Federal Reserve Board chairman Paul Volcker's assertion that "government in particular is increasingly unable to attract, retain and motivate the kinds of people it will need to do the essential work of the republic in the years and decades ahead."  But evidence of this dire emergency, said to be the result of the "low" salaries of federal workers, is hard -- if not impossible -- to come by.  It's no wonder it has been dubbed the "quiet crisis" by its popularizers, who include some of Washington's heaviest hitters.  No less than President Bush has been snookered on this issue, recommending pay increases ranging from 25% for run-of-the-mill federal executives to a whopping 200% for people called "critically skilled workers."  The Office of Management and Budget is said to be working on a complicated sliding scale of executive salaries.  Mr. Bush has failed to recognize that while the stated goal of the proponents of more money for federal workers is to improve the quality of the federal work force by raising salaries, increasing morale, getting rid of political appointees, ensuring policy stability, and making federal careers attractive to the "best and brightest" of America's young workers, the real goal is to perpetuate existing federal policies in the face of political change.  Several groups are now active in the quiet-crisis camp.  The most important and conspicuous group is the National Commission on the Public Service, headed by Mr. Volcker.  Others include the Center for Excellence in Government, the National Academy of Public Administration, and the National Association of Schools of Public Affairs and Administration.  Also in the camp are many other academics, as well as such political luminaries as Comptroller General Charles Bowsher, former President Gerald Ford, and former Vice President Walter Mondale.  Among congressional efforts is the Excellence in Government Management Act, introduced by Rep. Patricia Schroeder (D., Colo.) last year.  Charles Levine of the Congressional Research Service is one of those who warn that "human resource erosion" is undermining the federal government.  Yet in a 1987 paper, "The Quiet Crisis of the Civil Service: The Federal Personnel System at the Crossroads," he concedes that "building a case for the proposition that such erosion is taking place is no easy task.  Systematic evidence to confirm or deny the proposition simply does not exist."  Instead of presenting hard data, the quiet-crisis camp treats us to anecdotes, quotations from John F. Kennedy and Franklin D. Roosevelt, and the results of opinion surveys of federal employees conducted by interested groups.  Punctuating the mass of speculation and supposition are statistics showing recruitment and retention problems within specific occupations and occupational categories.  Those problems are then attributed to the work force as a whole.  Most of the concern focuses not on federal employees in general but on high-level careerists in Washington, who are supposedly underpaid, under-appreciated, and not consulted often enough or listened to intently enough by those appointed by the president to carry out his policies.  The organizations in the quiet-crisis contingent are often staffed by people who were high-level bureaucrats, people who hope to be high-level bureaucrats, high-level workers in the private sector who view high-level bureaucrats as their counterparts, and academics who enjoy associating with high-level bureaucrats.  Because the quiet-crisis camp knows that one can't get very far, even in Washington, by voicing concern over people whose incomes place them in the top 0.5% of the American workforce (as witnessed by the recent brouhaha over a congressional pay raise), its members sometimes attempt to extend the so-called crisis to include the worker bees down below.  That is where they run into trouble.  The quit rate is 10.9% in the private sector but only 5.2% in the federal government.  Even in occupations for which there are significant disparities between private-sector and federal salary levels, the differences in the rates at which employees vote with their feet are insignificant.  The largest pay gap is that of chemists and engineers in the federal government and their private-sector counterparts, but the federal groups' quit rates are very low (2.3% for chemists and 3.3% for engineers).  Given that government chemists and engineers have skills readily transferable to the private sector, something about federal employment must keep it attractive.  Indeed, federal employment seems to be an attractive option for many people.  The demand for federal jobs, in fact, casts doubt on a central assumption of the quiet-crisis camp.  A few years ago, as I outlined in a May 21, 1986, article on this page, Steven Venti of Dartmouth College took a hard look at federal and private-sector salaries.  He found, first, that there were queues of people waiting to fill federal jobs, and that most of those people were qualified.  Second, the demand was due to a federal wage advantage of 4% for men and 22% for women.  Third, the only way to eliminate the queues -- and thereby establish the federal government as a cost-minimizing employer -- would be to lower men's wages by 16% and women's wages by 42%.  Fourth, such wage cuts would have little impact on work force quality; they would reduce men's average education level by one-tenth of a year and women's by three-tenths of a year.  Mr. Venti used 1982 figures in his study, but nothing that has happened since would appear to significantly affect his findings.  Suppose that the government attempted to attract more graduates of the best schools by increasing salary levels significantly.  It would then be spending more tax dollars to raise the salaries not only of the best and the brightest but of the other newly hired workers, who would have been happy to take jobs at lower rates.  The government could not pay applicant Smith more to analyze projects than it paid applicant Jones just because Smith was an honors graduate of Yale and Jones was a middling graduate of Great Plains State.  Moreover, because fairly hefty salary increases would be required to attract more Smiths, more Joneses would be attracted as well.  Remember, there already is a large pool of qualified workers waiting to fill government jobs.  If the government raised salaries high enough to attract superior workers, it would be overwhelmed with applicants.  Of course, the private sector would continue to value the Smiths of the world, and it would raise its salaries to compete for them.  The government would then raise salaries again in an effort to keep attracting the Smiths.  Thus, such an attempt to attract top-quality workers to federal careers would increase the already-long applicant queues and raise the cost of doing government.  Furthermore, better benefits packages and more-frequent pay raises would be provided in order to retain top-quality workers.  Such an attempt to attract the best and the brightest to federal careers would also serve to deprive the U.S. economy of its driving force: the skill and knowledge that result in the production of wealth.  The cost of that loss cannot be estimated.  If the best and brightest Americans were employed by the government, the breakthroughs that result in new products, processes, and markets would surely come from firms in other countries.  Also important to the quiet-crisis case is the erroneous idea that political appointees hold too large a percentage of federal jobs.  In fact, political appointees constitute only about 0.12% of the federal work force.  When the quiet-crisis groups complain that there are too many political appointees, they generally mean that there are too many conservative Republican appointees.  It is no accident that the political figures they usually cite as good stewards of government are Franklin D. Roosevelt, John F. Kennedy, and Lyndon B. Johnson -- presidents who expanded the role of federal employees.  The issue that underlies much of the quiet-crisis crusade is not federal employees' morale or efficiency but power -- who is to wield it and thereby shape government policy.  The permanent government now sees its influence waning, and it is fighting back on many fronts.  At stake in the battle is whether an administration committed to reducing the size and role of the federal government can succeed.  We deserve more-efficient government, not merely more government.  ---  Mr. Culler, an associate director of the U.S. Office of Personnel Management during the Reagan administration, is an executive recruiter.  This article is adapted from the June Cato Policy Report.  Christopher DeMuth, president of the American Enterprise Institute, speaking at the AEI World Forum in June:  I hope {Soviet Ambassador Yuri} Dubinin won't mind my observing that those of us in the West who are so enthusiastic about the changes sweeping his country feel this way not only because we know of the happiness and prosperity they can bring to his countrymen, but because we relish the thought of a Soviet Union transformed into a politically fractious and argumentative nation, rent by disagreements and uncertainties and by personal and philosophical rivalries -- in short, a nation just as self-absorbed and unruly and incapable of decisive state action as our nations are.  "Was Soviet power built for this?" is the question put by Yegor Ligachev.  We Americans hope so, since this is so conspicuously what American power was built for.  The future of pit trading at the Chicago Board of Trade and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange was in doubt long before the recent FBI sting operation.  It simply does not make sense in an era of high technology and low communications costs to conduct trading by having thousands of people waving and shouting in trading pits.  Not only is the operation highly people-intensive and very expensive but, more important, at a time when trading is becoming globalized, it is difficult to keep the markets open beyond their normal hours to accommodate traders in Europe and Asia.  Though some exchanges already have instituted several hours of night trading to attract Japanese business, it would be extremely costly to arrange for a shift of pit traders to function at the crack of dawn and late into the night.  In these days of computerized trading, it is a relatively simple matter to keep markets open for traders in various time zones.  Automated trading will also help keep traders honest -- an important concern in the wake of the recent scandal at the Chicago Board of Trade and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange.  The allegations of abuse there include kickbacks, skimming customer profits, and prearranging trades in soybeans, foreign currencies and Treasury bonds.  In the pits, the possibility of cheating can never be regulated out of existence, no matter how tightly the rules are enforced by the commodities exchanges themselves or by the federal government's Commodities Futures Trading Commission.  The pits create a frenzied environment in which trading practices are difficult to track and to enforce.  In computerized trading, however, while tainted input, pre-arranged trading and profit-skimming are still possible, they are far less likely.  When traders enter orders independently from their own offices, and when they know that trades can be easily traced and audited, the potential for unethical conduct will diminish.  Abuse on the Chicago commodities markets was encouraged by the ease of avoiding detection.  The commodities markets are unable to provide a full record of all transactions.  They lack an "audit trail," which would allow the regulatory agencies to reconstruct the sequence of trades.  The New York Stock Exchange, which is mostly automated, can reproduce the sequence of all trades, including time, the identity of buyers and sellers, and the price and amount of the transaction.  In the commodities markets, however, only select and incomplete information is provided by reporters stationed in the pits.  For example, the buyers and sellers are identified only later in the clearing process, which makes it very difficult to reconstruct a complete record of all trading.  Without a full record, the scope for fraud expands.  A computerized trading system would change all that dramatically.  For example, if a commodities broker systematically engaged in "front running" of customer orders, he would run a significant risk of detection.  In front running, the broker places an order for his own account to buy or sell ahead of the customer's.  If a broker engaged in that practice frequently, an audit of the sequence of trading could uncover it.  There might still be a question of intent: whether the broker acted independent of the customer order or in response to it.  But there are sophisticated surveillance techniques, generally called "analysis programs," that can reveal systematic patterns of trading.  No longer would FBI undercover agents have to mingle in the pit to establish a pattern of malfeasance.  Surveillance would become continuous and routine.  The physical separation of brokers would also make it harder for traders to agree to execute each other's orders and to kick back ill-gotten gains.  An electronic audit trail of transactions would strengthen market regulations in many ways and go a long way toward ensuring more equitable and efficient market trading.  The technology for automating pit trading is not something to be achieved in the future; it is here.  The Chicago Mercantile Exchange has signed an agreement with Reuters to set up an after-hours futures trading network to be known as Globex.  It is scheduled to start up Dec. 1, with hours of operation from 6 p.m. till 6 a.m.  The Chicago Board of Trade has unveiled its own automated system, called Aurora, which is scheduled to go into operation next year.  Aurora may, however, be combined with Globex if current negotiations succeed.  London's International Financial Futures Exchange is putting the finishing touches on its Automated Pit Trading System, which will imitate pit trading on a computer screen.  If the systems work as well as expected, there is no reason to confine electronic trading to after hours, as is now planned.  The economies of computerized trading are likely to make pit trading uncompetitive and put this antiquated system out of its misery.  Allegations of crooked trading have made the need to overhaul pit trading and regulations more apparent than ever.  Indeed, computerized trading may be the only way to restore public confidence in these tarnished markets.  The sooner the better.  ---  Mr. Freund, former chief economist of the New York Stock Exchange, is a professor of economics at Pace University's graduate business school.  When someone leaked last week that President Bush had decided to use military force if terrorists killed another hostage, the remarkable news was how few thought it remarkable.  Welcome back to the future of "gunboat diplomacy."  Today the term is used only pejoratively, of course, a reference to sordid Western imperialism.  But gunboat diplomacy was also once the way all great powers protected their interests and citizens.  Now, as Soviet-U.S. tension recedes, gunboat diplomacy may have to stage a come back in a world that remains full of Irans, Noriegas, Syrias, Hezbollahs and others intent on harming U.S. interests.  The need to resort to force will become more likely, not less, if the Cold War ebbs.  The gunboat may be out-of-date as a weapon but it's prophetic as a metaphor.  For at least 20 years, a major deterrent to the use of American force has been the fear that it would escalate into a broader conflict, perhaps even a U.S.-Soviet nuclear exchange.  That fear restrained Richard Nixon during the 1973 Arab-Israeli War, and it hung over Jimmy Carter's handling of his hostage crisis.  Today the shadow of Apocalypse, never very real in fact, is clearly receding.  Whether or not the Cold War is yet overrealists are keeping their powder dry -- the Soviets are retrenching in the near term.  They aren't about to invade Europe, northern Iran or anywhere else.  They even claim to want to share intelligence details to fight terrorism.  The paradox is that, even as the immediate Soviet threat recedes, the threat of violence against Americans and U.S. interests will grow.  At least Soviet proxies could be restrained by Moscow.  Terrorist leaders and fanatic states, from Libya to Iran to Peru's Shining Path, carry grievances that can't be appeased.  They can only be deterred or pre-empted.  The world's fanatics will also have access to ever deadlier weapons, as new technology inevitably spreads.  Iraq and Iran have already used poison gas.  As many as 17 Third World countries (e.g., Brazil) have or are developing long-range missiles.  A hair-raising Department of Defense study, "The Future Security Environment," reports that, in 1965, India was the only Third World nation able to make modern weapons.  By the mid-1980s, six regional powers made tanks and helicopters, while eight could build fighter aircraft and tactical missiles.  Col. Gadhafi soon won't be the only head case building a chemical-weapons plant.  The return of gunboat diplomacy will require two major changes in U.S. thinking.  The first is a change in U.S. military strategy.  Perhaps 70% of the U.S. defense budget currently goes toward defending against two implausible Big Bangs: the nuclear Apocalypse and the invasion of Central Europe.  Meanwhile, the country lacks resources to counter threats that really happen -- minesweepers to clear the Persian Gulf, or human intelligence to find terrorists in Lebanon.  In the gunboat era, the U.S. will need new weapons and tactics.  As the U.S. loses its foreign bases, weapons that can project power and return to the U.S. (the Stealth bomber, for example) will be critical.  A president will also want so-called "discriminate" weapons, such as cruise missiles, which can reach and strike a target without blowing up the surrounding country.  Perhaps the U.S. will even want to amend the executive order that prevents the killing of terrorists.  As former Defense Undersecretary Fred Ikle observes, today a president can order a bombing run that is virtually certain to kill innocent civilians, but he breaks the law if he orders a single assassination.  A second change may already be occurring: New public support for the use of force.  After a decade of terrorism, Jimmy Carter's early boast that no American soldier had died on his watch seems almost quaint.  While the Grenada invasion inspired hysterical opposition in 1983, the Libyan strike drew bipartisan support in 1986. (Michael Dukakis was a dissenter, and we know what happened to him.)  In the last 10 days, some of the loudest cries for retaliation have come from liberal Democrats.  Even discounting for hypocrisy, with each new terrorist act against Americans the "Vietnam syndrome" crowd grows less credible.  None of this means the U.S. will suddenly become trigger happy.  Often a president will be able to work through a more nervy ally; Israel comes to mind.  Moreover, the point of gunboat diplomacy is to show the boats in order not to have to use the guns.  In the present episode, the Hezbollah terrorists backed off their threat to kill Joseph Cicippio after U.S. warships steamed to the area.  Terrorists can recall the Libya strike too.  President Bush's decision to try diplomacy is hard to fault, given the new, post-Khomeini era in Iran.  An opening to Iran is in U.S. interests now, just as it was during the Reagan years. (By the way, where are all those who derided Ronald Reagan for thinking Hashemi Rafsanjani was a "moderate"?  The same people are now praising George Bush for negotiating with him.  Perhaps Mr. Bush should send Ollie North with a cake?) But if diplomacy proves fruitless, Mr. Bush will have to rely on gunboats to make the backers of terrorism pay a price.  In a typical analysis this week, Andrew Rosenthal of the New York Times discussed the "torment" of trying to retrieve hostages.  He cited George Washington for paying ransom to the Barbary pirates to retrieve 100 U.S. sailors.  What he didn't mention is how Thomas Jefferson dealt with the same pirates only a few years later.  He sent gunboats.  Weeks have passed since some environmental group plopped a scary story onto the public, so we were overdue.  It fell to the National Wildlife Federation to announce yesterday that based on its "analysis" of federal statistics and data banks, 500 companies have produced billions and billions of pounds of toxic waste in recent years.  The mere assertion of this, of course, is expected to elicit horror and outrage from the usual quarters.  No doubt it will, too.  Akorn Inc. said it agreed to acquire the human ophthalmic and medical pharmaceutical manufacturing operations of Norbrook Holdings Ltd. of Northern Ireland.  Akorn, a distributor of pharmaceutical products, will give Norbrook one million common shares and assume about $2 million of its short-term debt in exchange for the assets.  The agreement also grants Norbrook, a manufacturer of veterinary pharmaceuticals, the option to acquire an additional one million shares of Akorn common for $2 each.  In national over-the-counter trading, Akorn closed at $1.9375, up 12.5 cents.  Twenty-eight years ago this Sunday, East German soldiers and police ripped up the pavement at 80 crossing points to West Berlin.  They installed barbed wire and trenches, and then built a 28-mile barrier between East and West Berlin and surrounded the Western sector with an additional 74 miles of concrete.  This was the Berlin Wall, the East's solution to people fleeing communism for freedom in the West.  It still stands, an ugly monument to repression that casts a dark shadow over Mr. Gorbachev's liberalizations.  Since August 13, 1961, more than 180 people have died trying to escape; more than 100,000 have left the country "legally," which in large part means that the West German government paid head fees, up to $100,000, to the East Germans.  Now in 1989 alone, as many as 100,000, most of them younger than 40, are expected to get out one way or another.  The reality behind the rush is East Germany's meager standard of living, despite the frequent assertion that it's communism's most "successful" country.  Add to this the evident progress toward democratization under way in Poland and Hungary.  In the past few weeks, hundreds of asylum-seekers have descended on West German diplomatic missions in East Berlin, Prague, Budapest and Belgrade, causing a problem for Bonn.  It can't simply reject those among the 17 million East Germans who've decided they can't take it any longer.  But Bonn doesn't want to encourage the depopulation of East Germany.  So Bonn is lamely suggesting to the people holed up in its missions that they to go home and file formal applications, noting that the East Germans have promised not to retaliate.  The determination of so many East Germans to get out also has created an unprecedented split within the East bloc.  Hungary began to tear down the Iron Curtain along the Austrian border in May, ripping up barbed-wire barriers.  Also, it signed the Geneva Convention on Refugees in June.  At the same time, Hungary has a 20-year-old agreement with East Germany on tourist traffic that calls for it to return any would-be escapees to East Germany.  Budapest is negotiating with East Berlin on a resolution of the conflict between the two treaties, and it was in this context that the Hungarians called a news conference yesterday to discuss the East Germans who "vacation" in Hungary to utilize the country's open-door policy on travel to the West.  The Hungarian officials assured 100 or so domestic and foreign correspondents that Hungary won't hand back political asylum-seekers, only criminals.  It would be inconceivable in the current political atmosphere in Hungary for Budapest to act otherwise.  The country already is functioning as a conduit and a recipient for political refugees from countries run by men willing to sacrifice their last citizen on the altar of communism; most come from Romania, but also from Czechoslovakia, East Germany, and from as far away as Somalia.  There is one, short-term solution to this awful mess: Make travel in the East absolutely unrestricted.  Paradoxically, Hungary, which is by no means a paradise yet, found that after it removed most legal barriers on travel to the West, people stopped trying to escape and travelers stopped being hesitant about coming home.  Perhaps the most human lesson of the Berlin Wall on its 28th anniversary is that people will try to flee from communism, if indeed communism can function only by turning a nation into a vast prison.  Advantage Cos. said shareholders approved the previously announced agreement to merge with LDDS Communications Inc.  The new company will be known as LDDS Communications Inc. Advantage shareholders will receive one share of new LDDS Class A common for every 3.9 shares of Advantage common.  The merged long-distance telephone companies will serve more than 100,000 customers in 11 states in the South and Midwest.  LDDS is a closely held company based in Jackson, Miss.  Royal Dutch/Shell Group and British Petroleum Co. recorded sharp second-quarter profit gains, reflecting higher oil prices and strong gasoline and chemical operations.  Earnings of Royal Dutch/Shell, based in The Hague and London, rose 58%.  BP, based in London, reported a 98% jump, including a one-time gain on an asset sale.  The forces driving their results contributed to recently reported robust profits of major U.S.-based oil companies as well.  However, so far this quarter, oil prices have declined, gasoline refining margins have been narrowing and chemical prices are falling.  Third-quarter profits are expected to soften across the industry.  "We expect that in the second half, refining margins will ease from first-half levels and the currently weaker commodity chemicals markets will reduce profits there," said David Simon, a BP managing director.  Royal Dutch/Shell said second-quarter net income rose to #1.01 billion ($1.64 billion) from #636 million a year earlier.  Sales rose 18% to #16.1 billion from #13.6 billion.  Shell Oil Co., the U.S. unit of Royal Dutch/Shell, previously reported a sharp earnings gain and its results are included in the parent's.  Royal Dutch/Shell's oil production earnings surged as the price of North Sea Brent crude increased 17% to an average of $18.90 a barrel.  The stronger dollar also boosted production earnings because crude oil is priced in dollars world-wide.  The effect of North Sea production interruptions was more than offset by increased output from Nigeria and other countries, the company said.  BP said net income rose to #638 million from #323 million.  The latest quarter included a #267 million gain from the sale of mineral assets.  Revenue rose 15% to #7.39 billion from #6.44 billion.  Decreased output from the North Sea and Alaska caused BP production profit to decline.  Chemical profit rose, however, as did gasoline refining and marketing profit, particularly in U.S. operations.  BP said debt made up 48% of its capitalization as of June 30, up from 37% at the beginning of 1989.  BP's debt level was boosted by short-term borrowings used to finance its #2.42 billion buy-back of 790 million ordinary shares from the Kuwait Investment Office earlier this year.  However, the level continues to drop, "and we're well on track to reach the level of debt that we were planning to have by year end," Mr. Simon said.  The company had set a target of close to 40% for its year-end debt level.  Mr. Simon said BP expects to meet or exceed its goal of divesting $1.5 billion to $2 billion of assets this year.  BP, the largest producer of oil in the U.S., is trying to shed operations outside the oil business.  Early this year, it agreed to sell its mineral assets outside Canada to RTZ PLC for $4.32 billion.  In mid-June, BP put most of its coal assets and operations on the block in a sale that analysts said may fetch as much as $500 million.  "We have had some 55 offers of serious interest in the {coal} business," Mr. Simon said.  Among the mining companies analysts cite as possible buyers for the Cleveland-based BP coal unit are: Broken Hill Proprietary Co. of Australia; U.S.-based Amax Inc.; RTZ of Britain; and Minorco S.A. of Luxembourg.  "Two of them {on that list} are in there" looking at the coal business, Mr. Simon said.  He wouldn't identify the pair, but said the auction "will be under way in a month or so."  He expects to complete the sale by late this year or early 1990.  Mr. Simon denied repeated rumors that BP might dispose of its nutrition business, which includes Purina pet food, animal feed and meat and poultry.  Nutrition represents an area with "long-run attractive potential," he said.  But a second BP executive indicated a strategic alliance might prove a better way to develop the business's meat operation.  In late trading on London's Stock Exchange yesterday, BP was quoted at 295.5 pence, down three pence.  Shell Transport & Trading, the British arm of Royal Dutch/Shell, fell 1.5 pence to 434. 